Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:PART IGENERAL GOVERNMENTSec. 101. 2025 c 424 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($61,985,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,240,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($65,250,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,649,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($127,235,000))Â Â Â Â Â $128,889,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for expenses of the joint legislative-executive committee on budget transparency and fiscal sustainability established in section 907 of this act, including any contracts authorized pursuant to section 907(4) of this act.Sec. 102. 2025 c 424 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SENATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($45,521,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,533,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($50,984,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,948,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($96,505,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,481,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for expenses of the joint legislative-executive committee on budget transparency and fiscal sustainability established in section 907 of this act, including any contracts authorized pursuant to section 907(4) of this act.Sec. 103. 2025 c 424 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEEPerformance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($13,910,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,966,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,910,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,966,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2025-2027 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.(2)(a) $400,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to review the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation programs as listed on the committee's approved work plan, including:(i) Review the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation program's existing processes and staffing methodology used for determining adequate staffing ratios to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juveniles and ensure public safety;(ii) Review procedures and protocols for professional development, hiring and recruitment, and training for staff serving youth in juvenile rehabilitation institutions, with a focus on how staff are trained to implement rehabilitative practices;(iii) Review youth access to programming, treatment, and services including, but not limited to, educational programming, treatment and services for youth experiencing substance use disorder, behavioral health treatment, available reentry services such as housing, job training, and other supports, access to technology services, family and community connections, and other programming and services offered by the department to provide youth with rehabilitation and restorative interventions;(iv) Review existing security and safety measures, including the use of disciplinary procedures for total isolation and room confinement, adopted by the department and their effectiveness in meeting the unique needs of the juvenile population in the custody of the department;(v) Review how often and how many youth face new juvenile or adult criminal offense charges, convictions, or both while residing at juvenile rehabilitation institutions and potential future consequences that may occur as a result such as sentence extension, likelihood of recidivism, health impacts, and effects regarding criminal records;(vi) Assess gender equity regarding education, employment, and career options for female youth;(vii) Review how staffing impacts youth-on-youth conflict and safety;(viii) Review best practices from other states regarding security and safety measures, programming opportunities, reentry supports, staff training and professional development, and staffing ratios, and identify options that may be feasible to adopt in Washington state to increase public safety and the security, programming options, treatment services, and rehabilitation mission of the department's juvenile rehabilitation institutions;(ix) Review the department's existing processes for responding to critical incidents, including communication and cooperation with local law enforcement, and identify areas for improvement; and(x) Review the impacts of changes in average daily population, longer lengths of stay, longer sentences, increases in maximum age of release, increases in more serious offense types and adult sentences, and related effects of chapter 322, Laws of 2019.(b) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026. The report shall include recommendations on supporting the juvenile rehabilitation program's efforts to gradually move young people from carceral settings to least restrictive environments to improve positive reentry outcomes.(3) $400,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to evaluate the ignition interlock device revolving account including the compliance and monitoring results associated with the device requirements, as listed on the committee's approved work plan. The evaluation must include but is not limited to the following:(a) An assessment of the compliance rates for individuals with a legal requirement to have an ignition interlock device installed on their vehicle;(b) A review of impediments of barriers to individual compliance with ignition interlock device installation and use requirements;(c) An examination of state and local agency performance in monitoring and enforcing ignition interlock device requirements; and(d) Prioritized recommendations of potential procedural, policy, or statutory changes, including additional fiscal resources to state or local agencies which will improve ignition interlock device compliance rates. The joint legislative and audit review committee must prioritize the evaluation of compliance and results associated with the state's ignition interlock device requirements in its work plan for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(4) $150,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to review the department of natural resources long-term forest health planning and sustainable harvest approach as listed on the committee's approved work plan.(5) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct the audit required under Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (energy standard/comply cost).(6)(a) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review auditing, accountability, and risk management practices across Washington's state agencies. The review may consider:(i) Existing internal controls, oversight processes, a sample of state programs that oversee and administer grants, loans and contracts, and the role of the state auditor, internal auditors within agencies, and the office of financial management in preventing fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanagement;(ii) Gaps, weaknesses, or inefficiencies in current auditing and accountability practices;(iii) A comparison of Washington's auditing and accountability practices to those of other states, highlighting models, strategies, or tools that have proven effective elsewhere; and(iv) Options for enhancing statewide accountability that are produced in clear and accessible language, highlighting actionable steps that could improve accountability and stewardship of public funds.(b) The committee shall report on the results of the performance audit, including findings and recommendations, to the legislature by June 30, 2027.Sec. 104. 2025 c 424 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEEPerformance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($5,607,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,627,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,607,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,627,000Sec. 105. 2025 c 424 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($23,263,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,261,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($22,084,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,213,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($45,347,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,474,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.(2) $1,003,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for purchasing IT equipment for the Pritchard building.Sec. 106. 2025 c 424 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE LEGISLATIVE LABOR RELATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($919,000))Â Â Â Â Â $925,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($933,000))Â Â Â Â Â $969,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,852,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,894,000Sec. 107. 2025 c 424 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$404,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$422,000State Health Care Authority Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$318,000Department of Retirement Systems Expense AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($7,684,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,717,000School Employees' Insurance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$265,000Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$50,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($9,093,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,176,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The select committee on pension policy shall study and report on the tax, legal, actuarial, pension policy, and administrative implications of merging the legacy pension systems as contemplated in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5085 (closed retirement plans) and terminating plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system as contemplated in Substitute House Bill No. 2034 (LEOFF 1 restatement). The department of retirement systems, the attorney general's office, the office of the state treasurer, the Washington state investment board, and the office of the state actuary shall provide the select committee on pension policy with assistance as requested. The select committee on pension policy shall submit a report to include key findings to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 9, 2026.(2) $50,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office to review the board of volunteer firefighters and reserve officers relief and pension funds and evaluate whether the current annual allocation of fire insurance premium tax provides sufficient funding, together with member and employer contributions, to meet the plan's systematic actuarial required contributions while mitigating the risk of excess funding. The office shall provide findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.Sec. 108. 2025 c 424 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($6,429,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,226,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($6,245,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,506,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,674,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,732,000Sec. 109. 2025 c 424 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($6,568,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,629,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($6,926,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,246,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,494,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,875,000Sec. 110. 2025 c 424 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPREME COURTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($15,979,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,976,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($16,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,230,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($32,226,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,206,000The legislature respectfully requests that by November 1, 2026, the family well-being community collaborative work group of the supreme court commission on children in foster care provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the work group's recommendations for court processes for child welfare cases without removal from the home.Sec. 111. 2025 c 424 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,935,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,934,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,863,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,880,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,798,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,814,000Sec. 112. 2025 c 424 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COURT OF APPEALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($27,987,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,976,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($28,640,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,629,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($56,627,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,605,000Sec. 113. 2025 c 424 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($108,147,000))Â Â Â Â Â $108,793,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($109,947,000))Â Â Â Â Â $115,553,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,209,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$681,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($36,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,784,000Judicial Information Systems AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($79,530,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,437,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$940,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($338,093,000))Â Â Â Â Â $349,397,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.(2)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.(b) Each fiscal year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.(c) In the report required under this subsection for fiscal year 2026, the administrator for the courts shall additionally recommend reforms to the distribution of costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals that would:(i) Improve outcomes for children in the juvenile court system;(ii) More efficiently cover costs for juvenile court administrators;(iii) Reduce abuses of the juvenile court system; and(iv) Provide more efficient use of state dollars in the juvenile court system.(3) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for distribution to superior courts (juvenile court administrators) for early intervention and prevention services that support and provide direct and wrap-around services for truant and at-risk youth, children in need of services, and their families. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. Funding must be used solely for services for youth in the county juvenile justice system, which may include staffing used to provide direct services to youth, but may not be used for general court staff salaries.(4)(($6,000,000))$6,625,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act, chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection.(((4)))(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to use as matching funds to distribute to small municipal and county courts, located in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020, for the purpose of increasing security for court facilities. Grants must be used solely for security equipment and services for municipal, district, and superior courts and may not be used for staffing or administrative costs.(((5)))(6) $5,937,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a direct refund process to individuals to refund legal financial obligations, collection costs, and document-verified costs paid to third parties previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators must certify and send to the office the amount of any refund ordered by the court. The court order must either contain the amount of the refund or provide language for the clerk or court administrator to certify to the office the amount to be refunded to the individual.(((6)))(7) $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing or vacating convictions of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971. Such reports must include the refund amount related to each cause number;(b) In collaboration with the office of public defense and the office of civil legal aid, establish a process that can be used by individuals seeking a refund, provide individuals information regarding the application process necessary to claim a refund, and issue payments from the refund bureau to individuals certified in subsection (((5)))(6) of this section; and(c) Collaborate with counties and municipalities to adopt standard coding for application to State v. Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(((7)))(8) $7,563,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist counties and cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from their role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, to include cannabis and possession of paraphernalia, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties and cities for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a county or city. A county or city may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the county or city. The office must collaborate with counties and cities to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(((8)))(9) $4,188,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for decision-making assistance pursuant to chapter 267, Laws of 2024 (2SSB 5825). During the fiscal biennium, in conformity with RCW 2.72.030, the administrative office of the courts shall collect uniform and consistent data on decision making assistance to include, but not limited to: The number of requests for decision making assistance received from hospitals, the number of guardianships and less restrictive alternatives to guardianships provided, the support and housing provided, and any other data related to case monitoring and management.(((9)))(10) $242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearms purchase). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $520,000))(11) $1,040,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pilot self-help centers in two courthouses, one on each side of the state. Within the amount provided in this subsection, by December 31, 2026, the administrator for the courts shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on whether self-help centers should be expanded to additional counties or remain in the counties selected for the pilot project, or whether funding for the pilot project should be discontinued at the end of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(12) $249,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $133,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (court alternatives/youth). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((is))are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(14) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.(15) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts for data management and research related to conducting statewide research on the proportionality of court charges in Washington state based on race and ethnicity.(16) $440,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5868 (superior court judges). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2355 (domestic workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $188,000 of the judicial information systems accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6066 (crash prevention zones). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $11,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6070 (recovery of missing persons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5855 (law enf. face coverings) and Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6002 (driver privacy).Sec. 114. 2025 c 424 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($83,336,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,837,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($84,113,000))Â Â Â Â Â $87,547,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$40,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($19,056,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,054,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($186,505,000))Â Â Â Â Â $187,478,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services as authorized by chapter 10.101 RCW. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.(2) $2,632,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,812,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to administer contracts for appellate attorneys to cover a backlog of case assignments and increasing workload associated with indigent appeals. The office shall provide training for contracted attorneys.(3)(a) $8,615,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(i) Assist counties and cities with public defense services related to vacating the convictions of defendants and/or resentencing for defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision. The office of public defense will:(A) Provide statewide attorney training, technical assistance, data analysis and reporting, and quality oversight, to administer financial assistance for public defense costs related to State v. Blake impacts;(B) Maintain a triage team to provide statewide support to the management and flow of hearings for individuals impacted by the State v. Blake decision; and(C) Assist counties and cities in providing counsel for defendants seeking to vacate a conviction and/or be resentenced under State v. Blake. Assistance shall be allocated to counties and cities based upon a formula established by the office of public defense. Counties may receive assistance by applying for grant funding and/or designating the office of public defense to contract directly with counsel. The office of public defense shall contract directly with counsel to assist cities under this subsection; and(ii) Administer statutory duties under RCW 2.70.200 through the simple possession advocacy and representation program.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the office of public defense may utilize up to $5,000 for fiscal year 2026 and $5,000 for fiscal year 2027 to address emergency needs for clients served by the simple possession advocacy and representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available to address short term urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could cause clients to miss court dates or fail to engage in court-ordered services. The office of public defense shall establish eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by SPAR program contractors.(4) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to address emergency safety assistance and other urgent needs for clients served by the parents representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available for short-term housing, utilities, transportation, food assistance, and other urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could adversely impact dependency case outcomes and impede successful family reunification. The office of public defense shall utilize eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by parents representation program contractors.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the parents for parents program, as established by RCW 2.70.060 through 2.70.090. Funds must be used to maintain and improve the parents for parents service model, including host organizations and county coordinators.(6) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of public defense to contract with a nonprofit organization in eastern Washington providing peer-led reentry services such as peer coaching, basic needs, housing resources, behavioral health treatment, family support, civic engagement, and voting education. The organization must have a history of collaboration with the department of corrections to provide trainings on trauma to individuals reentering the community after incarceration. The organization shall provide comprehensive trainings, resources and referrals to individuals with a history of reentry from incarceration.(7) (($13,600,000))$12,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($13,600,000))$12,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to administer funds to counties and cities pursuant to formulas established in RCW 10.101.050 through 10.101.080.(8) $1,808,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 293, Laws of 2024 (2SSB 5780).(9) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 115. 2025 c 424 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AIDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($66,083,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,084,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($64,483,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,355,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,464,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($132,030,000))Â Â Â Â Â $136,903,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($8,611,000))$9,430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for children and youth in dependency cases under RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care. The amounts provided in this subsection incudes funding for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5761 (dependency/attorney appt.).(2) $2,579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the provision of civil legal information, advice, and representation for tenants at risk of eviction but not yet eligible for appointed counsel services under RCW 59.18.640.(3) $19,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($16,898,000))$19,898,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640. The office of civil legal aid shall assign priority to providing legal representation to indigent tenants in those counties in which the most evictions occur and to indigent tenants who are disproportionately at risk of eviction, as provided in RCW 59.18.640.(4) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are 60 years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.(5) $604,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to maintain a kinship care legal advice phone line and support program. The program provides guidance and legal advice to kinship caregivers on topics including kinship care, guardianship, the child welfare system, and issues related to child custody.(6) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.(7) $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,022,000))$1,272,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.(8) $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 328, Laws of 2024 (E2SSB 6109).(9) $783,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($783,000))$1,566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to establish a program for the provision of civil legal services to medicaid-eligible long-term care residents being discharged from a provider-owned setting.Sec. 116. 2025 c 424 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($23,479,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,752,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($23,590,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,478,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$634,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,215,000GOV Central Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($20,473,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,653,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$854,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($70,611,000))Â Â Â Â Â $71,586,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.(2) $20,473,000 of the GOV central service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity.(3) $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Within amounts provided in this subsection:(a) (($1,136,000))$1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,137,000))$1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for flexible funding to support children in crisis. Uses of the flexible funding include, but are not limited to:(i) Residential, housing, or wraparound supports that facilitate the safe discharge of children in crisis from hospitals;(ii) Support for families and caregivers to mitigate the risk of a child going into or returning to a state of crisis;(iii) Respite and relief services for families and caregivers that would assist in the safe discharge of a child in crisis from a hospital, or prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis; or(iv) Any support or service that would expedite a safe discharge of a child in crisis from an acute care hospital or that would prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis.(b) Flexible funding expenditures may not be used for administrative expenses.(c) The project director in Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program) must approve any expenditures of flexible funding.(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington state office of equity must cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum with the statewide broadband office.(5) $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab ombuds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $7,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5199 (DCYF oversight board comp.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(7)(a) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agricultural organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.(i) The independent entity must develop recommendations on furthering riparian funding and policy including, but not limited to, strategies that can attract private investment in improving riparian habitat and developing a regulatory or compensation strategy if voluntary programs do not achieve concrete targets.(ii) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by June 1, 2026, with a final report by November 15, 2026.(b) The amounts provided in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the task force to develop proposals to implement the recommendations submitted in (a) of this subsection. The independent entity must convene a group of interested members of the legislature to provide the task force with background information regarding the recommendations submitted to the legislature, and to support the development of the implementation proposals. A report outlining the implementation proposals is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2026.(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(8) $234,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2429 (youth behavioral health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the governor or the governor's staff designee shall, in alignment with the Washington thriving strategic plan developed under RCW 74.09.4951(6), convene a work group of representatives from the health care authority, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of social and health services, and the department of health to address the rise in the number of child welfare critical incidents. The work group shall:(i) Coordinate to identify all available substance use disorder treatment options for families receiving child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020 and child protective services as defined in RCW 26.44.020;(ii) Establish a process to make substance use disorder treatment options for families receiving child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020 and child protective services as defined in RCW 26.44.020 readily available to child welfare workers as defined in RCW 74.14B.010;(iii) Establish a process for child welfare workers as defined in RCW 74.14B.010 to identify the unmet treatment needs of families they are working with;(iv) Identify resources that would allow families receiving child welfare services and child protection services to obtain readily available access to:(A) Medication-assisted treatment;(B) Medications for opioid use disorder; and(C) Family-centered residential and intensive outpatient treatment; and(v) Identify policy or statutory barriers to substance use disorder treatment options for families receiving child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020 and child protective services as defined in RCW 26.44.020 and provide publicly available information regarding these barriers and possible solutions to overcome these barriers.(b) By December 1, 2026, the work group shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding its findings and any recommendations.(10) $430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of corrections ombuds to provide staffing for the construction training pathways oversight committee, established in RCW 43.06C.700.Sec. 117. 2025 c 424 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,356,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,471,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,416,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,544,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$90,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,862,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,105,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the lieutenant governor shall conduct a review of retail or commercial properties with substantial potential for redevelopment as residential or mixed-use properties providing market rate and affordable housing supply, and identify state or local legislative actions that would reduce costs and accelerate delivery of new housing supply. The office shall solicit letters of interest from the owners or developers of such properties to be received no later than September 1, 2025. By December 1, 2025, the office must review the letters of interest and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature identifying state or local legislative actions including, but not limited to, regulatory and tax incentives, permit streamlining, infrastructure assistance, support for local development agreements, or other actions that would accelerate delivery and reduce costs of new housing supply.Sec. 118. 2025 c 424 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($4,501,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,499,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($5,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,397,000Public Disclosure Transparency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,208,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,708,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,560,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,604,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.(2) $2,170,000 of the public disclosure transparency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the public disclosure commission for the purpose of improving the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitating accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community. The commission must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each year detailing information on the public disclosure transparency account. The report shall include, but is not limited to:(a) An investment plan of how funds would be used to improve the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitate accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community;(b) A list of active projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include a breakdown of expenditures by project and expense type for all current and ongoing projects;(c) A list of projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year and projects the commission would recommend for future funding. The commission must identify priorities, and develop accountability measures to ensure the projects meet intended purposes; and(d) Any other metric or measure the commission deems appropriate to track the outcome of the use of the funds.Sec. 119. 2025 c 424 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($33,025,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,186,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($40,763,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,258,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($8,822,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,816,000Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and AccessAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($12,854,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,890,000Charitable Organization Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,305,000Washington State Library Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,891,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,933,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($11,783,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,821,000Election AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,499,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,685,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,684,000Secretary of State's Revolving NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,697,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($129,627,000))Â Â Â Â Â $135,089,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($16,998,000))$2,498,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($21,450,000))$12,196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.(2) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.(3) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.(4) $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.(5) $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and)), $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,740,000 of the secretary of state's revolving account are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and triage and customer service to system users.(6) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.(7) $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office's migration of its applications and systems to Azure cloud environments, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(8) $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state library branch at Green Hill school.(9) $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for intrusion detection systems that prevent election security breaches.(10) $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for artifact preservation at Lakeland Village.(11) $237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5077 (agency voter registration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $2,226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Joint Resolution No. 8201 (investments/LTSS accounts). ((If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $189,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,259,000 of the Washington state library operations accountâstate appropriation, and $2,697,000 of the secretary of state's revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the activities and operations of the Washington state talking book and braille library.(14) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for humanities Washington's prime time family reading program. Funding must be focused on utilizing instructors, and securing additional books if needed, while collaborating with area libraries and schools to ensure the six-week programs address those students who have fallen behind in reading scores and require special, small-group attention to catch up.Sec. 120. 2025 c 424 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($852,000))Â Â Â Â Â $851,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($833,000))Â Â Â Â Â $836,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($506,000))Â Â Â Â Â $508,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,191,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,195,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.(2) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the office must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.Sec. 121. 2025 c 424 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($628,000))Â Â Â Â Â $629,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($619,000))Â Â Â Â Â $623,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,252,000Sec. 122. 2025 c 424 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERState Treasurer's Service AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($24,224,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,221,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($24,224,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,221,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:$250,000 of the state treasurer's service accountâstate appropriation is provided for the office to enhance local government access to infrastructure financing as provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.(1) The office shall analyze how public banking tools can be applied to leverage and extend existing legislative appropriations for infrastructure. This analysis must include, but need not be limited to, consideration of how revolving loan funds such as the public works assistance account, the clean water state revolving fund, and the drinking water state revolving fund, can be leveraged. Agencies that administer local government infrastructure funding, such as the public works board and the departments of commerce, ecology, and health, are encouraged to collaborate with the office in this analysis. Examples of public banking tools that the office may consider include tax-exempt and taxable revenue bonds, credit enhancements, certificates of participation, and local government investment pools.(2) The office must conduct outreach to local governments to identify any barriers they are facing in accessing current infrastructure financing programs and any additional administrative, governance, educational, or other tools that they identify as potentially helpful in accessing financing. The outreach should also identify any gaps in current funding programs for infrastructure that could be addressed to help local governments address their communities' infrastructure needs.(3) The office must provide an update with any recommendations to the relevant committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.Sec. 123. 2025 c 424 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE AUDITORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$723,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($737,000))Â Â Â Â Â $739,000Auditing Services Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($18,024,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,130,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($81,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,944,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($19,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,536,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,870,000 of the performance audit of government accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.(2) (($730,000))$663,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($730,000))$663,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for law enforcement audits pursuant to RCW 43.101.460 and 43.101.465.(3) $825,000 of the auditing services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.(4) It is the intent of the legislature that savings assumed in this section from an underspend in audit services be one-time in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(5) $1,000,000 of the performance audits of governments accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a review and performance audit of the commercial shellfish program. A preliminary report is due to the policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2027. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for completion of a final report. The state auditor shall work collaboratively with the department of health and the fiscal committees of the legislature on determining the parameters and scope of the performance review and audit.(6) $2,000,000 of the performance audits of government nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided to augment cybersecurity audits of state agencies and local governments with additional penetration testing through a security contractor.Sec. 124. 2025 c 424 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERALGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($40,286,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,003,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($34,616,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,821,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($29,506,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,496,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($104,000))Â Â Â Â Â $254,000Public Service Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($6,568,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,610,000New Motor Vehicle Arbitration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,934,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,945,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,735,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,731,000Child Rescue FundâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000Legal Services Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($435,096,000))Â Â Â Â Â $436,367,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,161,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,167,000Tobacco Prevention and Control AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($275,000))Â Â Â Â Â $276,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($558,481,000))Â Â Â Â Â $563,870,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.(4) $1,981,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,981,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.(5) $958,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $958,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound by confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. Youths are eligible for stipends and reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(6) $7,000,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year the following information for new cases initiated in the previous fiscal year to measure quantity and use of this funding:(a) The number and ((proportion of))percent of dependency and permanency cases ((where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases))in which ICWA applies as compared to those in which they do not apply; and(b) ((The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection))The amount of attorney and staff time spent on dependency and permanency cases in which ICWA applies compared to time spent on dependency and permanency cases in which ICWA does not apply.(7) $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to the defense of the state and its agencies in a federal environmental cleanup action involving the Quendall terminals superfund site.(8) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for personnel and associated costs to implement and maintain functional operations such as support, records management and disclosure, victim liaisons, and information technology for the clemency and pardons board.(9) $905,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $906,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 299, Laws of 2024 (hate crimes & bias incidents).(10)(a) $253,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general, jointly with the department of health, to operate a task force to provide recommendations to establish a comprehensive public health and community-based framework to combat extremism and mass violence.(b) The office of the attorney general must, in consultation with the department of health, appoint a minimum of 10 members to the task force representing different stakeholder groups including, but not limited to:(i) Community organizations working to address the impacts of or to assist those who are affected by extremism and mass violence;(ii) Law enforcement organizations that gather data about or work to combat extremism and mass violence; and(iii) Public health and nonprofit organizations that work to address the impacts of extremism and mass violence.(c) The office of the attorney general and the department of health may each have no more than one voting member on the task force.(d) The office of the attorney general must provide staff support for the task force.(e) Any reimbursement for nonlegislative members of the task force is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(f) The task force must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026. The final report must include legislative and policy recommendations for establishing the comprehensive framework.(g) No aspect of this subsection should be construed as a directive to alter any aspect of criminal law, create new criminal penalties, or increase criminal law enforcement.(11) $107,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $22,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $480,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(14) $34,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5501 (employee driving requirement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(15) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state office of the attorney general to support the continuation of the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force and truth and healing tribal advisory committee.(16) $553,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(18) $44,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(19) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $58,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1359 (criminal insanity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21)))(20) $545,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearms purchase). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22)))(21) $33,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1524 (isolated employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23)))(22) $294,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation and $40,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1514 (low carbon thermal energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24)))(23) $29,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family & medical leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25)))(24) $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1217 (residential tenants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26)))(25) $394,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1522 (utility wildfire mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27)))(26) $40,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minors). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28)))(27) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to coordinate the receipt of agency reporting requirements pursuant to sections 201, 210, 219, 221, 230, 233, and 601 of this act.(28) $31,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2355 (domestic workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(29) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2105 (immigrant workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $31,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2479 (unpaid wage recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(31) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1750 (voting rights act claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(32) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $31,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1710 (voting rights compliance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33) $89,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6302 (public works/finishing trade). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34) $193,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $22,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6002 (driver privacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 125. 2025 c 424 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,395,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,369,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,386,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$367,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,131,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,148,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $367,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to forecast the caseload for the Washington college grant program.(2) Within existing resources, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the council must forecast the number of people eligible for the apple health expansion for Washington residents with incomes at or below 138 percent of the federal poverty level, regardless of immigration status.Sec. 126. 2025 c 424 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEThe appropriations in sections 129 through 134 ((of this act)), chapter 424, Laws of 2025 and sections 127 through 132 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.(2) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of commerce in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose, except that provisoed amounts may be transferred among programs if they are transferred in their entirety.(b) Within 30 days after the close of fiscal year 2026, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for transfer authority in future budgets.(4) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.Sec. 127. 2025 c 424 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâCOMMUNITY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($72,053,000))Â Â Â Â Â $82,488,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($55,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $77,894,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($143,496,000))Â Â Â Â Â $150,490,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($5,396,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($25,005,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,005,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,439,000Community Reinvestment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$60,000,000Domestic Violence Co-Responder AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,326,000Domestic Violence Prevention AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,000,000Financial Fraud and Identity Theft CrimesInvestigation and Prosecution AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,680,000Lead Paint AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,690,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,694,000((Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$200,000))Prostitution Prevention and Intervention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$26,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($373,915,000))Â Â Â Â Â $441,067,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $9,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.(2) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.(3) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.(4) $797,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $797,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.(5) $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.(6) $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.(7) $1,332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.(8) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.(9) $8,618,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($8,618,000))$6,463,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for grants to support existing programs and capacity building for new programs providing evidence-based violence prevention and intervention services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate or be victims of firearm violence and who reside in areas with high rates of firearm violence as provided in RCW 43.330A.050.(i) Priority ((shall))may be given to programs that partner with the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences for training and support to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.(ii) The office may enter into agreement with the University of Washington or another independent entity with expertise in evaluating community-based grant-funded programs to evaluate the grant program's effectiveness.(iii) The office ((shall))may enter into agreement to provide funding to the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences to directly deliver trainings and support to programs providing culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger and to train a third-party organization to similarly support those programs.(iv) Of the amounts provided under (a) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for a certified credible messenger program that does work in at least three regions of Washington state to train and certify credible messengers to implement a culturally responsive, evidence-based credible messenger violence prevention and intervention services program.(b) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided to support safe storage programs and suicide prevention outreach and education efforts across the state.(10) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Federal Way-based nonprofit diaper bank.(11)(a) (($25,000,000))$55,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grant funding through the existing ((network))providers of federal low-income home energy assistance program grantees to provide low-income households with energy utility bill assistance.(b) To qualify for assistance, a household must be below 80 percent of the area median income and living in a community that experiences high environmental health disparities.(c) Under the grant program, each household accessing energy bill assistance must be offered an energy ((assessment))questionnaire that includes determining the household's need for clean cooling and heating system upgrades that improve safety and efficiency while meeting Washington's climate goals. If beneficial, households may be offered grant funding to cover the replacement of inefficient, outdated, or unsafe home heating and cooling systems with more energy efficient electric heating and cooling technologies, such as heat pumps.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no more than 60 percent of the funding may be utilized by the department to target services to multifamily residential buildings across the state that experience high energy use, where a majority of the residents within the building are below 80 percent of the area median income and the community experiences high environmental health disparities.(e) Of the amounts provided under (a) of this subsection, $5,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided for members of tribes or tribal organizations.(f) In serving low-income households who rent or lease a residence, the department must establish processes to ensure that the rent for the residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted as a result of receiving assistance under the grant program.(((f)))(g) The department must incorporate data collected while implementing this program into future energy assistance reports as required under RCW 19.405.120. The department may publish information on its website on the number of furnace or heating and cooling system replacements, including replacements within multifamily housing units.(((g)))(h) The department may utilize a portion of the funding provided within this subsection to create an electronic application system.(12) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the developmental disabilities council.(13) $20,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is)), $19,355,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,000,000 of the domestic violence prevention accountâstate appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to crime victims service providers. The department must distribute the funding in a manner that is consistent with the office of crime victims advocacy's state plan. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is for grants for crime victim advocacy services for victims of crimes perpetrated by juvenile offenders.(b) $1,000,000 of the domestic violence prevention accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation are for services for victims of domestic violence.(14) The department may submit the report required under section 1115(50)(b) of this act by October 1, 2025.(15) The department may submit the report required under section 1115(124)(d) of this act by October 1, 2025.(((17)))(16) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to nonprofit organizations including, but not limited to, religious nonprofits, "by and for" organizations, or cultural community centers, to fund the physical security or repair of such institutions. Grant recipients must substantiate that their site or sites have been subject to or at risk of physical attacks, threats, vandalism, or damages based on their mission, ideology, or beliefs and demonstrate a need for investments in physical security enhancements, construction or renovation, target hardening, preparedness planning, training, or exercises.(((20)))(17) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit community-based organization to provide youth mental and behavioral health education and support services. Services may include, but are not limited to, employment, mental health, counseling, tutoring, and mentoring. The grant recipient must be a community-based organization located in Granger operating a Spanish language public radio station with the mission of addressing the social, educational, and health needs of Spanish-speaking residents of central and eastern Washington.(((21)))(18) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma that provides social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and in overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development. Grant funding may be used for activities including, but not limited to, providing family support services for bilingual, bicultural clients.(((22)))(19) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide legal aid in subjects including, but not limited to, criminal law and civil rights cases for underserved populations focusing on Black gender-diverse communities. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with offices in Seattle and Tacoma and with a mission to provide intersectional legal and social services for Black intersex and gender-diverse communities in Washington.(((23)))(20) $60,000,000 of the community reinvestment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute grants for economic development, civil and criminal legal assistance, community-based violence intervention and prevention services, and reentry services programs, and to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2523 (community reinvestment prg.). In making distributions under this subsection, the department must award funds among these program areas in similar proportions to awards made during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for these purposes.(((24)))(21) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to support the development of and outreach for community-led mental health support groups and classes serving individuals and families throughout Washington state, with special focus on Latino communities, rural areas, and tribes. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that serves as the Washington state office of a national grassroots mental health organization dedicated to building better lives for individuals affected by mental health conditions.(((25)))(22) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs, to contract with a qualified research entity to conduct the Charles Mitchell and George Washington Bush study on reparative action for Washington state's descendants of victims of United States chattel slavery.(a) The department shall verify and contract, in consultation with the commission on African American affairs, that the contracted research entity or research team possesses expertise in reparations, historical analysis, public policy development, and must have the following:(i) A researcher who possesses a Ph.D. or equivalent advanced degree in history, African American studies, sociology, American studies, ethnic studies, law, economics, public policy, or a related field with a direct focus on reparations or United States chattel slavery;(ii) Verifiable expertise in writing peer-reviewed academic studies, publications, or policy reports related to reparations, historical analysis, public policy development, or economic valuation for direct descendants of United States chattel slavery victims;(iii) Expertise in calculating the present value of uncompensated slave labor for direct victims of United States chattel slavery;(iv) Substantial knowledge of the history and doctrine of United States chattel slavery reparations and the ability to develop a process requiring Washington residents seeking reparations to demonstrate direct descent from individuals enslaved in the United States between 1776 and 1865;(v) Demonstrated commitment to reviewing and recommending reparations public policy;(vi) Professional expertise in the field of reparative justice;(vii) A composition that, to the greatest extent possible, reflects the diversity of individuals with direct lived experience related to the subject matter of the study; and(viii) An experienced genealogist on their research team.(b) The department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs shall commission and oversee the Charles Mitchell and George Washington Bush study on reparative action for Washington state's descendants of victims of United States chattel slavery, which shall examine the historical injustices of United States chattel slavery and their enduring impact on direct descendants, particularly as they relate to Washington state laws and policies. The study must include, but is not limited to the following:(i) Identification, compilation, and synthesization of historical records concerning the institution of United States chattel slavery (1619â1865), including its vestiges within the laws and economic and social practices of Oregon and Washington territories (1848â1889) against freed persons and their direct descendants;(ii) An assessment of Washington territory and the state of Washington's historical and present role in perpetuating discriminatory practices through laws, policies, and economic structures against direct descendants of the victims of United States chattel slavery, particularly in economic opportunity, education, and criminal justice;(iii) Appropriate reparative remedies based on study findings, including, but not limited to:(A) Identified highlights for contributions to federal discussions on reparations, including proposed frameworks for calculating and awarding reparations at the national level;(B) The identification of existing Washington state laws and policies that continue to disproportionately harm direct descendants of United States enslaved persons and recommendations for their reform or repeal;(C) Proposed methods for calculating, structuring, and awarding compensation, including both direct cash payments and alternative measures such as enacting appropriate recommended state-level investments in educational access, economic opportunity, and criminal justice reforms; and(D) A cost-benefit analysis for Washington state on the impact of enacting appropriate, recommended reparative investments in education, economic opportunity, and criminal justice for the direct descendants of United States chattel slavery victims; and(iv) Utilization of the social determinants of health framework, as outlined by the healthy people 2030 initiative under the United States department of health and human services, to assess economic, educational, and social disparities with the goal of informing Washington state-level policy recommendations.(c) The department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs, shall transmit the selected research entity or research team's following reports:(i) A preliminary report to the legislature by June 30, 2026, detailing researcher qualifications, study scope, methodology, and an outline plan for continued community engagement plan throughout the study;(ii) An interim report by December 31, 2026, providing updates on the study's progress and any initial findings; and(iii) A final report by June 30, 2027, presenting findings and recommendations to the legislature, the governor, and Washington state's federal delegation.(d) The department may receive and utilize gifts, grants, or endowments from public, private, or philanthropic sources for the sole purpose of the study.(((26)))(23) $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 462, Laws of 2023 (domestic violence).(((27) $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the existing structure tax incentive program.))(24) $2,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a contract with a public or private entity for the purpose of public safety and security activities related to the 2026 world cup event. Funding may be provided for law enforcement and fire department resources, emergency management, traffic control, and security at official event venues, including fields and fan activation areas.(((29)))(25) $1,426,000 of the lead paint accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5494 (lead-based paint). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33)))(26) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a King county-based nonprofit that exclusively serves foreign-trained physicians to help foreign-trained physicians prepare for work in a United States clinical setting. Funds may be used to operate an educational outreach program to help medical providers and institutions understand the medical doctor: clinical experience program and for stipends for foreign-trained physicians to take medical exams and for other professional development.(((38) $8,326,000))(27) $2,326,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1498 (domestic viol. co-responders). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(28) $5,000,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for programs to address domestic violence, including services for victims and perpetrators of domestic violence. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $4,000,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is for grants to county prosecutor offices for victim and witness advocates and related services. The office of crime victims advocacy must, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, distribute funds in a manner that prioritizes counties most adversely impacted by the relative reductions in funding attributable to chapter 449, Laws of 2023 (ESHB 1169). The office must distribute funds as expeditiously as possible.(b) $350,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is to continue research in Washington state on the use of internal family systems as a modality for domestic violence intervention treatment. The department must contract with a health care system affiliated with a university that has received state funding to conduct research in Washington state on the use of internal family systems as a modality for domestic violence intervention treatment.(c) $400,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is for a contract with a research university to continue a randomized control trial comparing the strength at home program to standard domestic violence intervention treatment methods used in Washington state. The research university must have completed a randomized control trial of domestic violence intervention treatment at joint base Lewis-McChord.(d) $250,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is for the department, in consultation with the health care authority, to contract with one or more training entities for the development of three separate courses of instruction related to the provision of peer support services to persons who have experienced domestic violence, sexual assault, or human trafficking. The department shall collaborate with people with lived and living experience in the development of the courses. The courses must supplement the instruction received by certified peer support specialists and incorporate competencies that are typically taught in training programs for victim advocates, including safety planning; a foundational understanding of domestic violence, sexual assault, or human trafficking, as applicable; and advocacy across legal, medical, social services, and other systems.(e) Any funds not expended under (a) through (d) of this subsection may be used for the domestic violence co-responder grant program established in RCW 43.280.135.(29)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a contract with a statewide organization with a mission of developing new and innovative ways to combat organized retail crime to implement a program to respond to organized retail crime, with a focus on diversion-oriented programs.(b) The contract recipient must establish three program sites. The contract recipient must make a reasonable effort to establish at least one site east of the Cascade mountains. No single site may use more than $300,000 of the funding provided under this subsection.(c) The contract recipient must use the funds to coordinate community efforts to enhance responses to organized retail crime within each site area. Coordination must include the following entities: Cities, counties, or affiliated associations with programs focused on diversion and restitution; local retail stores; law enforcement agencies; local prosecutors and public defense; and therapeutic courts. Funding may also be used for planning and other activities to achieve a targeted response to reported retail crimes from diversion programs or law enforcement agencies.(d) The contract recipient must provide a report to the department by June 15, 2027, on the number of responses to retail crime and the number of diversions initiated for each site, data regarding the role of local prosecutors at each site, and opportunities and challenges in retail crime response and diversion identified by program participants. The department must submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.(30) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the office of the governor and the department of health, to support access to protected health care services, as defined in chapter 7.115 RCW, that are at risk of disruption.(31) $275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.Sec. 128. 2025 c 424 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâHOUSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($309,054,000))Â Â Â Â Â $299,770,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($304,114,000))Â Â Â Â Â $289,443,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($65,412,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,529,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,832,000Home Security Fund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($248,615,000))Â Â Â Â Â $248,705,000Affordable Housing for All AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($91,728,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,835,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,448,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,042,000Apple Health and Homes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,496,000Covenant Homeownership AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($11,295,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,408,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,240,162,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,245,060,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.(3) $11,252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for housing assistance, including long-term rental subsidies, permanent supportive housing, and low- and no-barrier housing beds, for unhoused individuals. Priority must be given to individuals with a mental health disorder, substance use disorder, or other complex conditions; individuals with a criminal history; and individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails.(4)(a) $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects serving individuals and families that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fundâstate account or other public capital funding that:(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income; and(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(d) If Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6027 (affordable housing funding) is enacted by June 30, 2026, grants awarded beginning July 1, 2026, must be administered in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of the bill.(e) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide staff support for the permanent supportive housing operations, maintenance, and services forecast. The department must develop a model to estimate demand for operating, maintenance, and services costs for permanent supportive housing units that qualify for grant funding under (a) of this subsection. The model shall incorporate factors including the number of qualifying units currently in operation; the number of new qualifying units assumed to come online since the previous forecast and the timing of when those units will become operational; the impacts of enacted or proposed investments in the capital budget on the number of new potentially qualifying units; the number of units supported through a grant awarded under (a) of this subsection; the historical actual per unit average grant awards under (a) of this subsection; reported data from housing providers on actual costs for operations, maintenance, and services; and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the demand for maintenance, operations, and services for qualifying permanent supportive housing units. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The forecast must be updated each February and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on actual awards made under (a) of this subsection and the completed construction of new qualifying units.(5) $7,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.(6) $3,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.(7) $1,913,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,912,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit ((an annual))a biennial report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The report is due ((annually on June 30th))every even year on October 31st. The report shall include but is not limited to:(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.(8)(a) $68,550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $68,550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services.(b) The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106), chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (addressing the immediate housing needs of low or extremely low-income elderly or disabled adults in certain counties who receive social security disability or retirement income).(c) The department must ensure the timely redistribution of the funding provided in this subsection among entities or counties to reflect actual caseload changes as required under RCW 43.185C.220(5)(c).(d) The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to provide housing supports for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility.(9) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection((:(a) $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.(b))), $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.(10) $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing program for nondependent homeless youth.(11)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to administer flexible funding to serve eligible youth and young adults. The flexible funding administered under this subsection may be used for the immediate needs of eligible youth or young adults. An eligible youth or young adult may receive support under this subsection more than once.(b) Flexible funding provided under this subsection may be used for purposes including but not limited to:(i) Car repair or other transportation assistance;(ii) Rental application fees, a security deposit, or short-term rental assistance;(iii) Offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits;(iv) Transportation costs to go to work;(v) Assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates; and(vi) Other uses that will support the eligible youth or young adult's housing stability, education, or employment, or meet immediate basic needs.(c) The flexible funding provided under this subsection may be provided to:(i) Eligible youth and young adults. For the purposes of this subsection, an eligible youth or young adult is a person under age 25 who is experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness, including but not limited to those who are unsheltered, doubled up or in unsafe living situations, exiting inpatient programs, or in school;(ii) Community-based providers assisting eligible youth or young adults in attaining safe and stable housing; and(iii) Individuals or entities, including landlords, providing safe housing or other support designed to lead to housing for eligible youth or young adults.(12) $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.(13) $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.(14) $55,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $55,500,000)), $31,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $24,000,000 of the Washington housing trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue grant funding for emergency housing and shelter capacity and associated supports such as street outreach, diversion services, short-term rental assistance, hotel and motel vouchers, housing search and placement, and housing stability case management. Entities eligible for grant funding include local governments and nonprofit entities. The department may use existing programs, such as the consolidated homelessness grant program, to award funding under this subsection. Grants provided under this subsection must be used to maintain or increase current emergency housing capacity, funded by the shelter program grant and other programs, as practicable due to increased costs of goods, services, and wages. Emergency housing includes transitional housing, congregate or noncongregate shelter, sanctioned encampments, or short-term hotel or motel stays.(15)(a) $45,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing in encampments to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on ensuring individuals living unsheltered reach permanent housing solutions. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. The department may provide funding to state agencies to ensure individuals accessing housing services are also able to access other wrap-around services that enable them to obtain housing such as food, personal identification, and other related services. Local government and nonprofit grant recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, case management, transportation, site monitoring, and other services needed to assist individuals residing in encampments and on public rights-of-way with moving into housing.(b) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on ensuring an expeditious path to or remaining in sustainable permanent housing solutions, and that demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals to identify their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services through the effective use of outreach, engagement, and temporary lodging and permanent housing placement.(c) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish updates on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 90 days, while taking steps to protect the privacy of individuals served by the program. At a minimum, outcomes must include:(i) The number of people actually living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(ii) The demographics of those living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(iii) The duration of engagement with individuals living within encampments;(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;(vi) Any reasons given for why individuals declined offered housing;(vii) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;(viii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and(ix) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing every six months after placement.(d) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from encampments or close encampments unless they have provided extensive outreach and offered each individual temporary lodging or permanent housing that matches the actual situation and needs of each person, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability. Grant recipients who initially match an individual to temporary lodging must make efforts to transition the person to a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are private, sanitary, healthy, and dignified, and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.(e) Funding granted to eligible recipients under (a) of this subsection may not be used to supplant or replace existing funding provided for housing or homeless services.(16) $200,000,000 of the covenant homeownership accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the covenant homeownership program.(17) Before awarding or entering into grants or contracts for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for homeless housing and service programs that are funded from the home security fund account or the affordable housing for all account, the department must first consult with local governments and eligible grantees to ensure that funding from these accounts is used to maintain the quantity and types of homeless housing and services funded in local communities as of February 28, 2025. The department may take into consideration local document recording fee balances and individual county fluctuations in recording fee collections when allocating state funds. The department must redeploy funds to other nonprofit and county grantees if originally granted amounts are not expended or committed within a reasonable timeline. The department may then provide funding to eligible entities to undertake the activities described in RCW 36.22.250(4)(b), such as funding for project-based vouchers and other assistance necessary to support permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 or as administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181.(18) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of existing contracts with a nonprofit organization to increase housing supply and equitable housing outcomes by advancing affordable housing options, including affordable homeownership or affordable rental housing, supportive housing, transitional housing, shelter, or housing funded through the apple health and homes program, that are co-located with community services such as education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land. Contract funding may be used for costs including, but not limited to, identifying properties and implementing strategies to accelerate the development of affordable housing, conducting affordable housing site predevelopment activities, providing technical assistance on topics related to affordable housing development, facilitating collaboration and codevelopment between affordable housing and community partners, and conducting community engagement activities.(19) $58,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $58,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to counties, cities, and other entities receiving contracts pursuant to RCW 43.185C.080(3) for homeless housing programs and services including, but not limited to, emergency housing and shelter, temporary housing, permanent supportive housing programs, and other homeless housing services and initiatives, including those funded through the document recording fee collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.250. Grant funds must be prioritized for maintaining existing levels of service and preventing the closure of existing beds or programs.(20) Within existing resources, the department must review current policies and practices regarding reimbursement documentation requirements for grant and contract recipients, with a focus on requirements for grants made under subsection (4) of this section and RCW 36.22.250(5), to improve the efficiency of the reimbursement process and streamline compliance processes for grants and contract recipients while continuing to manage risks related to financial controls and federal requirements. In reviewing policies and practices, the department may consider implementing process changes and other approaches, including but not limited to risk-based tiering of requirements for grant and contract recipients.(21) Within existing resources, the department must consult with permanent supportive housing providers awarded grants under subsection (4) of this section or RCW 36.22.250(5) to provide awardees the opportunity to provide feedback and develop recommendations on topics including, but not limited to, allowable expenditures under these grant programs, statewide application benchmarks for operations and maintenance costs per unit and services costs per tenant, and opportunities to streamline grant administration.(22) $229,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $229,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the mobile home community sales program.(23) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5298 (mobile home community sale). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(24) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (affordable housing dev.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(25) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Pierce county-based nonprofit with emergency shelters in Pierce, King, Thurston, and Kitsap counties which provides a comprehensive approach to addressing the root causes of homelessness to sustain emergency shelters.(26) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a south King county-based nonprofit family center for families experiencing homelessness to maintain services, including emergency shelter beds.(27) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a King county-based nonprofit organization that runs at least two emergency shelters with at least 500 beds to help families stay housed while researchers study the effects of direct rental assistance on families.(((29)))(28) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 408, Laws of 2023 (ESSB 5599). The entirety of this amount is provided for the office of homeless youth for prevention and protection programs to provide supportive care grants to organizations to address the needs of youth seeking protected health care services.(((30)))(29) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1217 (residential tenants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(30) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support the task force on the establishment of a department of housing, which may include conducting research and consulting experts, facilitating task force convenings, and preparing the report and recommendations. The department may contract with a third party to complete this work.(31)(a) $15,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for grants to permanent supportive housing providers for operations, maintenance, and services costs.(b) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a permanent supportive housing provider must:(i) Verify that they received a funding award for a permanent supportive housing project through the United States department of housing and urban development continuum of care grant program for federal fiscal year 2024;(ii) Verify that they have received either a lesser award or no award for a permanent supportive housing project through the continuum of care grant program for federal fiscal year 2025;(iii) Demonstrate the level of financial support necessary to maintain the same level of operations, maintenance, and services for the permanent supportive housing project as was funded through their federal fiscal year 2024 award; and(iv) Provide a letter of support from the provider's local continuum of care lead entity certifying the expiration date of the previous federal continuum of care contract for the permanent supportive housing project.(c) When allocating grants under this subsection, the department must prioritize projects that have received funding from the Washington housing trust fund, local low-income housing capital investment programs, or the federal low-income housing tax credit program.(d) When determining the amount to be awarded to a given project, the department may incorporate inflationary increases in addition to the project's actual award for federal fiscal year 2024.(e) The department must accept applications on a rolling basis throughout fiscal year 2027 or until all funds have been awarded.(f) The department must notify the local continuum of care lead entity of a project upon making a grant award.(32) $94,000 of the affordable housing for all accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6027 (affordable housing funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 129. 2025 c 424 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâLOCAL GOVERNMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($30,488,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,670,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($27,669,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,523,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($55,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,665,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,137,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,170,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($22,589,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,079,000Community Preservation and Development AuthorityAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,016,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,775,000Growth Management Planning and Environmental ReviewFundâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,681,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,829,000Liquor Excise Tax AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,402,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($6,850,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,851,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,136,000Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,596,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,621,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,030,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,277,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($167,259,000))Â Â Â Â Â $156,098,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.(2) $6,827,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.(3) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.(4) $1,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.(5) $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($9,000,000))$6,088,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (emergency shelters & housing) and to implement chapter 368, Laws of 2023 (land use permitting/local).(b) ((Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.(c) Up to $500,000 per biennium may be allocated toward growth management policy research and development or to assess the ongoing effectiveness of existing growth management policy.(d) The department must develop a process for consulting with local governments, affected stakeholders, and the appropriate committees of the legislature to establish emphasis areas for competitive grant distribution and for research priorities.(e))) $149,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection for fiscal year 2026 is for the department to develop recommendations for the integration of special purpose districts into the state's growth management planning framework. The department must provide a final report with recommendations to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must publish on its website housing data needed to complete housing needs assessments required by RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a). The data shall include:(a) Housing profiles for each county and city in the state, including cost burden, vacancy, and income;(b) Data to assess racially disparate impacts, exclusion, and displacement; and(c) A dashboard to display data in an easily accessible format.(7) $847,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $847,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to increase middle housing.(8) $22,544,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for local government climate planning implementation.(9) $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the noise abatement program for qualifying port districts.(10) (($2,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a contract with a public or private entity for the purpose of public safety and security activities related to the 2026 world cup event. Funding may be provided for law enforcement and fire department resources, emergency management, traffic control, and security at official event venues, including fields and fan activation areas.(13))) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.(((14) $500,000))(11) $2,875,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Central district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.070 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(((15) $500,000))(12) $2,875,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(((17) $1,809,000))(13) $1,729,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,008,000))$2,965,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1096 (lot splitting), Second Substitute House Bill No. 1183 (building codes), Third Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (transit-oriented housing dev), Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5148 (GMA housing element), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5184 (minimum parking requirements), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5471 (middle housing), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5509 (child care center siting), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5559 (UGA subdivision process), and Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (affordable housing dev).(14) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to administer grants to local governments to update their permit review processes.(15) $490,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to assist local governments to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state.(16) $202,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to adopt guidelines for measures and criteria for use by counties and cities in the implementation progress reports required by chapter 192, Laws of 2022.(17) $131,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6026 (residential development/zones). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the existing structure tax incentive program.(19) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6309 (high cap. transit permits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6355 (electric transmission system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to engage with the department of archaeology and historic preservation in the development of a model ordinance for archaeological and cultural resource protection.(22) $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2418 (permit review). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1960 (renewable energy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24)(a) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to conduct a study regarding financial incentives to reduce the financial burden associated with the seismic retrofit of unreinforced masonry buildings.(b) The study must, at a minimum, include impact analysis and policy recommendations for:(i) The modification and expansion of the special valuation tax;(ii) The expansion of current use taxation;(iii) Opportunities for time-limited exemptions under state property tax, excise tax, sales tax, business and occupation tax, or other tax structures;(iv) The use of valuation of special assessments and assessment zones; and(v) The identification of financial incentives for tax-exempt entities, such as schools, nonprofits, and religious organizations.(c) The department must request input from the state association of county assessors, a professional society representing architects in Washington, a nonprofit organization representing structural engineers in Washington, the department of revenue, and the joint legislative audit and review committee.(d) The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.Sec. 130. 2025 c 424 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâOFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($15,018,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,919,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($15,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,800,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($8,153,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,191,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,269,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,282,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .(($3,706,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,709,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($3,831,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,813,000Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund MatchTransfer AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($22,220,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$951,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$765,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$567,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,851,000Statewide Tourism Marketing AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,021,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($77,307,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,869,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($4,152,000))$4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for associate development organizations. ((During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department may distribute the funding as follows:(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $50,000.))(2) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.(3)(a) $1,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program, for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington, and for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate with the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided to address the impact of tariffs on Washington jobs and exports, which may include diversification of trade partnerships, enhancing sector innovation and supply chain resilience, and supporting the recruitment and retention of trade driven enterprises. The department must provide a progress report to the legislature and the governor on its activities under this subsection (3)(b) by November 1, 2026.(4) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.(5) $1,219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; (g) military and defense; and (h) creative industries. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.(6) (($22,220,000))$10,000,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.(8) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,000,000))$700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.(9) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.(((11)))(10) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the city of Seattle to lease space for nonprofit and academic institutions to incubate technology business startups, especially those focusing on artificial intelligence and develop and teach curricula to skill up workers to use artificial intelligence as a business resource.(((12)))(11) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonregulatory coalition located in Seattle that supports the strategic development and activation of Washington state's participation in the West Coast wide-floating offshore wind supply chain through a collaborative approach. The department and nonregulatory coalition shall identify economic, community, and workforce development opportunities resulting from Washington state's participation in the offshore wind supply chain through conducting convenings, workshops, and studies as appropriate.(((13)))(12) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the department to administer a grant program to cannabis licensees holding a license issued after July 1, 2024, who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335. The department must award grants primarily based on the strength of the social equity plans submitted by cannabis licensees but may also consider additional criteria if deemed necessary or appropriate by the department. Technical assistance activities eligible for funding include, but are not limited to:(a) Assistance navigating the cannabis licensure process;(b) Cannabis-business specific education and business plan development;(c) Regulatory compliance training;(d) Financial management training and assistance in seeking financing;(e) Strengthening a social equity plan as defined in RCW 69.50.101; and(f) Connecting social equity applicants with established industry members and tribal cannabis enterprises and programs for mentoring and other forms of support.(13)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to develop a statewide economic development and competitiveness strategic plan.(b) At a minimum, the plan shall include the following:(i) Goals and strategies for state-supported economic development activities in the state, utilizing analysis of economic and industry data;(ii) A state economic profile, examining such factors as demographics, workforce characteristics, industry landscape, and regional and tribal economics, infrastructure, and assets;(iii) Economic challenges and opportunities;(iv) Updates on the small business resiliency program and other programs addressing the overall needs of businesses;(v) Equity and community wealth building efforts;(vi) Metrics for measuring outcomes; and(vii) An implementation plan.(c) The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the completed plan by June 30, 2027.Sec. 131. 2025 c 424 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâENERGY AND INNOVATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($3,601,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,949,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,949,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($39,799,000))Â Â Â Â Â $115,636,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($106,000))Â Â Â Â Â $133,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($54,112,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,729,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$160,000Energy Efficiency AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000Low-Income Weatherization and StructuralRehabilitation Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,416,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,423,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($166,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,000Sustainable Aviation Fuel AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$556,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($102,921,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,665,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.(2) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to build a mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and information on charging and refueling infrastructure as required in chapter 300, Laws of 2021 (zero emissions transp.). The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources) when developing the tool and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(3) (($5,000,000))(a) $4,510,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to support port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations, and tribes to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state. Eligible uses of grant funding provided in this section include supporting predevelopment work for sites intended for clean energy projects, land use studies, conducting or engaging in planning efforts such as planned actions and programmatic environmental impact statements, and staff to improve permit timeliness and certainty.(b) In carrying out the provisions of this subsection, the department must prioritize grants in jurisdictions where transmission constraints or rapid load growth threaten reliability and timely achievement of statewide clean energy transformation act requirements and greenhouse gas targets. The department should use information to which it has access to make this determination.(4)(a) (($500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026))$800,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with ((one or more of the western national laboratories, or a similar independent research organization, in consultation with state and federal energy agencies, stakeholders, and relevant utilities,))an entity or firm with necessary expertise to conduct an analysis for new electricity generation, transmission, ancillary services, efficiency and storage sufficient to offset those ((presently)) provided by the lower Snake river dams. The analysis should include a list of requirements for a replacement portfolio that diversifies and improves the resilience and maintains the reliability and adequacy of the electric power system, is consistent with the state's statutory and regulatory requirements for clean electricity generation, and is ((supplementary to the resources))optimized into regional resource needs that will be required to replace fossil fuels in the electrical generation, transportation, industry, and buildings sectors. Consistent with Washington executive order 24-06, the analysis should also be responsive to and consistent with the objectives of the Columbia basin restoration initiative (CBRI). The department and its contractor's assessment will include quantitative analysis based on available data as well as qualitative input gathered from impacted tribal and other governments, the Northwest power and conservation council, relevant utilities, and other key stakeholders. The analysis ((must include))should consider the following:(i) Expected trends for demand, and distinct scenarios that examine potential outcomes for electricity demand, generation, and storage technologies development((, land use and land use constraints)), and cost through 2050, as well as ((the most))relevant recent ((analysis))analyses of future resource adequacy and reliability, including the range of energy needs, resources available during the next 20 years, new resources that need to be developed, and adequacy and reliability analysis;(ii) A resource portfolio approach in which a combination of ((commercially available)) generating resources, energy efficiency, conservation, and demand response programs, transmission resources, and other programs and resources that ((would be necessary prerequisites))are commercially available at the time when they are needed to replace the power and grid reliability services otherwise provided by the lower Snake river dams and the time frame needed to put those resources into operation;(iii) ((Identification of generation and transmission siting options consistent with the overall replacement resource portfolio, in coordination with other state processes and requirements supporting the planning of clean energy and transmission siting;(iv) An evaluation of alternatives for the development, ownership and operation of the replacement resource portfolio;(v))) Examination of possible impacts and opportunities that might result from the renewal of the Columbia river treaty, revisions of the Bonneville power administration preference contracts, implementation of the western resource adequacy program (WRAP), expansion of the western day ahead power markets, and other changes in operation and governance of the regional electric power system, consistent with statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;(((vi) Identification of revenue and payment structures sufficient to maintain reliable and affordable electricity supplies for ratepayers, with emphasis on overburdened communities;(vii)))(iv) Development of distinct scenarios that examine different potential cost and timeline potentials for development and implementation of identified generation, storage, and transmission needs ((and options including planning, permitting, design, and construction, including relevant federal authorities,)) consistent with the statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act; and(((viii)))(v) Quantification of impacts to greenhouse gas emissions including life-cycle emissions analysis associated with implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including (((A) planning, permitting, design, and construction, and, if relevant,)) emissions associated with the acquisition of non-Washington state domestic or foreign sources of electricity, ((and (B))) any additional operations of existing fossil-fueled generating resources((; and(ix) An inventory of electricity demand by state-owned or operated facilities and information needed to complete a request for proposals (RFP) to satisfy this demand through new nonhydro renewable energy generation and/or conservation)), and the impact of forecasted new load growth on greenhouse gas emissions.(b) The department shall, to the extent determined practicable, consider related analyses ((undertaken by the federal government as part of the Columbia river system operation stay of litigation agreed to in National Wildlife Federation et al. v. National Marine Fisheries Service et al. in October 2021))completed by the Pacific Northwest national laboratory on the lower Snake river dams contribution to grid services. The department shall also, to the extent determined practicable, rely on methods, models, and data consistent with those developed and relied upon by the Northwest power and conservation council as part of its most recent power plan.(c) The department shall provide ((a status update))the final report to the energy and environment committees of the legislature and governor's office by June 30, ((2026))2027.(5) (($13,088,000))$11,452,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist owners of public buildings in covering the costs of conducting an investment grade energy audit for those buildings. Public buildings include those owned by state and local governments, tribes, and school districts.(6) $1,078,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop plans to test hydrogen combustion and resulting nitrogen oxides (NOx) emissions, technical assistance for strategic end uses of hydrogen, a feasibility assessment regarding underground storage of hydrogen in Washington, and an environmental justice toolkit for hydrogen projects.(7) $1,678,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 344, Laws of 2024 (public building materials), including to develop and maintain a publicly accessible database for covered projects to submit environmental and working conditions data, to convene a technical work group, and to develop legislative reports.(8) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department for activities that engage tribes or overburdened communities when siting renewable energy generation or electrical transmission facilities in Washington state. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for engagement of a tribal collaborative and participating tribes to identify areas with higher and lower potential for avoiding conflicts with tribes when siting renewable energy generation and electrical transmission facilities. The effort must consider tribal renewable energy and transmission needs, tribal sovereignty and rights, sensitive natural areas and working lands, and the goal to minimize harm while maximizing benefits to tribal communities. The department may contract for this purpose.(b) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to engage with communities to create a framework and process to support early and ongoing overburdened community input for the planning and development of transmission corridors. This shall, to the extent feasible, include identifying ways for overburdened communities to benefit from transmission corridor development as well as ways to reduce and avoid conflict with overburdened communities in the development of transmission corridors. Engagement activities may be coordinated with the tribal collaborative described in section 133 of this act and other relevant community engagement activities within the department.(9)(a) $200,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to continue the Washington just and rapid transition climate tech program. The grant will provide funding for the recruitment, development, business training, and support of underserved climate technology innovators, entrepreneurs, and organizations developing or deploying solutions in the areas of renewable energy, energy efficiency, sustainable transportation, and other technology solving for the environmental challenges facing overburdened communities in Washington.(b) Activities may include supporting entrepreneurs in preparing for private investment; technical assistance for entrepreneurs receiving state directed federal equity and debt capital; assistance accessing or leveraging the use of federal funding; business coaching and mentoring; and connections to technical and business resources.(c) The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that has been awarded, from the state of Washington, federal state small business credit initiative funds for investment in Washington climate tech entrepreneurs, and must also have experience managing investment funding and providing entrepreneurial support programs and federal funding assistance to early-stage climate start-ups and businesses based in Washington. The grant recipient should have experience providing services to individuals and companies led by individuals from underrepresented groups, including BIPOC, women, and individuals residing in rural communities and have working partnerships with state research universities, climate technology industry associations, and community-based organizations serving underserved communities.(10) $300,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide assistance and develop financing recommendations to increase transmission capacity in Washington. The department must use the funding provided in this subsection to:(a) Provide assistance to local and tribal governments regarding the permitting of electric transmission projects which includes, but is not limited to, providing easily accessible information on advanced transmission technologies in Washington and identifying applicable codes and ordinances that support transmission facilities for the purpose of providing frameworks that local and tribal governments may consider or adopt;(b) Provide technical assistance to transmission operators for increasing and enhancing transmission capacity with reconductoring and other advanced transmission technologies; and(c) Identify the appropriate finance mechanisms needed to improve capacity to develop electric transmission in Washington. By November 1, 2025, the department must submit a report that analyzes financing options for transmission projects and provides recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(11) $163,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to provide grants and technical assistance to support planning, predevelopment, and installation of commercial, dual-use solar power demonstration projects. Eligible grant recipients may include, but are not limited to, nonprofit organizations, public entities, and federally recognized tribes.(12)(a) (($10,000,000))$7,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to access federal tax incentives and grants. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize assistance that benefits vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of funds to this purpose.(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department must contract with a nonprofit organization to provide the following services:(i) Development of tax guidance resources for clean energy tax credits, including core legal documents to be used broadly across stakeholders;(ii) Providing tailored marketing materials for these resources targeting underserved entities; and(iii) Providing funds to subcontract with clean energy tax attorneys to pilot office hours style support available to eligible entities across the state.(13) $3,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide and facilitate access to energy assistance programs, including incentives, energy audits, and rebate programs to retrofit homes and small businesses.(14) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity that represents the maritime industry to develop and publish a strategic framework regarding the production, supply, and use of sustainable maritime fuels and deployment of low and zero-emissions vessel technologies in Washington. Analyses will include relevant human and environmental health and equity considerations. Funding under this subsection may be used for activities including, but not limited to, convening stakeholders and building organizational capacity. Stakeholder engagement pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, engagement with federal and state agencies, ports, industry, labor, research institutions, nongovernmental organizations, and relevant federally recognized tribes.(((17)))(15) $450,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state academy of sciences to complete a study to determine the value of distributed solar and storage in Washington state. Including any factors that it finds relevant, the academy shall develop policy recommendations and options for a methodology or methodologies that utility regulators and governing bodies may use after the statutory four percent net metering threshold is met. The academy shall submit a final report to the department and the utilities and transportation commission by October 1, 2026.(((18)))(16) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to complete the final report of the electrical transmission workforce needs study pursuant to section 1117(40) of this act. The department must submit the final report of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025.(17) $744,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6355 (electric transmission system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 132. 2025 c 424 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($6,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,832,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($5,692,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,589,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,902,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($2,075,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,085,000((Dedicated Cannabis AccountâStateAppropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,000))Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,753,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,627,000((Growth Management Planning and EnvironmentalReview FundâState Appropriation. . . .$148,000))Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$142,000State Agency Office Relocation Pool AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$325,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($24,111,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,502,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($253,000))$127,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to incorporate equity and environmental justice into agency grant programs with the goal of reducing programmatic barriers to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities in accessing department funds. The department shall prioritize grant programs receiving funds from the accounts established under RCW 70A.65.240, 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, 70A.65.270, and 70A.65.280.(2) $1,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementation of chapter 70A.02 RCW.(3) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for language access activities, which may include translation services, interpretation services, and in-language material development.(4) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the office of financial management and relevant partners, to conduct an evaluation of the short-term and long-term facility needs to maximize usage and return on investment of the Pacific tower property, as contracted to the department by the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority. In conducting the evaluation, the department may enter a contract, which must be with an entity with expertise in space planning, financial modeling, and public-sector real estate management. The department must submit a final report of their evaluation by November 1, 2026. The evaluation must include, but is not limited to:(a) A floor-by-floor utilization assessment and restacking plan that considers state agencies, local government partners, mission-aligned nonprofits, and other appropriate tenants;(b) An analysis of financial, operational, and contractual factors affecting the building's financial sustainability, including sublease structures and potential areas of duplicative payment or cost overlap;(c) Recommendations for optimizing space based on telework trends, tenant readiness, and the building's physical and historic constraints; and(d) A long-term strategy to improve return on investment, stabilize operating costs, and ensure alignment with the master lease and the 2013 legislative intent for the facility.Sec. 133. 2025 c 424 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($948,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,002,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($946,000))Â Â Â Â Â $964,000Lottery Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$50,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,944,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,016,000Sec. 134. 2025 c 424 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($16,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,103,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($16,270,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,342,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($36,493,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,598,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,132,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,004,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,254,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($24,571,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,948,000Higher Education Personnel Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,428,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,427,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$300,000Statewide Information Technology System DevelopmentRevolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($154,207,000))Â Â Â Â Â $272,275,000Office of Financial Management Central ServiceAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($34,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,115,000((Labor Relations Service NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,797,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($298,891,000))Â Â Â Â Â $410,496,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.(2)(a) (($153,269,000))$271,365,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection:(i) (($15,300,000))$38,643,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool ((in fiscal year 2026)) to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacementâcore financials) state agency costs due to legacy system remediation work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. Of the amount provided in this subsection (2)(b)(i), $12,087,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2026, and $26,556,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2027. The office of financial management must manage the pool, authorize funds, track funds authorized and spent by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to Washington technology solutions so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending each fiscal month for phase 1A and included on the program dashboard for program actual spend;(ii) (($27,563,000))$49,962,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an agency readiness pool ((in fiscal year 2026)) to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement-core financials) state agency costs incurred in preparation for a successful transition to phase 1A. Of the amount provided in this subsection (2)(b)(ii), $21,775,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2026, and $28,187,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2027. The office of financial management must manage this pool, authorize funds, track funds authorized and spent by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to Washington technology solutions so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending each fiscal month for phase 1A and included on the program dashboard program actual spend; and(iii) (($988,000))$1,773,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement ((in fiscal year 2026)) with Washington technology solutions for one dedicated information technology consultant and two dedicated system architect staff. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement-core financials). Of the amount provided in this subsection (2)(b)(iii), $988,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2026, and $785,000 is for costs in fiscal year 2027.(c) The one Washington solution and team must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(d) The one Washington solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(e) Beginning July 1, 2025, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables scheduled for that quarter, including those accomplished and the amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month;(ii) A report on the contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources under (b)(i) of this subsection, the staffing equivalent used, and the actual spending by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;(iv) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received agency readiness pool resources under (b)(ii) of this subsection, the staffing equivalent used, and the actual spending by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;(v) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month for the ensuing quarter;(vi) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, that began July 1, 2021;(vii) ((A report identifying each mandatory go-live phase 1A system by agency and system name, and the status on each system readiness compliance to meet the go-live date as of the start of the quarter and the percentage of compliance by the end of the quarter;(viii))) An accounting of each known risk to the project identified by Washington technology solutions, the assigned quality assurance vendor, or the program during the last quarter, and then how each of these risks were addressed during the last quarter, what date each of these risks are anticipated to be resolved, and if the risk will be unresolved in the ensuing quarter;(((ix)))(viii) An accounting of any deliverables that were changed in the last quarter noting start and anticipated end dates before and after change, and any plans to change future deliverables to include what the deliverable was, what the new deliverable is, why the deliverable was or will be missed, what was done to mitigate this delay, and what the revised deliverable date is; and(((x)))(ix) The project roll-out schedule by phase to include the date each phase will go live compared to the last known go-live date. If the go-live date changed since the last quarterly report, the report must reference the last go-live date compared to the new one and include detail on why the schedule will be missed, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year.(f) Prior to the expenditure of the amounts provided in this subsection, the director of the office of financial management must review and approve the spending in writing.(g) ((The legislature intends to provide additional funding for fiscal year 2027 costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) to be completed.))(i) Beginning April 1, 2026, the office of financial management shall publish monthly snapshot reports on the public facing one Washington website that show the agency and system name noting if the system (on the snapshot date), on go-live, will connect:(A) Directly to workday; or(B) Via the transformation layer.(ii) The report must retain prior month reporting so that historical snapshots by agency by system will be available until go-live implementation.(3) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that at least are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and are under the oversight of Washington technology solutions. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.(4) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.(5) The office of financial management must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the office must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(6) Within existing resources, the office will maintain a data portal to track state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. The data portal must be coordinated with the department of ecology.(7) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 245, Laws of 2022 (state boards, etc./stipends).(8)(a) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of financial management to complete a study of the future long-term uses of the Olympic heritage behavioral health campus. The study must assess the options for maximizing the facility's ability to receive federal matching funds for services provided while contributing to the health of the entire state behavioral health system based on community needs. The study must examine Washington behavioral health system trends, including demand and capacity for voluntary and involuntary behavioral health in-patient treatment, forecasted bed need and current and planned statewide capacity for civil and forensic state hospital populations, short-term civil commitment capacity trends, and trends in prosecutorial forensic referrals. The study must also consider area provider admittance and refusal rates. The study must include:(i) An analysis on the types of services which could be provided at the property, including but not limited to:(A) Voluntary behavioral health treatment services, including diversion, prediversion, and specialty services for people with co-occurring conditions including substance use disorders, intellectual or developmental disabilities, traumatic brain disorders, or dementia;(B) Services for patients that are deemed not guilty by reason of insanity;(C) Integrated service approaches that address medical, housing, vocational, and other needs of behaviorally disabled individuals with criminal legal involvement or likelihood of criminal legal involvement;(D) Long-term involuntary treatment services for specialized populations such as those with developmental disabilities or dementia;(E) Short-term involuntary treatment services;(F) Long-term involuntary treatment services for civil conversion patients;(G) Out-patient intensive behavioral health treatment including partial hospitalization and intensive outpatient care;(H) Crisis response services; and(I) Other services that will increase the state's ability to comply with requirements for providing timely admission of competency restoration patients into treatment beds;(ii) Review of potential for additional capacity or services on the entirety of the property, including any capital improvements needed to expand services under the options described in (a)(i) of this subsection;(iii) Identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments;(iv) Estimated costs, required staffing and workforce availability for each of the recommended types of services if available; and(v) Consideration of options for providers that can provide the different services recommended at the facility and an analysis on the cost differential and potential federal reimbursement for the different providers. The office of financial management may consider a variety of provider types or partners, including, but not limited to:(A) Tribal or local governments;(B) Acute care hospitals already providing similar care;(C) Providers contracted by the health care authority; and(D) State-operated options.(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the University of Washington school of medicine, the health care authority, and the department of social and health services in developing and conducting the study.(c) The office of financial management shall submit a final report with its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(d) The office of financial management may contract with one or more third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct the study. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(9) $352,000 of the labor relations service nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5653 (fish and wildlife officers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(10) $174,000 of the personnel service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5827 (veterans/discharge def.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 135. 2025 c 424 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$25,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$25,000Administrative Hearings Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($72,878,000))Â Â Â Â Â $74,063,000Administrative Hearings Revolving AccountâLocalAppropriation. . . .$12,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($72,890,000))Â Â Â Â Â $74,125,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $809,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(2) $24,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(3) $56,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family and medical leave protections). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) $39,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minors). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $27,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6302 (public works/finishing trade). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6)(a) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of administrative hearings to convene a committee for the purpose of developing recommended changes to the current system and processes for claims against the state, or against its officers, employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of tortious conduct. The committee shall explore, review, and consider options to improve existing systems and processes related to adjudicating claims for tortious conduct against the state or its political subdivisions. The committee shall prioritize recommendations that ensure a fair, efficient, and trauma-informed process for claimants that reduce the impacts to public costs arising from claims of tortious conduct against the state or its political subdivisions. The committee, in making recommendations, shall be balanced in its approach, ensuring issues related to access to justice and the courts, meaningful remedies for claimants, responsible stewardship of public dollars, and transparency and accountability for the state are reflected.(b) Members of the committee shall be appointed by the governor, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. The members shall consist of:(i) A representative of the office of the attorney general, appointed by the attorney general;(ii) Two victims' advocates;(iii) A mental health professional;(iv) Three members of the public who have experience in a civil justice advocacy organization;(v) Two representatives from state agencies with a high volume of tort cases;(vi) A single representative for all counties, appointed by the Washington state association of counties;(vii) A single representative for all school districts, appointed by the Washington schools risk management pool;(viii) A representative of the office of financial management;(ix) A representative from the department of enterprise services; and(x) A representative from the office of administrative hearings.(c) In order to be expedient with this effort, the office of administrative hearings may convene preliminary meetings with the anticipated membership prior to all official appointments being completed, provided that no work on recommendations may begin until official appointments have been made.(d) The duties of the committee shall include, but are not limited to:(i) Examining processes for claims for personal injury arising from alleged tortious conduct against the state. This may also include examining processes related to claims for personal injury arising from alleged tortious conduct against the state's political subdivisions. As part of its recommendations, the committee shall provide guidance about the scope of any proposed changes and whether they would apply solely to the state or to the state and its political subdivisions;(ii) Reviewing outcomes and best practices in other states for adjudicating claims against the state or its political subdivisions for damages arising out of allegations of tortious conduct;(iii) Reviewing and providing recommendations to mitigate future public costs through policy or other changes that would prevent or reduce harm or injury to claimants before it occurs;(iv) Ensuring that any recommendations developed by the committee support training in trauma-informed practices, recognizing the impacts of trauma on participants in the adjudication of claims, and conducting proceedings in a manner that promotes fairness, safety, and respect for all participants;(v) To the extent the committee considers an alternative process for adjudicating claims related to tortious conduct against the state or its political subdivisions, developing recommendations regarding neutral hearings officers; and(vi) To the extent the committee considers an alternative process for adjudicating claims related to tortious conduct against the state or its political subdivisions, recommending rules or processes that would govern the procedural conduct of hearings.(e) The committee shall provide a report to the governor, the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the interbranch advisory committee by November 1, 2026. The report shall include materials developed from its review of best practices in other states, details on the work of the committee and the scope it considered, and any recommendations the committee has for system or process improvements.Sec. 136. 2025 c 424 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERYLottery Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($31,618,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,851,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($31,618,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,851,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.Sec. 137. 2025 c 424 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,173,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,174,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,199,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,207,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,381,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to gang youth intervention specialists for a pilot program within high schools in Washington. Grants may be provided without using a competitive selection process.Sec. 138. 2025 c 424 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($559,000))Â Â Â Â Â $560,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $545,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,105,000Sec. 139. 2025 c 424 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMSâOPERATIONSDepartment of Retirement Systems Expense AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($124,988,000))Â Â Â Â Â $125,893,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($124,988,000))Â Â Â Â Â $125,893,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $45,493,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(2) $20,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5306 (pension credit for leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(3) $120,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2034 (LEOFF 1 restatement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $11,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2124 (lump sum retirement payments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $18,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2179 (port workers PERS membership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $149,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2441 (survivor insurance/LEOFF). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7) $10,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5862 (TRS & PERS plan 1 COLA). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 140. 2025 c 424 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($431,882,000))Â Â Â Â Â $468,206,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($448,347,000))Â Â Â Â Â $508,236,000Timber Tax Distribution AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,187,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,463,000Business License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($20,025,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,747,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$184,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$128,000Financial Services Regulation Nonappropriated FundâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($913,753,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,010,964,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,661,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,661,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 196, Laws of 2021 (capital gains tax).(2) (($253,005,000))$289,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($273,103,000))$309,103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 195, Laws of 2021 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $14,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and(b) (($239,000,000))$275,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($259,000,000))$295,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.(3) $6,976,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement 2025 revenue legislation. Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is sufficient for the department to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5314 (capital gains tax) and Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2061 (duty-free sales enterprises).(4) $181,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(5) Within existing resources, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department of revenue shall implement an expanded voluntary disclosure program for all entities engaged in investment activities that are not a banking, lending, or security business, as defined in RCW 82.04.4281. Unless an audit has been commenced by the department as of July 1, 2025, all such entities may participate in the expanded voluntary disclosure program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall waive all penalties and interest for participating entities of the expanded voluntary disclosure program for the purpose of registering and collecting revenue due from businesses.(6) $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,522,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement 2026 revenue legislation.(7) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $10,196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6346 (tax on millionaires). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(8) The general fundâstate appropriation in this section shall be reduced in accordance with the reduction in lease costs resulting from the department's move into the Edna Lucile Goodrich state-owned building. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this reduction in subsequent fiscal biennia.Sec. 141. 2025 c 424 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,881,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,847,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,975,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,657,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,856,000Sec. 142. 2025 c 424 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,611,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,677,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,671,000Minority and Women's Business Enterprises AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,350,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,436,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,638,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,718,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.Sec. 143. 2025 c 424 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER((General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$300,000))General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,100,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($6,780,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,779,000Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($95,465,000))Â Â Â Â Â $101,325,000Insurance Commissioner's Fraud AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,253,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($108,196,000))Â Â Â Â Â $114,457,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,244,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to continue its work on behavioral health parity compliance, enforcement, and provider network oversight. The commissioner may use internal staff and contracted experts to oversee provider directories and evaluate consumer access to services for mental health and substance use disorders in state-regulated individual, small group, and large group health plans.(2) $350,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to study the feasibility of using a joint underwriting association to provide property and liability insurance coverage for child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services. The commissioner must provide a report of findings to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(a) The commissioner shall collect information from entities transacting insurance in the state and other sources to evaluate feasibility, limitations, and options. Any authorized insurers, unauthorized insurers, and risk retention groups contacted for purposes of this study are required to provide the requested information to the commissioner. The commissioner may confer with government entities, insurers, and stakeholders as needed for the feasibility study and report of findings.(b) The commissioner may contract with actuaries and other consultants, as needed, to analyze data gathered, evaluate feasibility, assess limitations, develop options and recommendations, and prepare the report.(c) The study shall evaluate, at a minimum:(i) Concerns with the cost or availability of property and liability coverage for child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services;(ii) Barriers that child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services experience in accessing adequate property and liability coverage;(iii) Whether and how a joint underwriting association might suit the property and liability coverage needs of child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services, and any limitations of a joint underwriting association in meeting the need; and(iv) Statutory or implementation considerations relevant to legislative deliberations regarding feasibility.(3) $3,297,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to enhance consumer education, outreach, counseling, and complaint resolution for elders and persons with disabilities related to medicare program enrollment and access to care through the senior health insurance benefit advisor program. Activities under this subsection may include but are not limited to: Contracts with community-based organizations with language skills and relationships with medicare beneficiaries; permanent or part-time staffing; volunteer recruitment; and outreach activities.(4) $187,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5721 (automobile insurance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $290,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5351 (dental insurance practices). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $528,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the commissioner to study insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scores, other rate factors that may have disparate impacts on Washington residents, and alternatives to their use, in determining personal insurance premiums, rates, or eligibility for coverage, and the associated impacts to consumer costs and the availability of insurance. The commissioner must provide a report of findings to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by ((November 1, 2026))June 1, 2027.(a) In conducting the study, the commissioner shall:(i) Collect information from entities transacting personal insurance as defined in RCW 48.19.035(1)(e), and any identified authorized insurers are required to provide the requested information to the commissioner;(ii) Investigate and obtain any other relevant information that may assist the commissioner with analyzing insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, other rate factors that may disparately impact Washington residents, and alternatives to their use, in determining personal insurance premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and evaluating the associated impacts to consumer costs and the availability of insurance;(iii) Contract with actuarial and other consultants, as needed, to:(A) Analyze insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, or other rate factors that may disparately impact Washington residents, in determining premiums, rates, and eligibility for coverage for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins;(B) Identify and analyze alternate rate factors that could be used to determine premiums, rates, and eligibility for coverage that neither rely on credit history or credit-based insurance scoring models, nor disparately impact Washington residents of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, or national origins; and(C) Analyze the likely impact of insurers' uses under (a)(iii)(A) of this subsection and alternative rate factors identified under (a)(iii)(B) of this subsection, on consumer costs, rates, premiums eligibility for coverage, and availability of insurance for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins; and(iv) Develop for legislative consideration, policy options and their likely impacts on consumer costs, premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and the availability of personal insurance, of use of rate plans that include and exclude credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, or other rate factors that may have a disparate impact on Washington residents.(b) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the commissioner shall submit a final report by ((November 1, 2026))June 1, 2027, with review findings, policy options, and recommendations regarding allowance, prohibition, or contingent use, of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, other disparately impactful rating factors, and alternatives to their use, for personal insurance, and the associated impacts on consumer costs, premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and availability of insurance for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins.(c) Data requested by, or provided to, the commissioner and the commissioner's contracted consultants for the purpose of complying with the study and reporting requirements in this subsection is confidential by law and privileged and is not subject to public disclosure under chapter 48.02.065(8) RCW. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the commissioner from preparing and publishing reports, analyses, or other documents using the data received under this subsection so long as the data is in aggregate form and does not permit the identification of information related to individual companies. Data in the aggregate form is deemed public records available for public inspection. Nothing in this subsection affects, limits, or amends the commissioner's authority under chapter 48.37 RCW.(7) $737,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(8) $284,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1669 (prosthetic limb coverage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(9) $56,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419 (reports of fire losses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(10) $157,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5108 (service contracts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11)(a) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in consultation with the health care authority, to complete an analysis of the cost to implement an obesity treatment benefit as described in Senate Bill No. 5353 (diabetes and obesity).(b) The commissioner must contract with one or more consultants to obtain utilization and cost data from the Washington state all payer claims database and, if needed, Washington state health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, necessary to provide an estimate of the fiscal impact of including an obesity treatment benefit in the commercial health plan market.(c) The analysis must include, but is not limited to, a utilization and cost analysis of each of the following services:(i) Intensive health, behavioral, and lifestyle treatment;(ii) Metabolic and bariatric surgery; and(iii) Food and drug administration-approved obesity medication.(d) The report should include projected costs in the individual, small group and large group markets, separate and in the aggregate, expressed both as total annual costs and per member per month costs for plan years 2028 through 2029.(e) The commissioner must report the findings of the analysis to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2026.(12) $350,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to review and evaluate the efficacy of current property protection class rating methodologies and to study the feasibility of modernizing community property classification rating schedules to more accurately reflect the fire protection risk and available mitigations for a specific property by December 31, 2025.(13) $491,000 of the insurance commissioner's fraud accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to collaborate with the Pierce county prosecuting attorney's office regarding the criminal prosecution of matters investigated by the limited authority peace officers employed by the commissioner.(14) $100,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(15) $1,287,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (mental health services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(16) $14,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (prescription hormone therapy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to enter into an interagency agreement with the health care authority to support economic, actuarial, or other modeling related to design of a universal health care system, as directed in RCW 41.05.840.(18) (($116,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1392 (medicaid access program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19))) $273,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (health/contract terminations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $800,000))(19) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((are))is provided solely to the office of the insurance commissioner to defray costs during plan year 2026 incurred by carriers for coverage in qualified health plans of state-mandated health benefits included in the state essential health benefits benchmark plan as approved by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services on October 7, 2024, that are not permitted to be treated as an essential health benefit under federal law or regulation.(((21)))(20) $368,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1516 (insurance/affordable units). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(21)(a) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to enter into a contract with the William D. Ruckelshaus center to design, convene, and facilitate a collaborative forum with respect to contracting practices between health carriers and health care providers and facilities described in (b) of this subsection for fully insured health plans. The forum shall include participation from:(i) Representatives of licensed clinicians not affiliated with or owned by hospitals or health carriers, such as physical, speech and occupational therapists, chiropractors, advanced registered nurse practitioners, physicians, physician assistants, licensed clinical social workers, marriage and family counselors, mental health counselors, and psychologists;(ii) Representatives of health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005;(iii) Representatives of health care facilities, such as urban hospitals, rural hospitals, ambulatory surgery centers, behavioral health agencies, tribal clinics and federally qualified health centers;(iv) A representative of the commissioner; and(v) A representative of the health care authority.(b) The forum shall be capped at 25 primary participants. The Ruckelshaus Center shall work in collaboration with the insurance commissioner to identify and select participants who are representative of interested organizations.(c) The forum shall address issues related to one or more of the following topic areas, which may be prioritized or sequenced:(i) Credentialing of health care facilities and providers, including the use of a uniform electronic process for collecting and transmitting necessary provider-supplied data to support credentialing under RCW 48.165.035, information required by carriers for credentialing, and timeliness of credentialing decisions;(ii) Midcontract modifications of carrier payment, utilization review, or other policies related to payment for or delivery of care to enrollees; and(iii) Contract negotiation practices with respect to rates, fee schedules, or payment methodologies for payment to health care providers and facilities.(d) The forum shall submit a preliminary report to the legislature by December 31, 2026, summarizing its progress to date.(e) It is the intent of the legislature to continue funding the collaborative forum in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium. The forum shall submit a final report to the legislature by December 15, 2027, detailing the outcome of its work and documenting areas of agreement, disagreement, and any policy considerations or recommendations. Consensus among participants is not required.(22) $103,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2384 (continuing care retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $55,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2428 (life insurance policy lapses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $286,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5395 (prior authorization/health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25) $396,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6248 (travel insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26) $856,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5845 (health carrier payments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27) $61,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6183 (HIV antiviral drugs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28) $12,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1187 (delayed ambulance bills). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(29) $108,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6182 (abortion savings program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $70,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2242 (preventive health services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 144. 2025 c 424 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARDState Investment Board Expense AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($90,325,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,548,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($90,325,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,548,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $170,000 of the state investment board expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Joint Resolution No. 8201 (investment/LTSS accounts). ((If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 145. 2025 c 424 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$620,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($638,000))Â Â Â Â Â $637,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,249,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$14,486,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($14,966,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,892,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($105,057,000))Â Â Â Â Â $106,798,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($139,052,000))Â Â Â Â Â $140,757,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.(2) $8,208,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the tax and fee systems replacement and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $117,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5206 (cannabis advertising). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) $165,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5786 (liquor license fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $1,367,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1515 (alcohol service in public). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $28,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1602 (liquor food service options). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(7) Within existing resources appropriated in this section, by December 1, 2025, the liquor and cannabis board, in consultation with the department of commerce when specified in this subsection, shall evaluate the cannabis social equity program as provided in this subsection and submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and policy options. In conducting the evaluation, the board shall provide opportunities for public comment on the cannabis social equity program from communities throughout Washington. The evaluation must include the following components:(a) A review of feedback received by the board in public comments from individuals that the program is intended to benefit, the public, and the cannabis industry;(b) An examination of the issuance and reissuance of cannabis retailer licenses that began before January 1, 2025, under the provisions of chapter 236, Laws of 2020, including a comparative analysis of the applicants who successfully secured a location and were issued a cannabis retailer license relative to applicants whose status remains pending but were issued a preliminary letter of approval by the board;(c) An examination, in consultation with the department of commerce, of grants awarded and the mentorships provided under RCW 43.330.540 and opportunities for the alignment of the board's implementation of the cannabis social equity program with the department of commerce's implementation of RCW 43.330.540;(d) The demographic information about owners of licensed cannabis businesses who became licensed under the cannabis social equity program, to the extent such information is available or obtainable by the board;(e) The identification of any provisions of law or rule and any economic, market, or practical factors that effectively prevent or hinder the successful opening, operation, and business success of cannabis businesses licensed under the cannabis social equity program; and(f) An examination of the impact of provisions in laws and rules on cannabis licensees in the cannabis social equity program with respect to: (i) Permissible locations for the siting of licensed cannabis businesses, including distance restrictions in RCW 69.50.331(8), zoning or other location restrictions in local government ordinances, and local written objections under RCW 69.50.331(11); (ii) the mobility of cannabis licenses to or between jurisdictions; (iii) the ability of persons holding an existing cannabis retailer license or title certificate for a cannabis retailer business to apply for a cannabis license under a cannabis social equity program, when the license or certificate holder is located in a local jurisdiction that is subject to a ban or moratorium on cannabis retail businesses; (iv) prioritizing license applications through use of a third-party contractor, using a scoring rubric developed by the board; (v) restrictions on the transfer or assumption of a cannabis license issued through the cannabis social equity program, other than to individuals or groups of individuals who comply with the requirements for initial licensure as a social equity applicant for a period of at least five years from the date of initial licensure; and (vi) the definition of a "social equity applicant."Sec. 146. 2025 c 424 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONPublic Service Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($72,453,000))Â Â Â Â Â $73,324,000Public Service Revolving AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$100,000Pipeline Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,759,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,787,000Pipeline Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,473,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,472,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($79,785,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,683,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.(2) $617,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). If the bill in not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) $239,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5445 (local energy resilience). If the bill in not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $39,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1990 (utility disaster costs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $71,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1522 (utility wildfire mitigation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $202,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1514 (low carbon thermal energy). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(7) $404,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (water system rates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(8) $79,000 of the public services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5982 (consumer-owned utilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9) $132,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6355 (electric transmission system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 147. 2025 c 424 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($16,219,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,185,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($15,961,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,013,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($148,158,000))Â Â Â Â Â $148,640,000911 AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($55,114,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,656,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($52,763,000))Â Â Â Â Â $86,382,000Disaster Response AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($702,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $608,182,000Military Department Rent and Lease AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,409,000Military Department Active State Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($55,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$855,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,243,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,242,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($995,609,000))Â Â Â Â Â $946,992,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.(2) $40,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.(3) (($11,000,000))$16,500,000 of the 911 accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.(4) $784,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.(5) $876,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.(6) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(7)(a) $355,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study regarding statewide building code and construction standards pertaining to earthquake and tsunami resilience as well as recommendations for functional recovery of buildings and critical infrastructure directly following an earthquake. In conducting the study, the department must request input from the state building code council and representatives of appropriate public and private sector entities. The department may contract for all or a portion of the study. The study must, at a minimum, include an assessment of:(i) Functional recovery building code standards that are being developed at the federal level, have been proposed or adopted in other countries, states, or local jurisdictions with a high risk of earthquakes, or are developed by public or private organizations with expertise in earthquake performance standards and safety;(ii) The levels of functional recovery supported by current state and local building and construction codes;(iii) The objectives, feasibility, necessary measures, and estimated costs of adopting and implementing statewide functional recovery building code standards, and how this assessment is impacted by whether the standards:(A) Are mandatory or voluntary;(B) Apply to only certain types of structures and infrastructure or prioritize certain types of structures and infrastructure;(C) Apply to existing structures and infrastructure in addition to new construction;(D) Are intended to apply to only specific seismic hazard levels; or(E) Include nonstructural components as well as structural systems;(iv) How statewide standards for functional recovery would fit into an all hazards approach for state emergency response and recovery;(v) Funding opportunities that provide for the coordination of state and federal funds for the purposes of improving the state's preparedness for functional recovery following a significant earthquake or tsunami; and(vi) Equity considerations for the development of statewide building code standards for functional recovery.(b) The department must submit a final report summarizing the study's findings and including policy recommendations relating to statewide building code standards for functional recovery to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2026.(8) $2,500,000 of the 911 accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for statewide 911 technology enhancements and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(9)(a) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to update and complete the inventory and categorization of unreinforced masonry buildings in Washington, as initially directed in section 1009, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.(b) In updating the inventory, the department must:(i) Review existing survey and data sources, including the state's historic resources database and Sanborn maps to identify and confirm unreinforced masonry construction;(ii) Conduct ground truthing of suspected unreinforced masonry to confirm construction type and vulnerability; and(iii) Upload unreinforced masonry data into the Washington system for architectural and archaeological records data portal and dashboard to enable local jurisdictions to view, download, and use to guide unreinforced masonry retrofit efforts, hazard mitigation plans, and emergency management plans.(c) The department must submit a preliminary report on the progress of updating the inventory to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027. The department must submit a final report with the completed inventory to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2029. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to complete the inventory and the final report in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.Sec. 148. 2025 c 424 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,765,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,764,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,740,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,811,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,872,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,897,000Higher Education Personnel Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,613,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,615,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,990,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,087,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5503 (public employee bargaining). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(2) $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1141 (ag. cannabis workers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(3) $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (correctional officers/arb.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 149. 2025 c 424 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCYCertified Public Accountants' AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,802,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,958,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,802,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,958,000Sec. 150. 2025 c 424 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERSVolunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,563,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,517,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,563,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,517,000Sec. 151. 2025 c 424 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCILDeath Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($841,000))Â Â Â Â Â $840,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($841,000))Â Â Â Â Â $840,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.(2) $210,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.(3) The forensic investigation council must collaborate and work with the Washington state patrol for the patrol to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.Sec. 152. 2025 c 424 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($18,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,118,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($17,985,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,929,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$102,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,266,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,678,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,308,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,808,000Prescribed Fire Claims AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,890,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,635,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $6,672,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($6,725,000))$6,846,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, parking, security, contracts, public and historic facilities, financial cost recovery, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to have all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2027.(4) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with Washington technology solutions, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.(5) $654,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $654,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the state efficiency and environmental performance program, to implement the zero emission vehicle strategy.(6) $1,501,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))climate commitment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment must allow for the collection of usage data and must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities, and at least where zero emission fleet vehicles are or are scheduled to be purchased. The department must report when and where the equipment was installed, usage data at each charging station, and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(7)(a) $6,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events statewide. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to 40 percent of the state contribution. The department may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the department shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17A RCW; or(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.(8) $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5655 (child care centers/buildings). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(9) $112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year ((2026))2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5552 (kit homes/building codes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, ((2025))2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $2,000,000 of the prescribed fire claims accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1563 (prescribed fire claims). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 153. 2025 c 424 s 155 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($4,040,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,009,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,973,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,308,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,559,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,387,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$14,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$617,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,203,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,335,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington main street program.(2) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of the black historic sites survey project.(3) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(4) $142,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6355 (electric transmission system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to develop a model ordinance that could be used by local governments to protect archaeological and cultural resources when development may impact places of importance to local history and federally recognized Indian tribes. The model ordinance must be developed in consultation with federally recognized Indian tribes and with participation from the Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, the governor's office of Indian affairs, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, a statewide association representing home builders, a statewide association representing general business, and an environmental nonprofit focused on land use and housing. In developing the model ordinance, the department must identify minimum requirements that would demonstrate archaeological and cultural resources protection. In developing minimum requirements, the department must consider best practices from ordinances adopted by local jurisdictions with the express purpose of protecting archaeological and cultural resources. By June 1, 2027, the department must provide a report to the legislature that includes: The model ordinance; minimum requirements for a compliant ordinance; a list of tribes consulted; a list of stakeholders engaged; and a summary of key findings that informed the development of the ordinance.Sec. 154. 2025 c 424 s 156 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON TECHNOLOGY SOLUTIONS AGENCYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$188,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($188,000))Â Â Â Â Â $130,000Washington Technology Solutions Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($140,085,000))Â Â Â Â Â $141,558,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($140,461,000))Â Â Â Â Â $141,876,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from Washington technology solutions. The staff or vendors will:(a) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;(b) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and(c) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.(2) (($2,226,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the enterprise data management pilot project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $16,655,000))$16,474,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.(((4)))(3) $2,692,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.(((5)))(4) Washington technology solutions shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.(((6)))(5)(a) In conjunction with Washington technology solutions' prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.(b) Washington technology solutions and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.(((7)))(6) Washington technology solutions must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.(((8)))(7) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.(((9)))(8) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.(((10)))(9) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(((11) $9,101,000))(10) $8,975,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.(((12) $86,566,000))(11) $89,716,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature each December 31, on the count and type of licenses distributed by Washington technology solutions to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by Washington technology solutions so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.(((13)))(12) Washington technology solutions shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that, at minimum, provides updated information each fiscal month on, at least, the projects subject to section 701 of this act.(a) The statewide information technology dashboard must include, at a minimum, the:(i) Start date of the project;(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed or note if none has been completed to date;(x) Monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:(A) Washington technology solutions;(B) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable; and(C) Agency project team;(xi) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;(xii) Monthly Washington technology solutions status reports on budget, scope, schedule, and overall project status; and(xiii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2025.(b) The statewide dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active. For projects that include multiple agencies or subprojects and roll up, the dashboard must display:(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan for each impacted agency. If the impacted agency has funding appropriated to another agency, as is done with the statewide electronic health records solution where the federal funding is appropriated to the health care authority and not at the department of corrections, then the technology budget must be compiled in the lead agency technology budget only, referencing any differences in appropriation index, as described in section 701(4)(b)(iii)(B) of this act; and(ii) A statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.(c) Washington technology solutions may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.(d) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and those projects subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;(ii) The project historical expenditures through completed fiscal years by December 31; and(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.(e) Washington technology solutions must post to the statewide dashboard a list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.(f) Washington technology solutions must update processes for posting to the statewide dashboard to ensure the actual project expenditures are posted to the statewide dashboard as the costs are incurred against the discrete project coding in the agency financial reporting system (AFRS).(g) Washington technology solutions must update processes for posting to the statewide dashboard to ensure the budget program planned spend amounts by fiscal month for this fiscal biennium are not posted to the dashboard until the office of financial management has approved funding for the certified project gate, after the 10 business day review by fiscal committees of the legislature.(h) Washington technology solutions must update process assumptions for the technology budget so that projects:(i) Under oversight do not exceed the enacted budget amounts by fund by fiscal year on the budgeted resources worksheet; and(ii) Not under oversight use the in-kind resources worksheet for their project detail and do not use the budgeted resources worksheet as they enter their budget spending plans by fund by fiscal month and fiscal year.(i) Washington technology solutions must ensure that each discrete posting to the statewide dashboard of a technology budget must remain posted to the dashboard for historical purposes and not be removed or replaced.(j) Washington technology solutions must ensure that if a project technology budget workbook changes, including technical changes within the workbook, and varies from the prior posted technology budget on the dashboard, and once a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last posted approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how the changes impact the project scope, budget, and schedule.(k) Washington technology solutions must ensure that, if a project is aware of deliverable and milestone changes compared to the last gated office of financial management approved funding gated release, before approving or certifying the next gate the project must update the technology budget deliverables and spending plan to reflect these changes before the agency can apply for certification as required in section 701 of this act.(((14)))(13) Within existing resources, Washington technology solutions must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Washington technology solutions will:(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually by September 1 of each year; and(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.(((15) $8,666,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.(16) $3,498,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:(a) A cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;(b) A cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.(17)))(14) $11,623,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enterprise cloud services. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to:(a) Cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap; and(b) The implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report and a cloud readiness program.(15) Washington technology solutions must collaborate with the office of the secretary of state in the evaluation of the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications in determining the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from Washington technology solutions oversight.(((18)))(16)(a) Washington technology solutions must include the enterprise statewide electronic health records program on the statewide information technology program dashboard for those agencies appropriated funding for the statewide electronic health records solution. The program dashboard must ensure the program detail will roll up the below required subprojects:(i) Enterprise foundational statewide electronic health records system, appropriated to the health care authority;(ii) Department of corrections statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the department of corrections;(iii) Department of social and health services statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the department of social and health services; and(iv) Health care authority statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the health care authority.(b) The Washington technology solutions must report to the technology services board by December 31, 2025, June 30, 2026, and October 31, 2026, on the status of the following statewide electronic health records solution go-live dates:(i) ((August 15, 2027))March 15, 2028, for the department of corrections;(ii) ((August 15, 2027))March 15, 2028, for the department of social and health services; and(iii) ((August 15, 2027))March 15, 2028, for the health care authority;The update must include any changes to the scheduled go-live dates by agency, reporting on all risks to the schedule for the above milestone go-live dates by agency, include detail on why the schedule will be missed by agency, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year by fund source by agency, and in total.(c) Washington technology solutions must:(i) Require that vendors for the statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, be developed using incremental user research, and held at the end of two-week sprints;(ii) Require the solutions be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and(iii) Ensure development of the statewide electronic health records solution shall include consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(((19)))(17) In collaboration with the department of health and the health care authority:(a) Washington technology solutions must actively consult and provide oversight over:(i) The department of health 988 technology platform that must provide interoperability capabilities between the 988-related system and the health care authority's 988-related system;(ii) The health care authority 988 technology platform that must provide interoperability capabilities between the 988-related system and the department of health's 988 call center platform;(iii) How the platforms in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will meet the statutory requirements for technology platform functionality and implementation dates as established in chapter 364, Laws of 2024, and must report on the progress of both platforms' budget, scope, schedule, and milestone accomplishments at a technology services board meeting by October 31, 2025. The update must include any changes to the scheduled October 1, 2025, request for proposal issuance and the January 1, 2028, go-live date by agency, reporting on all risks to the schedule for the milestone dates by agency, include detail on why the schedule will be missed by agency, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year by fund source by agency, and in total; and(b) Washington technology solutions must:(i) Require that vendors for the 988 technology platforms must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, be developed using incremental user research, and held at the end of two-week sprints; and(ii) Require the solutions be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(18)(a) The statewide electronic health records project, to include all subprojects, must continue to comply with the currently approved statewide electronic health records plan that includes the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority unless an alternate plan that must include the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority is submitted to the technology services board by August 1, 2026, and approved by the technology services board by September 1, 2026. If an alternate plan is presented to the technology services board, to be considered, it must:(i) Be a plan to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services; and(ii) Include, but not be limited to, the following elements:(A) A comprehensive and complete project schedule to include quantifiable anticipated deliverables that must include start date and estimated completion dates for each milestone, from at least July 1, 2026, through implementation and go-live dates for the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority;(B) An implementation plan for the technology solution from July 1, 2026, through five years maintenance and operations post go-live implementation;(C) Technology budgets to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and subproject, including fund sources and fund splits, and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4) of this act;(D) A comparison of the current approved plan to the proposed alternate plan by subproject and in total through at least go-live and implementation, to include discrete comprehensive comparisons of:(I) Budget;(II) Scope;(III) Schedule;(IV) Technology budgets, that must be compliant with section 701(4) of this act for each of the following subprojects: Enterprise foundational electronic health records system; department of corrections electronic health records; department of social and health services electronic health records; and health care authority electronic health records;(V) Staffing by subproject by fiscal year, by fund, by classification;(VI) Licensing costs by fiscal year, and what is included in that cost and what is not included;(VII) Each identified third party application solution necessary for go live and if the alternate would assume an alternate third party application compared to current plan for each third party application;(VIII) Maintenance and operations cost by fiscal year from go-live through at least five fiscal years to include, but not be limited to, state employee staffing levels and detail of state employee classifications, contracted professional services by contractor name and service provided, and software licenses and subscriptions to include contractor name and software categories; and(IX) Each bucket of cost, of total associated costs, by fiscal year by fund provided in plain language;(E) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;(F) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;(G) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date there is an executed procurement contract after a competitive request for proposal is closed;(H) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly; and(I) The development of the statewide electronic health records solution must include consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(b) The plan and all requirements described in (a) of this subsection:(i) Must be submitted in plain language to the office of financial management, the chair and ranking member of the senate environment, energy, and technology policy committee and the house technology, economic development, and veterans policy committee, the chairs and ranking members of the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the technology services board by August 1, 2026, and must allow for at least 10 business days from the date of submittal of all materials for review before it can be approved; and(ii) Must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board established in RCW 43.105.285 by September 1, 2026, or the previously approved technology services board plan will continue to be completed in full.Sec. 155. 2025 c 424 s 157 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORSProfessional Engineers' AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,018,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,036,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,018,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,036,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 156. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$300,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$300,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to establish a public bank work group. The work group is established with the purpose of developing a Washington state banking implementation report.(1) The work group shall consist of:(a) The director of the department of financial institutions or their designee, who shall serve as chair of the work group;(b) At least three industry experts on public banking appointed by the chair, which may include representatives from organizations devoted to researching public banking;(c) Representatives from the following offices and agencies:(i) The office of the state treasurer;(ii) The office of the state auditor; and(iii) The office of the insurance commissioner;(d) A member from the senate appointed by the president of the senate; and(e) A member from the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.(2) The work group shall make efforts to invite participation from consultants or representatives from other public banks, including the bank of North Dakota, Deutsche Bundesbank, or other such individuals with expertise in establishing or managing a public bank.(3) The work group shall consult with the department of commerce, which may also provide staff support to the work group. The work group may consult with other state agencies that invest public dollars.(4) The work group shall provide a public bank implementation report to the legislature no later than June 30, 2027, with an update to the legislature by December 31, 2026. The implementation report must include:(a) Recommendations for the state public bank's operational and administrative structure;(b) An assessment of state funds or accounts which could be used to capitalize the state public bank; and(c) An implementation plan for how the state public bank should be formed.(5) Members of the public bank work group are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(6) The department of financial institutions shall provide staff support for coordinating and administering the work group and technical assistance as requested by work group members.Sec. 157. 2025 c 424 s 158 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARDWashington State Leadership Board AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,696,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,705,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,696,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,705,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $374,000 of the Washington state leadership board accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2022 (WA state leadership board).(2) $1,200,000 of the Washington state leadership board accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementing programming in RCW 43.388.010, and specifically the Washington world fellows program, sports mentoring program/boundless Washington, compassion scholars, and the Washington state leadership awards.(End of part)PART IIHUMAN SERVICESSec. 201. 2025 c 424 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximize federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(8) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(9) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(10) At least 30 calendar days prior to a change in program policies or procedures which the department determines is likely to have an adverse impact to a majority of that program's clients, the department shall communicate the change to impacted persons. The department may leverage multiple communication platforms and diverse methods to communicate the change under this subsection. In cases where the change in program policies or procedures must be implemented in a time frame that renders 30-day advance notice infeasible, the department shall make efforts to notify impacted persons as soon as possible. The department shall partner with community-based organizations, tribes, and state and local agencies to share information broadly, prioritizing language access where possible.(11) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However:(a) In support of the recent reorganization, the department may transfer funds among the behavioral health administration, the aging and long-term support administration, and the developmental disabilities administration to the extent necessary to facilitate accurate record keeping for each administration.(b) After May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection.(c) To the extent that transfers under (b) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2026 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, or to support the reorganization described in (a) of this subsection, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(d) Within the mental health program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year 2026.(12) It is the intent of the legislature to make budget structure changes to the department of social and health services in the 2027-2029 biennial omnibus operating budget to align with the reorganization that consolidated functions of the behavioral health, developmental disabilities, and aging and long-term support administrations into two administrations entitled the behavioral health and habilitation administration and the home and community living administrations. The governor's budget proposal submitted in December 2026 must incorporate the following budget structure changes:(a) Creation of the behavioral health and habilitation administration and the home and community living administration;(b) Consolidation of expenditures for behavioral health services and expenditures for state-operated settings for those with developmental disabilities, including 24/7 facilities and residential habilitation centers, within the behavioral health and habilitation administration and organized into the following individual program structure:(i) Behavioral health services;(ii) Developmental disabilities institutional services;(iii) Developmental disabilities habilitation services; and(iv) Program support; and(c) Consolidation of expenditures for aging and long-term services and supports and expenditures for community services for those with developmental disabilities within the home and community living administration and organized into the following individual program structure:(i) Aging and long-term community services;(ii) Developmental disabilities community services; and(iii) Program support.Sec. 202. 2025 c 424 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($703,408,000))Â Â Â Â Â $706,845,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($729,030,000))Â Â Â Â Â $701,045,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($204,706,000))Â Â Â Â Â $192,277,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($15,151,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,443,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$7,575,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$680,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,660,550,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,613,865,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(2) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for the city of Lakewood to produce incident and police response reports, investigate potential criminal conduct, assist with charging consultations, liaison between staff and prosecutors, provide staff training on criminal justice procedures, assist with parking enforcement, and attend meetings with hospital staff.(3) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.(4) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at eastern state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Medical Lake on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.(5) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.(6) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.(a) By the first day of each December during the fiscal biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (i) The number of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (ii) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (iii) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (iv) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.(b) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.(7) (($9,119,000))$8,473,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($9,145,000))$8,499,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.(8) $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(9) $71,690,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $77,825,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2025. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.(10) $84,565,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $77,343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $960,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.(a) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.(b) By December 1st of each fiscal year of the biennium, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.(c) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.(11) (($8,611,000))$8,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($8,611,000))$8,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $924,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a violence reduction team at western state hospital to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1st of each fiscal year of the biennium, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.(12) $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.(13) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal year and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to: (a) Monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (b) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (c) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (d) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (e) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (f) average length of stay by category of patient; (g) average monthly civil wait list; (h) average monthly forensic wait list; (i) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (j) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (k) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (l) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.(14) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at western state hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.(15) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with the requirements of RCW 71.05.365 for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within 14 days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these amounts to track the following elements related to this requirement: (a) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (b) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (c) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been reevaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the 14 day standard by December 1st of each year of the biennium.(16) (($298,000))$498,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for maintenance of the facility, property, and assets at the Brockmann campus located in Clark county.(17) (($77,102,000))$61,475,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($81,301,000))$72,830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate the maple lane campus as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(a) The department shall operate the Oak, Columbia, and Cascade cottages to provide:(i) Treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and(ii) Treatment services to individuals acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120.(b) The department shall open and operate the Baker and Chelan cottages to provide treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.(c) In considering placements at the maple lane campus, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(18) $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for relocation, storage, and other costs associated with building demolition on the western state hospital campus.(19) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department is provided funding to operate civil long-term inpatient beds at the state hospitals as follows:(a) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 162 civil beds at eastern state hospital in both fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027.(b) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 287 civil beds at western state hospital in both fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027.(c) The department shall fully operate funded civil capacity at eastern state hospital, including reopening and operating civil beds that are not needed for eastern Washington residents to provide services for western Washington residents.(d) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority toward increasing community capacity for long-term inpatient services required under section 214(30) of this act.(20)(a) (($59,650,000))$48,635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($59,650,000))$53,566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate 74 beds in three wards in the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(b) The department may not use the remaining 38 beds at the facility for any purpose and must permit the contractor selected by the health care authority to utilize the beds pursuant to and upon completion of the contracted process outlined in section 214 of this act.(21) $9,905,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,974,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for overtime staffing costs at eastern state hospital and western state hospital.(22) Within existing resources, the department shall participate in the advisory group for the behavioral health facilities program referenced in chapter 474, Laws of 2023 and chapter 414, Laws of 2025. Responsibilities of the department include:(a) Attend monthly advisory group meetings;(b) Designate subject matter experts to provide input and technical assistance in developing program guidelines, notices of funding availability, and application questions;(c) Designate subject matter experts to serve as application reviewers including scoring applications and making recommendations on funding decisions;(d) Provide guidance and technical assistance related to behavioral health facility development, behavioral health service modalities, unmet demand for different types of behavioral health facilities and services, insurance, and other programmatic issues; and(e) In coordination with the health care authority, inform local jurisdictions annually on the progress of new state and community behavioral health facilities, including information about contracted providers and anticipated impacts on local community services.(23) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1359 (criminal insanity). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Within these amounts, $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a contract with the Washington state association of counties to provide staff support for the task force created in the bill.(((22)))(24) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1162 (health care work violence). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $3,278,000))(25) $2,789,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($4,345,000))$3,856,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (competency evaluations).(((24)))(26) $4,118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($4,118,000))$3,614,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $396,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge as provided in this subsection.(a) The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work, including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.(b) ((Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $504,000 per year shall be used for bed fees for patients who are not guilty by reason of insanity.(c))) The department shall track data as it relates to this subsection and, where available, compare it to historical data.(27) $348,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to hire a consultant to develop a plan for certification and accreditation of the new forensic hospital on the western state hospital campus.(28) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,071,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to ensure effective communication with patients with hearing disabilities in the department's custody and comply with the terms of the settlement agreement with the United States department of justice.(29) Within existing resources, the department in coordination with the health care authority shall jointly meet with community health providers, universities, legislative members, relevant union members, persons with lived experience, county behavioral health officials, and tribes to identify utilization options for behavioral health and treatment capacity, including but not limited to facilities in Clark county, that could serve state or community behavioral health needs. The feedback sessions must prioritize civil commitment and conversion capacity to be responsive to state litigation and an adequate continuum of 90/180 day behavioral health community capacity. Options to address needs should include, but not be limited to, public private partnerships, long-term leases, local government partnerships, behavioral health service organizations, and state operations. The department and the health care authority shall convene at least four meetings, with the first meeting held by June 1, 2026. The secretary and the director of the health care authority shall provide a list of options, including anticipated barriers and cost estimates for each, to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 30, 2026.Sec. 203. 2025 c 424 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâDEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM(1) COMMUNITY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,328,114,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,355,638,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,390,855,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,426,239,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,781,638,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,871,520,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($4,486,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,496,000Developmental Disabilities Community ServicesAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,020,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,020,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,507,113,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,661,913,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals who receive supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 solely on the basis of receiving those payments.(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(i) The current annual license renewal fee for adult family homes is $450 per bed. A nonrefundable processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged for the initial licensing of each adult family home. In addition, a processing fee of $700 shall be imposed on providers submitting an application for a change of ownership.(ii) The current annual license renewal fee for assisted living facilities is $383 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $381 in fiscal year 2027.(iii) The current annual license renewal fee for nursing facilities is $814 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $834 per bed in fiscal year 2027.(c) $14,742,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $35,028,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $62,704,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(d) $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,755,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,914,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(e) $1,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,862,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,639,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(f) $228,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $420,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $817,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 30 cents per hour effective July 1, 2025, and an additional 23 cents per hour effective July 1, 2026.(g) $6,953,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,815,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $18,212,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(i)(i) $10,722,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $10,722,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $21,190,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates by two percent, effective July 1, 2025, for community residential service providers. This includes supported living, group home, group training home, licensed staff residential services, community protection, and children's out-of-home services to individuals with developmental disabilities. The full amount must be used for compensation increases for direct support professionals and other direct care workers in these settings.(ii) Contracted agency providers must include staffing information in their community residential cost reports. This includes wages, health insurance, number of positions, and turnover. The data must be broken out specifically for direct support professionals and published on the department's residential programs reimbursement website.(j) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.(k) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(l) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(m) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2026 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2027. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(n) (($3,042,000))$2,884,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($3,115,000))$3,016,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($2,695,000))$2,581,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(o) (($2,553,000))$1,947,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,621,000))$2,058,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(p) $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $512,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2025.(q) A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(r) ((The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to provide access to the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver to those individuals on the service request list as forecasted by the caseload forecast council. For subsequent policy level budgets, the department shall submit a request for funding associated with individuals requesting to receive the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver in accordance with the courtesy forecasts provided by the caseload forecast council.(s))) $332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $740,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,074,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supported employment and community inclusion services for those individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who are transitioning from high school in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and are anticipated to utilize these services. Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall, no later than September 1, 2025, and September 1, 2026, submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a forecast of: (i) The total caseload of individuals anticipated to utilize supported employment and community inclusion services; and (ii) the caseload of individuals transitioning from high school anticipated to utilize supported employment and community inclusion services. These forecasts shall be utilized to inform the governor's operating maintenance and policy level budgets during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and shall include data that begins with fiscal year 2018, incorporates actual entries and exits, and delineates the community inclusion caseload from the supported employment caseload for both the total supported employment and community inclusion caseload forecasts and the separate caseload forecasts of those individuals transitioning from high school.(((t) $3,345,000))(s) $1,622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($3,345,000))$1,622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to ((33))16 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(((u)))(t)(i) (($9,346,000))$12,257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($9,376,000))$8,726,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($15,292,000))$7,125,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate a transitional facility specializing in treatment for youth aged 13-17 who have intellectual and developmental disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, and a severe psychiatric diagnosis requiring 24/7 care under the direction of a physician. Youth admitted to the facility require health services wherein treatment modalities and interventions are adapted to specifically provide youth with I/DD benefits from the level of care provided. Services must be provided at a leased property in Burien, serve no more than 12 youth at one time, and be implemented in a way that prioritizes transition to less restrictive community-based settings. Youth shall be voluntarily admitted to the facility by their own consent or the consent of their guardian or legal representative. The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to identify youth for placement in this setting and regarding appropriate discharge options with a focus on less restrictive community-based settings.(ii) The department and the health care authority shall collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments. This collaborative effort aims not only to enhance the funding available for the operation of the facility but also to maintain adherence to its fundamental objective of offering voluntary, transitional services. These services are designed to facilitate the transition of youth to community-based settings that are less restrictive, aligning with the facility's commitment to supporting youth with complex needs in a manner that encourages their movement toward independence.(((v)))(u) $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $204,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(w)))(v) $486,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $420,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for adult family homes in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in (b)(i) of this subsection that is paid on medicaid beds.(((x)))(w) $21,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $18,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for assisted living facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in (b)(ii) of this subsection that is paid on medicaid beds.(((y)))(x) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(z) $1,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,015,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,850,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5393 (Yakima & Rainier schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(y)(i) $556,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the health care authority, to implement a program beginning October 1, 2026, to continue services for up to 29 individuals who:(A) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid coverage for developmental disability services due to provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21; and(B) Are prioritized by the department as clients in residential settings at risk of losing their housing or those with higher levels of acuity.(ii) By October 1, 2026, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, shall provide a report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature that includes recommendations for how the program described in (y)(i) of this subsection can achieve savings through a reduction in services or benefits to allow for an increase in enrollment capacity.(z)(i) $250,000 of the developmental disabilities community services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a strategic planning work group to transform Washington's system of services and supports for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities by:(A) Prioritizing collaborative engagement between individuals with lived or living experience and decision makers who will act to make the vision a reality;(B) Identifying and implementing strategies to reduce or eliminate the use of expensive, congregate institutional settings for long-term care;(C) Expanding community-based services to serve a larger population of people with intellectual and developmental disabilities;(D) Addressing barriers to service access and equity; and(E) Identifying necessary investments in community infrastructure, workforce, and service capacity.(ii) By June 30, 2027, the strategic planning work group must develop and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a comprehensive 10-year strategic plan to increase statewide access to adequate and appropriate community-based services and supports for infants, children, youth, young adults, and adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities, and their families and caregivers.(iii) Staffing for the work group shall be provided by the department.(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($156,314,000))Â Â Â Â Â $149,447,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($151,860,000))Â Â Â Â Â $142,110,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($256,720,000))Â Â Â Â Â $242,332,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($19,501,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,332,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($584,395,000))Â Â Â Â Â $553,221,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.(b) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(((c) Sufficient appropriations are provided for the department to support the transition of individuals residing at Rainier School or the three other residential habilitation centers, into appropriate alternative residential settings, should those facilities be closed. The department shall ensure that each affected individual is offered a meaningful choice of alternative placements, including other residential habilitation centers, supported living arrangements, state operated living alternatives, adult family homes, skilled nursing facilities, or other community-based settings. When transitioning individuals, the department shall prioritize client choice, autonomy, individual preferences, medical and behavioral health care needs, and opportunities for community integration. The department shall develop individualized transition plans in collaboration with each resident, their family or legal guardian, caregivers, and support providers. The department shall coordinate closely with other state agencies, local entities, health care providers, and community stakeholders to ensure seamless transitions. The funding provided shall cover all costs associated with assessments, planning, relocation expenses, necessary housing modifications, staff training, crisis support, and related transition activities. Additionally, the department shall implement robust oversight and accountability measures, regularly monitoring transition outcomes, individual well-being and satisfaction.))(c) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a plan to implement a pilot program to allow certain clients with a developmental disability, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020, who are served by the department, who live in community settings, and whose behavioral or medical acuity prevents them from accessing routine community dental care, to access dental services at residential habilitation centers. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.(i) The department shall work with the health care authority to identify the best enrollment and billing path for the dental clinics at residential habilitation centers to serve clients with intellectual or developmental disabilities who live in community settings.(ii) The plan may present multiple options, but it must include a primary option that bases capacity and cost estimates on maximizing the existing physical footprint of residential habilitation center dental clinics, short of any capital improvements or facility expansions. To inform the pilot program, the plan must evaluate the clinics' ability to serve clients across various acuity levels, including identifying which clients can receive direct dental treatment at the centers and which require triage, assessment, and care coordination for a referral to specialized providers for higher-level interventions.(iii) The plan must contain the following:(A) Necessary cost information;(B) Estimates of how much costs could be recovered per client and in aggregate through insurance, fees, medicaid billing, or other options;(C) Information on which options might require additional billing technology and a detailed explanation of why existing health care authority billing pathways cannot be utilized;(D) Recommendations for statutory changes; and(E) Identification of any necessary updates to the state plan approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.(3) PROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($3,714,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,349,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,774,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,282,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($4,267,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,615,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,755,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,246,000(4) SPECIAL PROJECTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$68,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$71,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,094,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,233,000Sec. 204. 2025 c 424 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâAGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,688,279,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,751,204,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,884,087,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,006,158,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($6,839,614,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,159,718,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($122,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $122,540,000Traumatic Brain Injury AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,204,000Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$133,360,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($214,874,000))Â Â Â Â Â $230,866,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,889,959,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,411,050,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $376.54 for fiscal year 2026 and may not exceed (($394.32))$382.37 for fiscal year 2027. Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to partially implement the case mix adjustment methodology to adjust rates of individual facilities for case mix changes as specified in RCW 74.46.485 and stay within the specific budget dials. The weighted average nursing facility payment rates in this subsection (1) include the following: $35,436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $39,028,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a facility-specific add-on to help mitigate for the removal of one-time rate increases provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in an amount that does not exceed the fiscal year 2026 weighted average nursing facility payment rate referenced in this subsection.(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(a) The current annual license renewal fee for adult family homes is $450 per bed. A nonrefundable processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged for the initial licensing of each adult family home. In addition, a processing fee of $700 shall be imposed on providers submitting an application for a change of ownership.(b) The current annual license renewal fee for assisted living facilities is $383 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $381 in fiscal year 2027.(c) The current annual license renewal fee for nursing facilities is $814 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $834 per bed in fiscal year 2027.(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.(4) $33,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $80,128,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $143,047,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(5) $10,012,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $23,830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $42,637,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(6) $2,327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,259,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,297,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(7) $1,991,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,637,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $7,090,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 30 cents per hour effective July 1, 2025, and an additional 23 cents per hour effective July 1, 2026.(8) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(9) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.(10) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(11) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.(12) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults, medicaid alternative care, presumptive eligibility, and housing supports, as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures on this initiative.(13) $54,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $64,390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $147,644,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 908 of this act.(14) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(15) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2026 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2027. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(16) (($5,245,000))$4,206,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($5,245,000))$4,263,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.(17) $8,747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $19,878,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2025.(18) A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(19) $1,858,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.(20) $989,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $989,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.(21) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are ((complimentary))complementary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.(22) (($2,807,000))$3,436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($2,811,000))$3,440,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($70,000))$66,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the kinship care support program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) (($863,000))$1,944,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($867,000))$1,944,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.(b) (($1,726,000))$1,492,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($1,734,000))$1,496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($70,000))$66,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for kinship navigators, including an increase in the number of kinship navigators so that each area agency on aging has one kinship navigator and King county has two kinship navigators.(23) $2,574,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,567,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 40 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(24) (($24,848,000))$18,047,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the information technology project for the long-term services and supports trust program((, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act)).(25) $13,982,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,982,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the area agencies on aging to maintain senior nutrition services. This includes, but is not limited to, meals at sites, through pantries, and home-delivery.(26) $3,831,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,859,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $7,187,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the nursing home to community program to increase the rental subsidy base to $1,400 and expand the program by 200 slots.(((28)))(27) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in three areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.(((29)))(28)(a) (($20,662,000))$15,852,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($22,745,000))$22,754,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($43,416,000))$38,621,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the operating costs associated with enhanced service facilities.(b) The department shall broaden the current discharge and referral case management practices for difficult to discharge hospital patients waiting in acute care hospitals to include referrals to all long-term care behavioral health settings, including enhanced services facilities, enhanced adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care with community stability supports contracts or community behavioral health support services, including supportive supervision and oversight and skills development and restoration. These home and community-based providers are contracted to provide various levels of personal care, nursing, and behavior supports for difficult to discharge hospital patients with significant behavior support needs.(c) Patients ready to discharge from acute care hospitals with diagnosed behaviors or behavior history, and a likelihood of unsuccessful placement in other licensed long-term care facilities, a history of rejected applications for admissions, or a history of unsuccessful placements shall be fully eligible for referral to available beds in enhanced services facilities or enhanced adult residential care with contracts that adequately meet the patient's long-term care needs.(d) Previous or current detainment under the involuntary treatment act shall not be a requirement for individuals in acute care hospitals to be eligible for these specialized settings. The department shall develop a standard process for acute care hospitals to refer patients to the department for placement in enhanced services facilities and enhanced adult residential care with contracts to provide behavior support.(((30)))(29) $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,162,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.(((31) $14,447,000))(30) $10,386,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($14,510,000))$12,701,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($28,959,000))$23,103,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle.(((32)))(31) $3,800,000 of the traumatic brain injury accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1848 (traumatic brain injuries). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33)))(32) $3,681,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $3,179,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for adult family homes in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(a) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(((34)))(33) $2,216,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $1,974,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for assisted living facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(b) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(((35)))(34) $3,944,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $3,580,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for nursing facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(c) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(((36)))(35) $438,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5337 (memory care services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(37)))(36) $4,722,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(38)))(37) $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(38) $22,793,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance of the information technology platform for the long-term services and supports trust program.(39) It is the intent of the legislature that savings assumed in this section from relocating offices from leased facilities to state-owned facilities be continued into subsequent fiscal biennia.(40)(a) $17,824,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the health care authority, to implement a program beginning October 1, 2026, to continue services for up to 1,162 individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid coverage for long-term care services due to provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21; and(ii) Are prioritized by the department as clients in residential settings at risk of losing their housing or those with higher levels of acuity.(b) By October 1, 2026, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, shall provide a report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature that includes recommendations for how the program described in (a) of this subsection can achieve savings through a reduction in services or benefits to allow for an increase in enrollment capacity.(41) $452,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $456,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to restructure rates for adult day services and to provide a 10 percent rate increase. The department must restructure rates from three geographic regions into two geographic regions that includes one region for King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and a second region for all other counties.Sec. 205. 2025 c 424 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($761,681,000))Â Â Â Â Â $713,684,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($710,910,000))Â Â Â Â Â $761,686,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($1,910,479,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,880,094,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,002,000Administrative Contingency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,500,000Domestic Violence Prevention AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,404,000Employment Service Administrative AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$17,500,000Information Technology Investment RevolvingNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,900,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,394,476,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,410,770,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) (($201,111,000))$149,164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($183,932,000))$131,476,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($868,255,000))$867,641,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $15,500,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation, and (($4,000,000))$26,500,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.(b) (($530,530,000))$469,061,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.(c)(i) $167,934,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.(ii) $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in (c)(i) of this subsection is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.(ii) On December 1st of each year of the biennium the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.(f)(i) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, (($136,939,000))$131,391,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead.(ii) Within existing resources, the department must complete system enhancements necessary to implement strategies to achieve the federal temporary assistance for needy families program's work participation rate.(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.(ii) The department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.(h) On January 2nd and July 1st of each year, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.(i) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.(2) $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for naturalization services.(3) $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.(4) On January 1st of each year, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be 100 percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.(8) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.(9) $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program.(10) (($4,984,000))$3,489,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($4,406,000))$5,948,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($17,548,000))$17,501,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the alignment of eligibility rules in accordance with federal center for medicare and medicaid services' regulations in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.112(b) and in coordination with the health benefit exchange. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(11) Within existing resources, a revised integrated eligibility and enrollment roadmap and schedule will be created to accommodate eligibility rule updates that are necessary to meet the federal center for medicare and medicaid services' regulations.(12) (($1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,980,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.(13)))(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors in order to address financial hardship and support household well-being. Stabilization funds can be used to support the sponsorship household with costs of housing, childcare, transportation, internet and data services, household goods, legal services, and other unmet needs. The funds may be provided on behalf of an unaccompanied child when the following eligibility criteria are met:(i) The unaccompanied child is between the ages of 0-17, has been placed in Washington under the care of a nonparental sponsor following release from the United States office of refugee resettlement custody, and has not been reunified with a parent; and(ii) The sponsorship household demonstrates financial need and has an income below 250 percent of the federal poverty level. A sponsorship household receiving stabilization funds on behalf of a child who turns 18 may continue to receive funds for an additional 60 days after the child reaches 18 years of age.(c) The department may work with community-based organizations to administer sponsorship stabilization supports. Up to 10 percent of the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection may be used by the community-based organizations to cover administrative expenses associated with the distribution of these supports.(d) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, up to $150,000 ((is))in fiscal year 2026 and up to $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to cover the administrative resources necessary for the department to administer the sponsorship stabilization program.(((14)))(13) $185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to meet the terms of its settlement agreement with the United States department of agriculture (USDA), specifically to fund employment and training program services and activities targeted to able-bodied adults without dependents receiving food benefits from the USDA supplemental nutrition assistance program, but open to all basic food employment and training participants including participants who are not able-bodied adults without dependents.(((15)))(14)(a) $1,140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,141,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to fully integrate the asset verification system into the automated client eligibility system (ACES).(b) $716,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $265,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the maintenance and operation costs for the fully integrated asset verification system.(((16)))(15)(a) $6,911,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($4,924,000))$7,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($11,837,000))$13,974,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer program for the summer break months following the 2024-25 ((and)), 2025-26, and 2026-27 school years. The program implementation must align with the federal summer electronic benefit program requirements defined in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). ((The department may use a third-party entity to administer the program through March of 2027.))(b) Within existing resources, the department must submit a report by September 12, 2025, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor that includes detailed estimates of the cost and timeline to administer the summer electronic benefit transfer program within the community services division. The report shall also include a comparison of the potential benefits and risks of administering the program within the division or through using a vendor and any recommendations the department may have.(c) Within existing resources, the agency must complete a competitive request for proposal for a third-party contractor to administer the summer electronic benefit program.(((17)))(16)(a) $25,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $25,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to expand support services for individuals newly arriving to the United States and Washington who do not qualify for federal refugee resettlement program services. Support services include, but are not limited to, housing assistance, food, transportation, childhood education services, education and employment supports, connection to legal services, language translation or interpretation services, and social services navigation.(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, up to $810,000 for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and up to $810,000 in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing at the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to cover the administrative expenses of implementing this subsection.(c) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, up to $750,000 of the fiscal year 2026 appropriation is provided solely to support health-related information and referral services for Washington residents impacted by data sharing of health and health care information in the apple health program.(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, up to $500,000 of the fiscal year 2026 appropriation and up to $500,000 of the fiscal year 2027 appropriation may be used for language translation or interpretation services at community services offices.(e) Following consultation with the governor's office, the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection may be used for individuals in Washington who have arrived in the United States and are affected by recent changes in federal immigration policies and procedures.(((18)))(17) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the department must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that shows the prior fiscal year's call and lobby wait times by month and queue, number of customer contacts by month and queue, processing times for the various queues for the three most recent fiscal years along with an explanation for any changes to the most recent year's processing times, number of filled public benefit specialists 3 positions and vacancies by month, any available wait time impacts associated with the individual technology solution enhancements, any telephonic savings experienced due to fewer customers waiting on hold, and recommendations to continue reducing customer wait times.(((19)))(18) Within existing resources, the department shall assess the ongoing feasibility of continuing services with a third-party employment verification vendor. A report shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by September 12, 2025, that includes the following:(a) A detailed overview of the current employment verification process, including the general instances in which employment verification is deemed necessary, when the third-party vendor is used to complete this task and who completes the verification;(b) Current cost of the third-party vendor along with projected rate increases;(c) Available options to reduce the ongoing cost of using a third-party vendor for employment verification services, including but not limited to an inventory of available vendors and their rates and ways to streamline employment verification costs by reducing duplicative or unnecessary searches;(d) Costs and risks associated with using in-house services to verify employment instead of using a third-party vendor; and(e) Recommendations of cost-effective and sustainable employment verification options.(((20)))(19) $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21)))(20) $192,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $163,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $465,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the expansion of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program tribal eligibility determination project to an additional five tribes.(21) $464,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $286,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $720,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for system enhancements and staffing necessary to implement the federally mandated interstate data matching system for the supplemental nutrition assistance program.(22)(a) $2,491,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,832,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,596,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the staffing necessary to address the increased workload associated with changes made to work requirements for able-bodied adults without dependents through H.R. 1 (P.L. 119-21), and the corresponding impacts to the state food assistance program.(b) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $2,061,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $2,000,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of the basic food employment and training program.(23) $106,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $582,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $370,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the increased staff necessary to conduct quality control reviews for the supplemental nutrition assistance program and to focus on reducing the state's payment error rate associated with changes made through H.R. 1 (P.L. 119-21).(24) $3,026,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $8,748,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $3,900,000 of the information technology investment revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a 12-month increase in contractor support for the automated client eligibility system to implement necessary system enhancements and expand system capacity.(25) $622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,465,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,308,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of a community engagement hub and other provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21. The administration must collaborate on the implementation of the community engagement hub with the health care authority, health benefit exchange, workforce training and education coordinating board, and other workforce development partners. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(26) $2,150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for food banks to provide food during the November 2025 federal government shutdown.Sec. 206. 2025 c 424 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâVOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($25,410,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,276,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($25,958,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,518,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($121,507,000))Â Â Â Â Â $121,403,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($172,875,000))Â Â Â Â Â $171,197,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to federally recognized tribes of Washington to support culturally appropriate vocational rehabilitation services and adaptive technologies for tribal members with disabilities who are seeking employment.(((3)))(2) $3,208,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education services) to extend client services to students through the school year students turn 22. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 207. 2025 c 424 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâSPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($80,354,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,109,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($80,835,000))Â Â Â Â Â $77,364,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($161,189,000))Â Â Â Â Â $157,473,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(2) $8,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to ensure effective communication with patients with hearing disabilities in the department's custody and comply with the terms of the settlement agreement with the United States department of justice.Sec. 208. 2025 c 424 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($124,811,000))Â Â Â Â Â $126,423,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($125,044,000))Â Â Â Â Â $179,886,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($152,146,000))Â Â Â Â Â $173,248,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($402,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $479,557,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(2) $399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $508,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as provided in section 907 of this act.(3) $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $161,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4)(a) (($931,000))$411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,020,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($9,839,000))$10,034,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d)(i) The department must collaborate with the department of corrections and the health care authority and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department of social and health services agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(iii) The information provided to the authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(iv) The requirements of the quarterly report are provided in section 211(58) of this act.(5) $1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $978,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,772,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.(6) $497,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for maintenance of the facility, property, and assets at the Brockmann campus located in Clark county.(7) $347,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the office of fraud and accountability to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2689 (working connect. child care), including for increased support to investigate potential child care subsidy fraud identified by auditors. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 209. 2025 c 424 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâPAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($82,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,766,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($68,511,000))Â Â Â Â Â $102,803,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($67,585,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,049,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($219,060,000))Â Â Â Â Â $252,618,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.Sec. 210. 2025 c 424 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY(1)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1st of each fiscal year to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.(4) The health care authority shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The authority shall require contracted entities to notify the authority promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(5) The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be extended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the authority may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast and utilization assumptions, the authority may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.(6) At least 30 calendar days prior to a change in program policies or procedures which the authority determines is likely to have an adverse impact to a majority of that program's clients, the authority shall communicate the change to impacted persons. The authority may leverage multiple communication platforms and diverse methods to communicate the change under this subsection. In cases where the change in program policies or procedures must be implemented in a time frame that renders 30-day advance notice infeasible, the authority shall make efforts to notify impacted persons as soon as possible. The authority shall partner with community-based organizations, tribes, and state and local agencies to share information broadly, prioritizing language access where possible.Sec. 211. 2025 c 424 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâMEDICAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($3,297,488,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,523,330,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,238,506,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,510,064,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($20,698,162,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,178,364,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,799,623,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,543,801,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .(($19,780,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,623,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($20,850,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,764,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,086,000Hospital Safety Net Assessment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,811,036,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,832,346,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,142,000((Medicaid Access Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$35,000,000))Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($540,000))Â Â Â Â Â $559,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,610,000))Â Â Â Â Â $786,000Telebehavioral Health Access AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,608,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,368,000Ambulance Transport FundâState Appropriation. . . .(($12,368,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,031,000Information Technology Investment RevolvingNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,600,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($30,967,799,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,675,864,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver as set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section began July 1, 2023.(2)(a) (($657,598,000))$608,495,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($207,273,000))$273,495,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) (($557,333,000))$618,440,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($227,643,000))$252,603,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use ((the))this medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver ((and may not pursue its use for other purposes)). Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate, general fundâfederal, or general fundâlocal moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2026.(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.(e) The authority shall coordinate with the accountable communities of health to assist with public outreach and enrollment assistance for clients at risk of losing medicaid or health care coverage due to provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21.(3) (($146,275,000))$133,418,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($146,290,000))$133,441,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) $131,704,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $58,916,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) $62,475,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $44,275,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for additional housing supports described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.(5)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for supported employment services and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.(b) The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no less than quarterly on expenditures and utilization data for both supportive housing and employment services under this subsection.(6)(a) (($4,534,000))$461,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($6,370,000))$3,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($157,866,000))$75,501,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($91,178,000))$54,058,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for prerelease services including, but not limited to, case management, clinical consultations, medication assisted therapy, community health worker services, 30-day supply of medications, durable medical equipment, medications, laboratory services, and radiology services.(b) The authority shall coordinate with the department of corrections for prison reentry implementation pursuant to the waiver terms. The authority will coordinate with tribes, other state agencies, and jail administrations as necessary to achieve the terms of the section 1115 medicaid transformation waiver. The authority shall use its statutory reentry advisory work group and subgroups as necessary to coordinate with partners to achieve these goals.(7) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).(8) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(9) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.(10) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.(11) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.(12) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.(13) $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,522,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.(15) $7,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.(16) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. ((The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1st of each fiscal year that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program.)) During fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain 100 percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and 100 percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2025-2027 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within 11 months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.(17) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide ongoing support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.(18) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.(19) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2026, that delineates the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The report should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.(20) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.(21) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.(22) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(23) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.(24) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $180,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.(27) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.(28) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fundâstate payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(29) For any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.(30) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.(31) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:(a) Are 19 years of age;(b) Are at or below 260 percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.(32) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:(a) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;(b) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;(c) Work with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and(d) Work with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.(33)(a) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(b) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.(d) For each fiscal year, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers.(e) For each fiscal year, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.(35)(((a))) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority for the reimbursement of services provided by doulas for apple health clients.(36)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the authority to contract with an external organization for a statewide doula hub and referral system.(b) The authority shall continue to collaborate with an external organization for participatory and equity-focused engagement with doulas and doula partners across the state of Washington. This organization must work in collaboration with community partners who advance equitable access to improve perinatal outcomes and care through holistic services for multiracial communities.(c) The external organization will be responsible for implementing a statewide doula hub and referral system consistent with the recommendations for the design of a statewide doula hub and referral system report done in partnership with the authority.(d) The authority and the external organization will continue to collaborate on how to:(i) Provide statewide professional and workforce development and sustainability support for birth doulas;(ii) Increase statewide access to doula services for apple health birthing people;(iii) Assist doulas with department of health credentialing requirements;(iv) Assist doulas with the medicaid provider enrollment process including, but not limited to, support with:(A) Provider enrollment with the authority;(B) Contracting with medicaid managed care organizations;(C) Provider billing and claims submission processes;(D) Provider payment requirements; and(E) Eligibility within ProviderOne; and(v) Establish communications with birthing people, families, birth workers, and health care providers who are seeking to connect with state-certified and medicaid-enrolled birth doulas through a statewide directory or referral system.(((36)))(37) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(((37)))(38) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.(((38)))(39) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.(((39)))(40) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.(((40)))(41) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.(((41)))(42) $2,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $9,280,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for reimbursement for community health worker services.(((42)))(43) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization. This coverage must be provided to apple health clients enrolled in both fee-for-service and managed care programs.(((43)))(44) Sufficient funds are provided in this section to maintain access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates.(((44)))(45) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for work required of the authority as specified in RCW 41.05.840.(((45)))(46)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an outpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Maintain the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iii) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(((46)))(47)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an inpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iii) Increase medicaid payments for hospital inpatient services provided by UW Medicine and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.(((47)))(48) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers based on the rates in effect as of July 1, 2022.(((48)))(49)(a) $11,838,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $11,838,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, shall determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.(c) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under a 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.(d) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to implement the community information exchange program. The technology solution chosen by the health care authority should be capable of interoperating with other state funded systems in Washington and should be able to electronically refer individuals to services using a closed-loop referral process. Funding for the community information exchange program is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((49)))(50) Sufficient funds in this section are provided for staff dedicated to data review, analysis, and management, and policy analysis in support of the health care cost transparency board as described in chapter 70.390 RCW.(((50)))(51)(a) (($1,610,000))$786,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and (($1,572,000))$766,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the planning phase of the 988 technology platform implementation project.(b) The authority must actively collaborate with Washington technology solutions and the department of health so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(c) By October 1, 2025, the authority must provide an update to legislative fiscal committees with the following details:(i) An identified technology solution, with a list of functionalities and the statutory requirement met by each functionality;(ii) Software, processes, and methods currently used by call centers and designated 988 contact hubs that the proposed technology platform would replace;(iii) The number of call centers and designated 988 contact hubs planning to transition all work processes to the proposed technology platform; and(iv) Identified risks and changes to the schedule and scope of the project.(d) The amounts in (a) of this subsection are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act.(52)(a) (($71,376,000))$54,422,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($70,976,000))$59,404,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) No later than January 1, 2027, the authority must transition the program described in (a) of this subsection from a managed care to a fee-for-service service delivery model.(f) On January 1, 2027, the authority shall open enrollment for 5,000 individuals.(g) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount allowable for the purposes of this program.(h) By October 1, 2026, the authority shall provide a report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature that includes recommendations for how the program described in (a) of this subsection can achieve savings through a reduction in services or benefits to allow for an increase in enrollment capacity.(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall make administrative and system changes in anticipation of receiving federal authority to provide continuous eligibility for children ages zero to six covered though the apple health children's health insurance program. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the section 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(54) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives.(55)(a) The authority shall collaborate with the University of Washington on a supplemental payment program for the family medicine residency network as a supplement to the family medical education funding with additional federal funding.(b) The authority shall provide a recommendation and report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2025. The recommendation shall include how the supplemental payment program can improve the following:(i) Fiscal support for graduate medical education training;(ii) Access to quality health care services;(iii) The state's ability to ensure that medicaid graduate medical education funding supports the state's workforce development goals; and(iv) Health care access for underserved populations and regions.(56)(a) $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $165,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in consultation with tribes, as required under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 431.408(b), to apply for a section 1115 waiver no later than ((December 31, 2025))July 1, 2026, to provide coverage of traditional health care practices.(b) Following consultation with tribes as described in (a) of this subsection, the authority shall provide a financing recommendation to the governor's office and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2026.(57) $7,407,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($7,628,000))$11,442,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($26,468,000))$33,183,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue the health homes program from January 1, 2026, through December 31, ((2026))2027.(58)(a) (($25,158,000))$12,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,502,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $9,600,000 of the information technology investment revolving accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($101,647,000))$65,231,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d) The authority must ensure the development of the statewide electronic health records solution includes consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(e) The authority must work collaboratively with the department of corrections agency project team, the department of social and health services agency project team, and the health care authority agency project team who are the state agencies included in the statewide electronic health records solution project and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for this project.(f) Beginning July 1, 2025, the authority shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. The written report must also include detail summarized for the entire statewide electronic health records solution, and also delineated by each separate component technology budget, which are: Enterprise foundational system, department of corrections, department of social and health services, and the health care authority. The written report must also include:(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables scheduled for that quarter, including those accomplished and the amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month and fund source;(ii) The contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the next contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month and fund source;(iii) The budget spending plan compared to actual spending by fiscal month and fund source, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month and fund source for the next quarter; and(iv) An accounting of any deliverables that were changed in the last quarter, and any plans to change future deliverables, to include what the deliverable was, what the new deliverable is, why it was or will be missed, and what the revised deliverable date is.(59)(a) (($379,000))$1,518,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year ((2026))2027 and (($1,258,000))$3,403,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d)(i) The authority must collaborate with the department of corrections and the department of social and health services and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, the health care authority agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(iii) The information provided to the authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(iv) The requirements of the quarterly report are listed in subsection (58) of this section.(((61)))(60) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($330,000))$498,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($786,000))$1,554,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to comply with federal eligibility rule changes required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((62)))(61) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is)), $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $98,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care.(((63)))(62)(a) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, no later than October 1, 2025, to convene negotiations with representatives of primary care providers to develop budget-neutral, value-based prospective payment methodologies for primary care services provided to apple health enrollees, with the goal of entering into arrangements appropriate to each primary care delivery system no later than calendar year 2027. The authority shall prioritize the development of methodologies that grow capacity to provide comprehensive, whole person care. This includes, but is not limited to, promoting workforce stability, team-based delivery models, accountability for quality outcomes, equity-based care, and improvements in population health.(b) The authority shall, at a minimum, convene negotiations with representatives of the statewide associations representing the following categories of providers to develop budget-neutral payment methodologies that maximize access and quality for medicaid patients and are appropriate to their respective primary care delivery systems:(i) Family physicians;(ii) Pediatricians; and(iii) Federally qualified health centers.(((64) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $43,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (SNF & rehab network adequacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(65)))(63) $1,724,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $6,068,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority in coordination with the department of social and health services to develop and implement a Katie Beckett section 1115 demonstration waiver. The authority shall limit enrollment to 1,000 clients during the waiver period. Based upon the experience developed during the waiver period, the authority shall make recommendations to the legislature for a future tax equity and fiscal responsibility act state plan option.(((66)))(64) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a managed care organization for an enhanced case management pilot program to expand resources for patients with post-acute care transitions. The managed care organization must cover the largest number of apple health clients in the state and implement the pilot program with a hospital in Columbia county. The pilot program must provide continuous support for 31 days post-discharge including, but not limited to:(a) Transportation;(b) Transitional housing assistance;(c) Rehabilitation referrals and coordination;(d) Safety net program navigation and enrollment;(e) Transitional primary care; and(f) 24-hour clinic phone support.(((67)))(65) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(68)))(66)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals in financial distress or at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to a low-volume of deliveries at the hospital.(b) To qualify for these grants, a hospital must:(i) Be located in Washington and not be part of a system of three or more hospitals;(ii) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;(iii) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as the most current complete calendar year data;(iv) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;(v) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and(vi) Be at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to:(A) A low-volume of deliveries at the hospital described in (c)(i) of this subsection; or(B) Serving a high percentage of individuals covered by public payers as described in (c)(ii) of this subsection.(c) The grants must be distributed in amounts not to exceed $150,000 per hospital to:(i) A hospital that had fewer than 200 births funded by medicaid in the hospital's labor and delivery unit in the previous calendar year according to health care authority records and is located in a municipality with a population between 9,000 and 12,000; and(ii) A public district hospital that had fewer than 250 births funded by public payers, including medicaid, tricare, and medicare, in the hospital's labor and delivery unit in the previous calendar year and is located on an island in Skagit county.(((69) $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $63,385,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $35,000,000 of the medicaid access program accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1392 (medicaid access program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(70)))(67) The amounts appropriated in this section are not sufficient to include coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss under state or federally funded medical assistance programs. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature.(68) $5,069,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $32,200,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of a community engagement hub and other provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21. The authority must collaborate on the implementation of the community engagement hub with the department of social and health services, health benefit exchange, and other workforce development partners. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(69) $282,000 of the telebehavioral health access accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2254 (partnership access line). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(70) $2,228,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department of corrections' statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The state match is appropriated to the department of corrections as referenced in section 230(7)(i) of this act. The authority and the department of corrections must coordinate on the coding used to allot and record expenditures. This federal funding must be reflected in the department of corrections' technology budget, which will show both the federal funding from the authority and the state funding from the department of corrections.(71) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse rural emergency hospitals based on allowable costs incurred during the year, effective the date the hospital becomes designated by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as a rural emergency hospital. The authority shall seek a state plan amendment recognizing rural emergency hospitals and reimbursing the rural emergency hospitals based on allowable costs incurred during the year, effective the date the hospital became designated a rural emergency hospital.(72) $24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $41,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $19,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5915 (health technology assessment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(73) $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $842,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6194 (allowable costs/hospital). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(74) $100,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $100,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in cooperation with managed care organizations, public hospital districts, and publicly owned or operated health care entities, to develop a new medicaid quality improvement program that advances the state's strategic program initiatives. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation.(75) $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5981 (340b drug pricing program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(76) $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $51,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $336,000 of the telebehavioral health access accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to restore reductions taken to the partnership access line and associated programs taken in fiscal year 2027. Beginning July 1, 2026, the authority is also required to increase contracted funding amounts for the partnership access line and associated programs consistent with the 2025-27 omnibus appropriations act.(77) Within the amounts provided in this section, the authority shall assist the department of children, youth, and families in reimbursing providers in accordance with state and federal requirements, including part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act and Title XIX of the federal social security act. By December 1, 2026, the authority and the department of children, youth, and families shall jointly report to the legislature the following information, delineated by early intervention service provider:(a) An unduplicated count of children served;(b) Total state funding reimbursed including, but not limited to, the state share of any payments under Title XIX or XXI of the social security act;(c) Total federal funding reimbursed including, but not limited to, any public insurance;(d) Other funding expended for qualifying services, which may include private insurance, fees, family contributions, grants, philanthropy, or other fund sources that are available; and(e) An assessment of whether service providers are fully leveraging federal and other nonstate funding for qualifying services, including billing applicable funding sources such as public and private insurance and family fees such as copayments and deductibles prior to using state and federal funds for early intervention services, as required by WAC 110-400-0140.(78) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, must address the recommendations of the office of the Washington state auditor's performance audit examining Washington's concurrent medicaid enrollments published in October 2024. The authority and department must:(a) Collaborate to ensure that the department notifies the authority when individuals who are enrolled in both the income-based medicaid program and other income-based programs determined by both the department and the authority, including but not limited to the food stamp program as outlined in RCW 74.04.510, have moved out of the state. The authority and the department shall consult and seek recommendations from caseworkers and other relevant frontline staff to more effectively and efficiently identify individuals who have moved out of the state.(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, the authority shall amend contracts and processes with the managed care organizations to:(i) Allow the state to recover premiums when the managed care enrollee has moved out of Washington state and has not received any services in the managed care service area;(ii) Require managed care organizations that conduct business in more than one state to analyze their enrollment records on a monthly basis and identify occurrences when the enrollment records show that the same person is enrolled in more than one state medicaid program; and(iii) Direct the managed care organizations to inform states of the results of the analysis conducted in (c) of this subsection that the same person is concurrently enrolled in their medicaid programs and report those results to the authority on a monthly basis.(c) The authority shall submit a report by June 30, 2027, to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature that details:(i) The amount of premiums recovered from the managed care organizations under the revised contract provisions implemented under this subsection in the previous calendar year; and(ii) The total number of individuals that the managed care organizations have identified as enrolled in more than one state medicaid program from the previous calendar year.(79)(a) The statewide electronic health records project, to include all subprojects, must continue to comply with the currently approved statewide electronic health records plan that includes the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority unless an alternate plan that must include the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority is submitted to the technology services board by August 1, 2026, and approved by the technology services board by September 1, 2026. If an alternate plan is presented to the technology services board, to be considered, it must:(i) Be a plan to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services; and(ii) Include, but not be limited to, the following elements:(A) A comprehensive and complete project schedule to include quantifiable anticipated deliverables that must include start date and estimated completion dates for each milestone, from at least July 1, 2026, through implementation and go-live dates for the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority;(B) An implementation plan for the technology solution from July 1, 2026, through five years maintenance and operations post go-live implementation;(C) Technology budgets to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and subproject, including fund sources and fund splits, and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4) of this act;(D) A comparison of the current approved plan to the proposed alternate plan by subproject and in total through at least go-live and implementation, to include discrete comprehensive comparisons of:(I) Budget;(II) Scope;(III) Schedule;(IV) Technology budgets, that must be compliant with section 701(4) of this act for each of the following subprojects: Enterprise foundational electronic health records system; department of corrections electronic health records; department of social and health services electronic health records; and health care authority electronic health records;(V) Staffing by subproject by fiscal year, by fund, by classification;(VI) Licensing costs by fiscal year, and what is included in that cost and what is not included;(VII) Each identified third party application solution necessary for go live and if the alternate would assume an alternate third party application compared to current plan for each third party application;(VIII) Maintenance and operations cost by fiscal year from go-live through at least five fiscal years to include, but not be limited to, state employee staffing levels and detail of state employee classifications, contracted professional services by contractor name and service provided, and software licenses and subscriptions to include contractor name and software categories; and(IX) Each bucket of cost, of total associated costs, by fiscal year by fund provided in plain language;(E) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;(F) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;(G) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date there is an executed procurement contract after a competitive request for proposal is closed;(H) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly; and(I) The development of the statewide electronic health records solution must include consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(b) The plan and all requirements described in (a) of this subsection:(i) Must be submitted in plain language to the office of financial management, the chair and ranking member of the senate environment, energy, and technology policy committee and the house technology, economic development, and veterans policy committee, the chairs and ranking members of the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the technology services board by August 1, 2026, and must allow for at least 10 business days from the date of submittal of all materials for review before it can be approved; and(ii) Must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board established in RCW 43.105.285 by September 1, 2026, or the previously approved technology services board plan will continue to be completed in full.Sec. 212. 2025 c 424 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâEMPLOYEE AND RETIREE BENEFITS PROGRAMState Health Care Authority Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($46,618,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,813,000School Employees' Insurance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($34,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,324,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($81,118,000))Â Â Â Â Â $85,137,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding benefits during future fiscal biennia and may not be used for administrative expenses. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the appropriate account to be used for insurance benefits.(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the applicable program board. Neither board shall make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. The public employees' benefits board shall not make any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits.(3) Each board shall collect a surcharge payment of $25 per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.(4) $10,000 of the state health care authority administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5915 (health technology assessment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $100,000 of the state health care authority administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a study of options to improve the affordability of retiree health care coverage for pre-medicare-eligible public employees. The study must include an analysis of available state and third-party coverage options, potential mechanisms to lower or offset retiree costs, and a fiscal analysis of the potential impacts to the community-rated public employee benefits risk pools. A report of the findings and recommendations must be submitted to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.Sec. 213. 2025 c 424 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâHEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($8,766,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,966,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($8,609,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,252,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($87,363,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,845,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$350,000Health Benefit Exchange AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($86,030,000))Â Â Â Â Â $87,536,000State Health Care Affordability AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($85,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $110,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($276,118,000))Â Â Â Â Â $313,949,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.(2)(a) By July 15th, October 15th, and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 30 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 30 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 30 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange. By April 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 10 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 10 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 10 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange.(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.(c) Payments made from general fundâstate appropriation and health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.(3) (($75,000,000))$100,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, as established in RCW 43.71.110. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (a) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (b) meets other eligibility criteria as established in RCW 43.71.110(4)(a).(4)(a) $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section, and is contingent upon continued approval of the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.(b) In the event the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120 is suspended, terminated, or otherwise ended, $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(i) Implement a state program with coverage comparable to individual market plans, for customers who would have been eligible under the waiver; and(ii) Provide state premium assistance to state program customers who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (3) of this section.(c) The exchange may establish or designate a separate entity to administer the state program. Administration of the state program must include, but is not limited to, establishing requirements for eligibility, continued participation, and carrier payments.(d) Moneys collected for premiums written on qualified health benefit plans and qualified dental plans offered through the state program must be deposited in the state health care affordability account under RCW 43.71.130, through a procedure established by the exchange that aligns with the requirements of RCW 48.14.0201(5)(b), 48.14.020(2), and 43.71.080.(e) The exchange, and any entity involved in implementing this program, is subject to RCW 43.17.425.(5) (($1,117,000))$1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($1,182,000))$1,254,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($12,510,000))$16,282,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($809,000))$419,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to make improvements to healthplanfinder to comply with federal eligibility rule changes required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(6) $1,000,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the exchange, in collaboration with stakeholders, to begin development starting January 1, 2027, of an automated solution to ensure continuous health care coverage through qualified health plans for medicaid beneficiaries losing medicaid coverage through Washington healthplanfinder and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(7) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $636,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,587,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of a community engagement hub and other provisions of section 71119 of P.L. 119-21. The exchange must collaborate on the implementation of the community engagement hub with the department of social and health services, health care authority, and other workforce development partners. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.Sec. 214. 2025 c 424 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâCOMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,185,242,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,192,787,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,185,284,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,190,759,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,320,820,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,533,992,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($39,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,199,000Criminal Justice Treatment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($27,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,541,000Problem Gambling AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,249,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$28,515,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$28,517,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($77,463,000))Â Â Â Â Â $93,932,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($74,034,000))Â Â Â Â Â $71,309,000Tribal Opioid Prevention and Treatment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,814,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,656,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,986,679,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,234,456,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.(3) $57,910,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $63,090,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $15,804,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.(4) $7,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue diversion grant programs funded through contempt fines pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority must consult with the plaintiffs and court monitor to determine, within the amounts provided, which of the programs will continue to receive funding through this appropriation. The programs shall use this funding to provide assessments, mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, case management, employment, and other social services.(5) $18,891,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $18,561,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $41,062,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.(6) $1,668,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,668,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,040,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.(7) $147,449,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($147,449,000))$144,949,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:(a) $132,924,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $132,924,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program. Within these amounts, behavioral health administrative service organizations must continue a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funds for nonmedicaid services under this section that was originally effective January 1, 2024.(b) $14,524,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($14,525,000))$12,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program.(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.(9) (($2,990,000))$2,953,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($3,029,000))$2,995,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the cost of conducting involuntary act judicial proceedings as follows:(a) $1,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.(b) $504,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $504,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Spokane county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.(c) (($171,000))$134,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($210,000))$176,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Thurston county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the Maple Lane facility.(d) $1,290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations, or both, for the cost of conducting involuntary treatment act commitment hearings at facilities operating within King county. These amounts must be prioritized for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at state-operated facilities including facilities operated by the department of social and health services and the University of Washington center for behavioral health and learning. Any remaining amounts may be used to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations for the cost of other involuntary treatment act commitment hearings provided in other facilities within King county.(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.(11) $2,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided.(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.(13)(a) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health administrative service organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The reserve levels must be informed by the types of risk carried by behavioral health administrative service organizations for mandatory services and also consider reasonable levels of operating reserves. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan. The authority must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, each December of the biennium, the minimum and maximum reserve levels established in contract for each of the behavioral health administrative service organizations for the prior fiscal year and the actual reserve levels reported at the end of the fiscal year.(b) In contracts effective during the fiscal biennium, the authority must allow behavioral health administrative services organizations flexibility in utilizing reserve funding received pursuant to a specific legislative proviso in a prior contract period. Funding repurposed under this subsection must be used to support the duties of the administrative services organization under RCW 71.24.045 through programs serving individuals with severe and persistent behavioral health conditions and behavioral health services that promote stability and recovery within their regional service area. Repurposed funds shall prioritize the core mandated functions that behavioral health administrative services organizations must provide for all residents who need the service or, for residents who are not medicaid enrollees, as described in the authority's model contract for behavioral health administrative services organizations. A behavioral health administrative services organization that wishes to repurpose reserve funding must notify the authority in advance and the authority may require modification of the plan if it determines that the behavioral health administrative services organization has not made a good faith effort to implement prior funding for the purpose for which it was originally provided. The authority must capture information related to behavioral health administrative services organization repurposing of funds under this subsection, including identification of which specific legislative provisos it repurposed funding under this subsection and for what purpose those funds were used, through the revenue and expenditure reporting process. These reports shall describe by how much the state's appropriated funding for core mandated functions fell short of need as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization. The authority must update the revenue and expenditure reporting template and reporting instructions to behavioral health administrative service organizations by September 1, 2025.(14) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.(15) The criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b).(16)(a) $11,590,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,590,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;(v) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;(vi) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;(vii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;(viii) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and(ix) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.(17)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and(iv) Services at the 16-bed evaluation and treatment facility.(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.(18) $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $13,312,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.(19) (($23,900,000))$23,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($23,900,000))$21,220,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($1,000,000))$900,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($8,100,000))$7,290,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to maintain activities to improve outcomes for individuals with behavioral health issues interacting with law enforcement. Of these amounts:(a) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($850,000))$680,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($1,000,000))$900,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($3,600,000))$3,240,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to RCW 36.28A.450.(b) $19,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($19,600,000))$17,640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations to implement the statewide recovery navigator program established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476) and for related technical assistance to support this implementation. This includes funding for recovery navigator teams to provide community-based outreach and case management services based on the law enforcement assisted diversion model and for technical assistance support from the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau. The authority and technical assistance contractor must encourage recovery navigator programs to provide educational information and outreach regarding recovery navigator program services to local retailers that have high levels of retail theft. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (19)(b):(i) $1,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,600,000))$1,440,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 must be allocated to maintain recovery navigator services in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. These amounts must be in addition to the proportion of the allocation of the remaining funds in this subsection the regional behavioral health administrative services organizations serving those counties were allocated pursuant to section 22(1), chapter 311, Laws of 2021.(ii) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,000,000))$1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expanding recovery navigator program services in regions where fiscal year 2026 projected expenditures will exceed revenues provided under this subsection. In allocating these amounts, the authority must prioritize regions where the combined fiscal year recovery navigator program allocations and recovery navigator program reserve balances are inadequate to cover estimated fiscal year expenditures.(c) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop regional recovery navigator program plans pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476), and to establish positions focusing on regional planning to improve access to and quality of regional behavioral health services with a focus on integrated care.(d) $2,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($2,250,000))$1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($4,500,000))$4,050,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for ongoing grants to law enforcement assisted diversion programs under RCW 71.24.589.(e) (($500,000))$400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($500,000))$400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute. This funding must be used for advanced, evidence-based training for law enforcement to improve interactions with individuals who use drugs. The training must be developed so it can be adapted and used statewide to decrease stigmatizing beliefs among law enforcement through positive contact with people who use drugs and improve officer well-being and effectiveness by providing skills and techniques to address the drug overdose epidemic. The institute must develop and refine this training, leveraging prior work, and in partnership with a steering committee that includes people with lived or living experience of substance use disorder and criminal legal involvement, researchers, clinicians, law enforcement officers, and others. The training must complement, but not duplicate, existing curricula already provided by the criminal justice training commission. The institute must pilot the advanced training in a subset of regional law enforcement agencies and evaluate its acceptability and feasibility through participant interviews and pretraining and posttraining ratings of stigmatizing beliefs. The institute must incorporate feedback from the pilot training sessions into a final training program that it must make available to law enforcement agencies across the state.(20) (($1,875,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,875,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $5,400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to provide support for recovery residences. Of these amounts:(a) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with chapter 264, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1528).(b))) $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide grants for the operational costs of new staffed recovery residences which serve individuals with substance use disorders who require more support than a level 1 recovery residence.(21) $6,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($6,510,000))$4,557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($21,602,000))$18,362,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($3,500,000))$2,975,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for support of clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation.(22) $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,598,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).(23) $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($446,000))$223,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $178,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds.(24) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.(25) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.(26) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, before December 30th of each year during the fiscal biennium, that details the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.(27) The authority must pursue opportunities for shifting state costs to the state's unused allocation of federal institutions for mental disease disproportionate share hospital funding.(28) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families. The authority, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, medicaid managed care organizations, and the actuaries responsible for developing medicaid managed care rates, must work to maximize federal funding provided for the children's crisis outreach response system program.(29) (($12,435,000))$9,409,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($13,015,000))$10,095,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($25,450,000))$18,473,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the community children's long-term inpatient program. The number of beds is increased on a phased in basis to ((62))52 beds by the end of fiscal year ((2026))2027 at a bed day rate of $1,121 per day.(30) (($51,103,000))$39,830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($52,933,000))$40,291,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($90,434,000))$76,431,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $1,250 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall establish the medicaid psychiatric per diem payment rate at $1,250 per bed.(f) The authority shall pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for patients committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The enhancement shall be available to all hospital and nonhospital facilities providing services under this subsection except those whose rates are set at 100 percent of their most recent medicare cost report.(g) The authority may pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for individuals with complex medical needs, challenging behaviors often diagnosed with co-occurring intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, dementia, or significant medical issues requiring personal care. The rate enhancement shall be available to providers contracting directly with the authority.(h) Provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.(31) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a one-time grant to Island county to maintain support for a pilot program to improve behavioral health outcomes for young people in rural communities. In administering the pilot program, Island county shall coordinate with school districts, community groups, and health care providers to increase access to behavioral health programs for children and youth aged birth to 24 years of age. The grant funds shall be used to coordinate and expand behavioral health services. The grant funding must not be used to supplant funding from existing programs. No more than 10 percent of the funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by Island county in administering the program. Services that may be provided with the grant funding include, but are not limited to:(a) Support for children and youth with significant behavioral health needs to address learning loss caused by COVID-19 and remote learning;(b) School based behavioral health education, assessment, and brief treatment;(c) Screening and referral of children and youth to long-term treatment services;(d) Behavioral health supports provided by community agencies serving youth year-round;(e) Expansion of mental health first aid, a program designed to prepare adults who regularly interact with youth for how to help people in both crisis and noncrisis mental health situations;(f) Peer support services; and(g) Compensation for the incurred costs of clinical supervisors and internships.(32) $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $988,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington's project extension for community health outcomes (ECHO) and the systemic, therapeutic, assessment, resources, and treatment (START) programs for specialized training and consultation for physicians and professionals to support:(a) Children with developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs;(b) Applied behavior analysis provider training, education, and consultation; and(c) The screening and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.(33) $2,366,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $2,366,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to support community discharge efforts for patients at the state hospitals. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(34) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to maintain and increase the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.(35) $4,087,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($4,087,000))$2,861,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($3,000,000))$2,550,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for alternative response and coresponse services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) (($2,000,000))$1,700,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.(b) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($1,500,000))$1,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($1,000,000))$850,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the provision of behavioral health coresponder services on nonlaw enforcement emergency medical response teams.(c) $2,587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,587,000))$1,811,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:(i) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,000,000))$1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating coresponder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection.(ii) $587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($587,000))$411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support the Whatcom county alternative response team.(36) (($2,404,000))$3,188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($2,637,000))$2,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($6,815,000))$8,224,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for long-term involuntary treatment services in a 16-bed residential treatment facility developed by the Tulalip tribe in Stanwood.(37) $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.(38) (($16,004,000))$17,151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($16,004,000))$17,151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules.(39) $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,980,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone; fentanyl testing and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power when possible. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl.(40) (($2,148,000))$760,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $2,148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely to support individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(41) (($24,684,000))$23,184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($24,559,000))$23,059,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $4,464,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, (($3,500,000))$6,500,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to support the housing needs of individuals with behavioral health disorders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $618,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.(b) $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,748,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and expand access to no barrier, and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(c) $337,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $337,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a rental voucher and bridge program and to implement strategies to reduce instances where an individual leaves a state operated behavioral or private behavioral health facility directly into homelessness. The authority must prioritize this funding for individuals being discharged from state operated behavioral health facilities.(d) (($2,487,000))$2,237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $2,487,000)), $2,237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $500,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. ((Each December of the fiscal biennium, the authority must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving short-term rental supports through the agency budget during the prior fiscal year broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served, including but not limited to age, country of origin within racial/ethnic categories, gender, and immigration status.))(e) $4,211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to three behavioral health administrative services organizations to transition persons who are either being diverted from criminal prosecution to behavioral health treatment services or are in need of housing upon discharge from crisis stabilization services.(f) (($1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $3,500,000))$6,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation((,)) and $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders.(g) $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to implement homeless outreach stabilization teams pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).(h) $2,278,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,153,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $98,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a postinpatient housing program designed for young adults in accordance with the provisions of chapter 175, Laws of 2024 (2SHB 1929). Contracts with the postinpatient housing providers are exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(42) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $482,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division, to implement community behavioral health service data into the existing executive management information system. Of these amounts, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $384,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the research and data analysis division for staff costs associated with this project. The data elements shall be incorporated into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.(43) (($178,000))$117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026((, $58,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027,)) and (($650,000))$739,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue development and implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model for comprehensive behavioral health services. Funding must be used to secure actuarial expertise, conduct research into national data and other state models, including obtaining resources and expertise from the national council for mental well-being certified community behavioral health clinic success center; and engage stakeholders, including representatives of licensed community behavioral health agencies and medicaid managed care organizations, in the process. The authority must conduct a study built on the preliminary report submitted to the legislature in December 2024 that includes:(a) Overviews of options and considerations for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model within Washington state, including participation as a certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration state or for independent statewide implementation;(b) An analysis of the impact of expanding the certified community behavioral health clinic model on the state's behavioral health systems;(c) Relevant federal regulations and options to implement the certified community behavioral health clinic model under those regulations;(d) Options for implementing a prospective payment system methodology;(e) An analysis of the benefits and potential challenges for integrating the certified community behavioral health clinic reimbursement model within an integrated care environment;(f) Actuarial analysis on the costs for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model, including opportunities for leveraging federal funding; and(g) Recommendations to the legislature on a pathway for statewide implementation including a plan for implementation no later than fiscal year 2027 that must include the following:(i) Implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model with clinics that adhere to the program standards under the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration demonstration program established under section 223 of the federal protecting access to medicare act of 2014 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a note), as amended by the bipartisan safer communities act (P.L. 117-159);(ii) Incorporation in the planned funding model of at least one of the prospective payment system methodologies approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;(iii) The plan may allow for the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model to be implemented either by applying for and joining the federal demonstration program referenced in (g)(i) of this subsection, applying to the centers for medicare and medicaid services for a medicaid state plan waiver or amendment, or both;(iv) Continued consultation with the national council for mental wellbeing's certified community behavioral health clinic success center for technical assistance and meaningful opportunities for community behavioral health agencies to participate and offer feedback throughout the implementation process; and(v) Inclusion of services to children, youth, and families through the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model through providers that serve individuals of all ages as well as specialty providers that serve children, youth, and families.(44) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to renew a contract with a Seattle based nonprofit organization with experience matching voluntary specialty care providers with patients in need of care to continue established pro bono counseling and behavioral health services to uninsured and underinsured individuals with incomes below 300 percent of the federal poverty line. The authority must provide the funding pursuant to a contract for documented capacity-building to continue pro bono counseling and behavioral health services. The agreement may require the contracted organization to seek, document, and report to the authority on efforts to leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to provide sustained operational support for the program.(45) $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue to support the children and youth behavioral health work group to consider and develop longer term strategies and recommendations regarding the delivery of behavioral health services for children, transitioning youth, and their caregivers pursuant to chapter 76, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1890).(46) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the authority to continue a contract to provide information and support related to safe housing and support services for youth exiting inpatient mental health and/or substance use disorder facilities to stakeholders, inpatient treatment facilities, young people, and other community providers that serve unaccompanied youth and young adults.(47) $3,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,814,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $5,248,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with opioid treatment providers to operate mobile methadone units to address treatment gaps statewide. Within the amounts provided, the authority must provide service support subsidies to all mobile methadone units including those that began operations prior to fiscal year 2024. The authority must work with the actuaries responsible for setting medicaid managed care rates to explore options for creating a specific rate for mobile medication units that reflects the unique costs of these programs.(48)(a) (($5,753,000))$5,978,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($5,753,000))$6,055,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to continue a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) No later than January 1, 2027, the authority must transition the program described in (a) of this subsection from a managed care to a fee-for-service service delivery model.(f) Beginning January 1, 2027, the authority shall open enrollment for 5,000 individuals.(g) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount that may be expended for the purposes of this program.(h) By October 1, 2026, the authority shall provide a report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature that includes recommendations for how the program described in (a) of this subsection can achieve savings through a reduction in services or benefits to allow for an increase in enrollment capacity.(49)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the department of social and health services for staffing costs related to tracking behavioral health community capacity through the community behavioral health executive management information system and providing annual reports on the implementation of new behavioral health community capacity.(b) The department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority must cooperate with the department of social and health services in collecting and providing the data necessary to incorporate tracking of behavioral health beds into the behavioral health executive management information system and to prepare the required reports. The agencies must work to ensure they are using consistent definitions in classifying behavioral health bed types for the purpose of reporting capacity and utilization.(c) The authority and the department of social and health services must continue tracking behavioral health bed utilization for medicaid and state funded clients by type of bed in the executive management information system. The department of commerce shall identify to the department of social and health services all providers that have received funding through their capital grant program since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The department of social and health services must incorporate tracking of services by provider including an element to identify providers that have received funding through the capital budget so that reports can be provided related to the average daily client counts for medicaid and state funded clients being served by provider and by facility type.(d) The department of social and health services, in coordination with the department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority, must submit an annual report each November of the fiscal biennium to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provides the following information for each facility that has received funding through the capital budget: (i) The amount received by the state and the total project cost; (ii) the facility address; (iii) the number of new beds or additional bed capacity by the service type being provided; (iv) the utilization of the additional beds by medicaid or state funded clients by service type; and (v) a comparison of capacity to demand by service type by geographical region of the state.(50) $3,045,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $172,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $2,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation, and $5,041,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder and alcohol use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails.(51) (($55,988,000))$66,269,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington to evaluate and determine criteria for the current population of state hospital patients, committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, who can be effectively treated at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility.(52) $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $264,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(53) (($36,306,000))$33,581,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and $21,410,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement the provisions of chapter 454, Laws of 2023 (E2SHB 1134). Within these amounts, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to:(a) Provide grants to new or existing mobile rapid response teams and to community-based crisis teams to support efforts for meeting the standards and criteria for receiving an endorsement pursuant to provisions of the bill. In awarding grants under this subsection, the authority must prioritize funding for proposals that demonstrate experience and strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services;(b) Expand and enhance regional crisis services provided by mobile crisis teams and community-based crisis teams either endorsed or seeking endorsement pursuant to standards adopted by the authority; and(c) Provide performance payments to mobile rapid response teams and community-based crisis teams that receive endorsements pursuant to chapter 454, Laws of 2023 (E2SHB 1134).(54) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Spanish language opioid prevention services.(55) (($16,814,000))$21,656,000 of the tribal opioid prevention and treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to pass through to tribes and urban Indian health programs for opioid and overdose response activities. The funding must be used for prevention, outreach, treatment, recovery support services, and other strategies to address and mitigate the effects of the misuse and abuse of opioid related products. The authority must provide the tribes and urban Indian health programs the latitude to use the funding as they see fit to benefit their communities, provided the activities are allowable under the terms of the opioid settlement agreements.(56) Within existing resources, the authority shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to develop a new program for individuals admitted to a state hospital for purposes of civil commitment under RCW 10.77.086. The program must prioritize the use of assisted outpatient treatment resources for eligible individuals and draw upon existing programs, including the program of assertive community treatment and the governor's opportunity for supportive housing program to provide wraparound services for individuals who may be ready to quickly return to the community following an admission.(57) $6,700,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $700,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for the support of an opioid recovery and care access center in Seattle. The contractor must be an established Seattle based behavioral health provider that has developed a partnership for the project and has leveraged additional operations and research funding from other sources. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(58) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to increase access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine products. The authority must use these funds to cover the cost and administration of the drug for uninsured individuals that do not qualify for other state or federal health insurance programs.(59) $4,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for bridge funding grants to community behavioral health agencies participating in federal certified community behavioral health clinic expansion grant programs to sustain their continued level of operations following expiration of federal grant funding during the planning process for adoption of the certified community behavioral health clinic model statewide.(60) (($3,066,000))$415,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($5,446,000))$5,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($3,457,000))$3,928,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for community behavioral health services to be provided at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(61) $3,884,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,984,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $15,398,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation ((is))are provided solely for startup, implementation, and nonmedicaid operational funding for ((three)) crisis relief centers and crisis stabilization units beginning operations in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Funding must be distributed to behavioral health administrative services organizations based on the actual and projected number of facilities operating in the region. ((The authority must undergo a competitive solicitation process for this funding that takes into account geographic needs, regional capacity, and operational readiness, and must prioritize providers with limited access to other funding sources and who are projected to have the shortest timelines to utilize funding and begin operations. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $8,536,000 is provided solely for startup grants for hiring, facility improvements, and other costs necessary to begin providing services to clients.(b) $4,925,000 is provided solely for six-month operational subsidies for crisis centers that have begun operations as a bridge to providing services at full capacity.(c) $1,937,000 is provided for reimbursement for crisis relief center services provided to individuals not covered by the state medicaid program.))(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the authority to develop and submit a report detailing a statewide implementation roadmap and funding plan for crisis relief centers and crisis stabilization units to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026. The plan must include:(i) An inventory of all existing, contracted, and planned facilities;(ii) A complete analysis of current and projected funding sources; and identification of nonmedicaid funding gaps for uninsured and underinsured populations;(iii) An implementation timeline aligned with funding availability;(iv) Costs to operate stand-alone and combined 23-hour crisis relief centers and crisis stabilization units;(v) The impact of providing urgent care services at facilities; and(vi) Criteria ensuring no new facility is procured or contracted without identified sustainable operating funds, including nonmedicaid funding sufficient to support operations.(b) As part of its 2027 supplemental and 2027-2029 biennial operating budget requests to the governor, the authority must request funding for nonmedicaid costs that exceed resources available to behavioral health administrative services organizations in 23-hour crisis relief centers, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and crisis stabilization units, as defined in RCW 71.05.020, that have opened or are expected to open during the fiscal biennium in their services area.(62) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a one-time grant to a nonprofit organization for start-up costs and to provide services to medicaid clients and uninsured clients in a crisis stabilization facility located in Skagit county.(63) (($9,500,000))$8,250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for health engagement hub pilot program sites in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5536). The authority may use funding within this subsection to contract for technical assistance and evaluation activities associated with the pilot program.(64) (($328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $656,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement chapter 360, Laws of 2024 (2SHB 2320).(65) $2,650,000))$1,325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $2,650,000)), $1,325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,650,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue contracts with King county, Kitsap county, Tacoma, Everett, and Spokane for street medicine teams that rapidly assess and address the acute and chronic physical and behavioral health needs of homeless people. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority may also expand the program to contract for a street medicine team in Clallam county. The teams must offer integrated, team-based medical, mental health, substance use, and infectious disease treatment and prevention, and navigation and case management services.(((66)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue work on the behavioral health comparison rate project, including:(i) Developing phase 3 comparison rates for all major medicaid managed care behavioral health services not addressed in phase 1 or phase 2 of the behavioral health comparison rates project or through other work streams; and(ii) Preparing to implement a minimum fee schedule for behavioral health services, including developing solutions to resolve any current data and systems limitations.(b) By October 1, 2025, the authority must provide a final report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the new comparison rates developed as part of phase 3;(ii) Updates comparison rates developed in phase 1 and phase 2 for new salary and wage information based on most current bureau of labor statistics data;(iii) Estimates the cost and other impacts to fee-for-service and managed care of incorporating additional behavioral health services developed as part of phase 3 of the behavioral health comparison rates project into a minimum fee schedule effective January 1, 2027;(iv) Identifies planned actions and funding needs, if any, to resolve any remaining limitations to implement the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027;(v) Provides additional analysis of variation between the comparison rates developed as part of phase 3 and current payment levels at a service and regional level; and(vi) Describes how the authority plans to propose to the legislature implementation of the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027, to better match medicaid payments to the cost of care.(67)))(65) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the authority to fund the second year of workforce grants to behavioral health agencies contracted with the authority to establish occupational therapy services for behavioral health clients. This funding must be used for establishing and integrating occupational therapy into behavioral health agency programs and operations. Funding may be used for occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant services, recruitment, training, technical assistance, fieldwork opportunities, and for other approved activities targeted to increase access to occupational therapy services within behavioral health agency settings. The authority must submit a final report to the legislature on the number of patients receiving occupational therapy through this initiative, the programs in which services were provided, and the number and type of fieldwork students trained in each participating behavioral health agency program by January 1, 2027.(((68)))(66)(a) (($81,542,000))$80,120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($81,729,000))$72,787,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($167,792,000))$152,747,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supportive supervision and oversight services pursuant to a 1915(i) state plan amendment. For medicaid clients enrolled in managed care, the authority must contract for these services through managed care organizations utilizing an actuarially sound rate structure as established by the authority and approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services. The authority may not implement a skills development and restoration benefit until funding is provided for that specific purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for:(i) Implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in adult family home settings in accordance with and contingent upon execution of the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes and referenced in part IX of this act;(ii) Implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in assisted living and enhanced services facilities settings;(iii) Providing reimbursement for the state share of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for individuals who have not transitioned into the new 1915(i) state plan services; and(iv) Administrative costs associated with implementation of the new 1915(i) state plan.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fundâstate cost of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these services because of a psychiatric disability.(((69)))(67) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to tribes to implement the Icelandic model of prevention in their communities.(((70)))(68) $3,200,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a tribal opioid prevention campaign to inform and educate tribal communities about opioid misuse prevention, overdose response, and treatment.(((71) $5,242,000))(69) $4,456,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants to providers of employment and educational services to individuals with substance use disorder.(((72)))(70) $3,768,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide opioid treatment services through new opioid treatment providers that were funded through grants pursuant to chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (controlled substances).(((73)))(71) $297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $97,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $140,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1813 (medical assistance reprocurement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(74) $438,000))(72) $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($438,000))$198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($284,000))$128,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and 3 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1427 (peer support specialists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(75)))(73) $2,132,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $570,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for a program that provides Washington state emergency departments with real-time medications for opioid use disorder clinical guidance and follow-up appointment scheduling.(((76)))(74) $1,000,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of electric vans for 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $700,000 of this amount is for mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903; and(b) $300,000 of this amount is for mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903 that are affiliated with a tribe in Washington state.(((77)))(75) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the authority and the governor's Indian health advisory council must convene tribal representatives to identify the actual local costs for tribes in their provision of substance use disorder services to non-American Indian/Alaska Native medicaid enrollees receiving services in tribal facilities. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, that outlines options and a plan for compensating tribes that is developed through this consultation process that fully compensates tribes for their actual costs of serving non-American Indian/Alaska Native medicaid enrollees receiving services in tribal facilities, and must consider and address state and tribal budget impacts.(((78) $2,000,000))(76) $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided on a one-time basis in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium solely for the authority to contract for continued operations of the pilot program originally funded in section 215(117), chapter 475, Laws of 2023 (ESSB 5187) to reimburse a licensed pediatric transitional care facility in Spokane county to provide neonatal abstinence syndrome services to infants who have prenatal substance exposure.(((79)))(77) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to a program in south Seattle providing supportive housing and clinical services for mothers recovering from substance use disorders, and their children. The program must serve pregnant women or mothers, regardless of age, race, religion, or sexual orientation, who are exiting inpatient substance use disorder treatment facilities and must serve individuals with co-occurring disorders. The program must provide on-site support through a dedicated team that offers daily assistance to help women become as independent as possible while focusing on their recovery and stability.(((80)))(78) $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5745 (invol. treatment counsel). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(81)))(79) Within amounts appropriated in this section, effective January 1, 2026, the authority shall reduce medicaid managed care rates by one percent. Notwithstanding any other proviso in the appropriations act for the current biennium, the authority may adjust existing state directed payments, published fee schedules, or make other administrative changes needed to comply with this subsection.(((82)))(80) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to maintain increases to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to the extent that they align with subsection (((81)))(79) of this section. The authority may adjust rates and existing state directed payments to ensure compliance with subsection (((81)))(79) of this section.(((83)))(81) The authority shall continue to work with a provider working to reopen a youth behavioral health facility in Clark county to identify a licensing and service delivery pathway that best reflects services delivered through an enhanced model of care for youth residential substance use disorder treatment services. In collaboration with the provider and medicaid managed care organizations, the authority shall work toward developing an enhanced rate for residential substance use disorders services that concurrently provide for the diagnosis, treatment, and medication management of co-occurring mental health conditions as part of the substance use disorder treatment plan. The authority shall submit the new rate and cost impact to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2025, for consideration of funding in the 2026 legislative session.(((84)))(82) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide mental health nonprofit organization that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs for consumers and families. The contractor must use this funding to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large. Services provided by the contracted program shall include education, support, and assistance to reduce isolation and help consumers and families understand the services available in their communities.(83) Within amounts appropriated in this section, effective January 1, 2027, the authority must reduce medicaid managed care rates to achieve a savings of $1,728,000 in general fundâstate between January and June of 2027. This savings must be implemented by modification of the optional intensive behavioral health support services program offered as an in-lieu-of service in the community behavioral health managed care program. In modifying the program, the authority must prioritize remaining funding for individuals transitioning from state hospitals and other inpatient settings.(84) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $1,346,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for facility based crisis services in the Thurston-Mason region pursuant to the Trueblood phase 3 settlement agreement implementation plan. The authority must identify whether additional amounts are required to meet the requirements of the settlement agreement implementation plan for facility based crisis services in the region and must request additional needed funding as part of its 2027 supplemental and 2027-2029 biennial operating budget requests to the governor.(85) $8,408,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,408,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $12,038,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the parent child assistance program. Of these amounts, $292,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $127,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for an additional 32 slots for individuals involved with the child welfare program. The authority and the department of children, youth, and families must coordinate to identify whether existing capacity within the authority's base funding levels can provide additional slots for individuals involved with the child welfare program.(86) Within existing resources, the authority shall participate in the advisory group for the behavioral health facilities program referenced in chapter 474, Laws of 2023 and chapter 414, Laws of 2025. Responsibilities of the authority include the following:(a) Attend monthly advisory group meetings;(b) Designate subject matter experts to provide input and technical assistance in developing program guidelines, notices of funding availability, and application questions;(c) Designate subject matter experts to serve as application reviewers including scoring applications and making recommendations on funding decisions;(d) Provide guidance and technical assistance related to behavioral health facility development, behavioral health service modalities, unmet demand for different types of behavioral health facilities and services, insurance, and other programmatic issues; and(e) In coordination with the department of social and health services, inform local jurisdictions annually on the progress of new state and community behavioral health facilities, including information about contracted providers and anticipated impacts on local community services.(87) $2,942,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $8,734,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement two certified community behavioral health clinic sites in a federal demonstration project for certified community behavioral health clinics. In selecting demonstration sites, the authority must prioritize selection of sites that make the state competitive for being awarded a demonstration project while also giving consideration to appropriated funding levels.(88) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the authority to contract for services with a recovery cafe providing long-term recovery services in north Kitsap county.(89)(a) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the authority to convene a task force composed of representatives from the authority, the department of social and health services, and the office of financial management; representatives of adult family home, assisted living, and enhanced services facility providers that serve individuals through the community behavioral health support program or intensive behavioral supportive supervision program; behavioral health advocates; and other key stakeholders. The task force will conduct a comprehensive review of services offered through the community behavioral health support program, the intensive behavioral supportive supervision program, and the residential services waiver program with the goal of improving system-wide efficiencies, data-driven outcomes, and cost effectiveness. The review shall include but not be limited to:(i) Exploration of opportunities for aligning requirements between the community behavioral health support program, intensive behavioral supportive supervision, and the residential service waiver programs to reduce provider administrative burden and conflicting requirements with specific attention provided to value-based patient-centered purchasing models;(ii) Establishment of uniform oversight and clear expectations when community behavioral health support program, intensive behavioral supportive supervision program, and residential service waiver program services overlap;(iii) Creation of a centralized framework for matching participants with complex behavioral health conditions to the most appropriate setting or level of care;(iv) Development of outcome metrics and a practical process for gathering outcomes data such as reductions in hospital readmissions, improved quality of life, and other metrics reflective of community stability;(v) Identification of opportunities for streamlining or consolidation of programs to reduce overlap, ensure simpler referral pathways, and deliver more consistent services across the state's behavioral health continuum; and(vi) Cost estimates for options developed by the task force which examine potential cost impacts for both the authority and the department of social and health services and include identification of cost savings and offsets associated with the options presented.(b) By December 1, 2026, the authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which includes but is not limited to:(i) A matrix of the community behavioral health support program, intensive behavioral supportive supervision program, and other programs at the department of social and health services that provide overlapping services to clients which includes identification of the number of individuals being served, where individuals receiving services under these programs enter the system, the average monthly expenditures at each agency, and the differential eligibility and service requirements for the programs;(ii) A summary of the findings and recommendations of the task force;(iii) If an amendment of the community behavioral health support state plan amendment is recommended by the task force, specific options identified by the work group for the amendment to reduce provider administrative burden and improve cost effectiveness and client outcomes; and(iv) Identification of the estimated costs, risks, benefits, and timeline of implementing the identified recommendations and options. Sec. 215. 2025 c 424 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($5,057,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,499,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($5,079,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,705,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,036,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,035,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($13,172,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,239,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104 (immigration status coercion). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(2) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5486 (motion picture captioning). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 216. 2025 c 424 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALSWorker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($28,144,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,282,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($28,141,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,279,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($56,295,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,571,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $102,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 217. 2025 c 424 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($58,806,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,837,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($58,222,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,580,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$12,977,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,720,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$460,000Supplemental Criminal Justice AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,167,000Washington Internet Crimes Against Children AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,270,00024/7 Sobriety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($241,642,000))Â Â Â Â Â $242,031,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.(2) Funding in this section is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing 23 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. Each year, at least two classes must be held in Spokane, two classes must be held in Vancouver, two classes must be held in Arlington, and two classes must be held in Pasco.(3) $1,312,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $870,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the commission to conduct four additional corrections officer academy classes. These classes may be conducted at the corrections officer academy in Burien or at one of the regional training academies, located in Spokane, Pasco, Vancouver, or Arlington.(4) $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.(5) $1,598,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.(6) $346,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (officer duty to intervene).(7) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.(8) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement and corrections agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.(b) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.(9) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.(10) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.(11) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one, phase two, and phase three regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.(12) $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one, phase two, and phase three regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(13) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the administration of the firearms certificate program. The commission will raise the fees for the program so that revenues collected by the program match these expenditures.(14) $401,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $378,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional staff to improve the delays in review and investigation of officer certification complaint cases.(15) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5356 (criminal justice training). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(16) Within existing resources, the commission must produce a report detailing the expenditures of each agency that receives allocations from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account for fiscal year 2023, 2024, and 2025. The report must include documentation of how expenditures were used in accordance with RCW 46.66.080 and recommendations based on outcomes from prior years' expenditures for how funds from the account can be used to most effectively prevent auto theft. The report must be submitted to the office of financial management, the governor, and the legislature by October 1, 2025.(17) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $305,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $100,000,000 of the supplemental criminal justice accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2015 (public safety funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 218. 2025 c 424 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($14,663,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,170,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($14,801,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,911,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($29,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,081,000Sec. 219. 2025 c 424 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($22,076,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,167,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($18,363,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,925,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($13,271,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,433,000Asbestos AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$641,000Electrical License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($80,496,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,694,000Farm Labor Contractor AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$250,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,163,000Construction Registration Inspection AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($32,435,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,553,000Public Works Administration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,462,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,888,000Manufactured Home Installation Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($470,000))Â Â Â Â Â $472,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($471,876,000))Â Â Â Â Â $478,255,000Accident AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($20,183,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,963,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($441,793,000))Â Â Â Â Â $446,951,000Medical Aid AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,960,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,740,000Plumbing Certificate AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,694,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,704,000Pressure Systems Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,202,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,214,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,132,364,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,143,041,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,952,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $8,952,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:(a) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter on:(i) The quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:(A) Business readiness;(B) Change readiness;(C) Commercial off the shelf procurement;(D) Customer access;(E) Program foundations;(F) Independent assessment; and(G) In total by fiscal year;(ii) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;(iii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;(iv) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and(v) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and Washington technology solutions, and how the project:(A) Has mitigated each risk; and(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated; and(b) Submit the report in (a) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.(2) $258,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than August 30th of each year of the fiscal biennium summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.(3)(a) $1,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $1,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027)), $1,445,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation, and $255,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.(4) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.(5) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit an annual report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.(6) $1,406,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the final year of system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(7) (($205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is))$174,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $31,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to continue conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in chapter 156, Laws of 2022 (apprenticeship programs). The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027.(8) $2,879,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $2,309,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to expand access to worker rights and safety information for workers with limited English proficiency (LEP) through outreach and translation of safety-related information, training, and other materials. $2,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to provide workplace rights and safety outreach to underserved workers.(9) (($946,000))$607,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 342, Laws of 2023 (apprenticeship utilization).(10) $1,072,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $187,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to create an effective information technology solution necessary for the implementation of chapter 145, Laws of 2023 (fire-resistant materials).(11) $200,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $200,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the staffing of a resolution process for complaints regarding light duty work under Title 51 RCW.(12) $1,044,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $183,000 of the medical accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 250, Laws of 2024 (adult entertainment workers).(13) (($1,840,000))$2,697,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and (($1,838,000))$2,695,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for claims management staffing to expand capacity to reduce claims caseload, effective July 1, 2025.(14) $3,477,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $614,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for wage payment act, retaliation, child labor, and determinations, and fiscal units staffing to expand capacity to conduct timely worker complaint investigations, effective July 1, 2025.(15) $1,495,000 of the construction registration inspection accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 213, Laws of 2023 (contractor consumer protection).(((17)))(16) $126,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $24,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5101 (worker leave/hate crimes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18)))(17) $636,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $113,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104 (immigration status coercion). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19)))(18) $4,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $1,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5408 (wage and salary disclosures). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20)))(19) $608,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $605,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21)))(20) $818,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $144,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5501 (employee driving requirement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22)))(21) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training to continue implementation of a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant. The organization receiving the grant must:(a) Continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand to provide peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Grant and Benton counties;(b) Support an established network of peer trainings as farmworker leaders, whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools; and(c) Share best practices from the peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference for farmworkers, industry representatives, and advocates.(((23)))(22) $1,213,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $213,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24)))(23) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(((25)))(24) $4,420,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $780,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship council, to administer, amend, or extend current or new grants to continue the growth of behavioral health apprenticeship programs. Grants may be awarded for provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. Grant awardees must use a minimum of one-half of amounts provided to compensate behavioral health providers for employer implementation costs including mentor wage differentials, related instruction wages, and administrative costs. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(((26)))(25) $850,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $150,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to administer, amend, or extend current or new grants to address the behavioral health workforce shortage through behavioral health preapprenticeship and behavioral health entry level training, including nursing assistant certified programs. Grants may cover program costs including, but not limited to, provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(((27)))(26) $56,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2024 (supporting victims of human trafficking and sexual abuse).(((28)))(27) $250,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $250,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2025 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.(((29)))(28) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department of labor and industries shall require contracted entities to notify the department of labor and industries promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(((30)))(29) $3,774,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $890,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.(((31)))(30) $1,642,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.(((32)))(31) $639,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $157,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1524 (isolated employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33)))(32) $85,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $15,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1879 (hospital worker breaks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34)))(33) $1,251,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1549 (responsible bidder criteria). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(35) $197,000 of the electrical license accountâstate appropriation, $136,000))(34) $302,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation((,)) and (($24,000))$54,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1533 (specialty electricians). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(36)))(35) $255,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $254,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1788 (worker's compensation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(37)))(36) $1,031,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $180,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minor). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(38)))(37) $269,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $46,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1875 (sick leave/immigration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(38) $220,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $220,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to replace a loss of federal funds from the national institute for occupational safety and health for the Washington fatality assessment and control evaluation program, occupational respiratory disease surveillance program, and adult blood lead exposure surveillance system for fiscal year 2027. These funds may only be used if the equivalent amount in federal funds is not received.(39) $256,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $45,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128 (child care workforce board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(40) $857,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $154,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2355 (domestic workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(41) $459,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $114,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2479 (unpaid wage recovery). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(42) $378,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $976,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5847 (workers' comp. medical care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(43) $5,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $5,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5944 (language access providers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(44) $385,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6302 (public works/finishing trade). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 220. 2025 c 424 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fundâstate appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.(2) HEADQUARTERSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($5,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,046,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($5,031,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,946,000Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,042,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,002,000(3) FIELD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($10,759,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,636,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($11,204,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,468,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($8,834,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,835,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($6,547,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,548,000Veteran Estate Management AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$719,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($38,063,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,206,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $1,020,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract for veteran service officers.(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a), $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support one veteran service officer position in each of the following counties: Walla Walla, Clallam, Stevens, Asotin, and Skamania.(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a), $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support two veteran service officer positions in Island county.(b) Funding is sufficient for the department to maintain operations for the suicide prevention community-based services grant program established in RCW 43.60A.260.(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($16,710,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,717,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($17,786,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,519,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($159,652,000))Â Â Â Â Â $188,457,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($21,757,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,554,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($215,905,000))Â Â Â Â Â $215,247,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fundâstate must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fundâstate resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.(b) Appropriations have been adjusted in this section to reflect anticipated changes in state, federal, and local resources as a result of census changes. The department shall incorporate these adjustments in the governor's projected maintenance level budget required in RCW 43.88.030.(5) CEMETERY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$188,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($207,000))Â Â Â Â Â $205,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,042,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,437,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,435,000Sec. 221. 2025 c 424 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH(1) The appropriations to the department of health in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of health shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2)(a) The appropriations to the department of health in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act, except as provided in (i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)(a):(i) After May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(ii) After May 1, 2027, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2027 and appropriations for the 2025â2027 fiscal biennium among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(c) Within ((30))90 days after the close of fiscal year 2026, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by subprogram and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for the transfer authority in future budgets.(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. ((The))With the exception of phase one section implementation designated in the board of health legislative report published in 2025, the department of health and the state board of health may begin the rule-making process on subsequent phases, but shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. To control costs and assist schools in the implementation of phase one, the department shall develop models for any required plans, and shall, as resources allow, make radon tests available to schools at no cost.(4) The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(((4)))(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(((5)))(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.(((6)))(7) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(((7)))(8) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(((8)))(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.(((9)))(10) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(((10)))(11) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.Sec. 222. 2025 c 424 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâADMINISTRATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($24,861,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,890,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($23,978,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,164,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($56,636,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,200,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($19,121,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,755,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .(($442,000))Â Â Â Â Â $410,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($478,000))Â Â Â Â Â $419,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($587,000))Â Â Â Â Â $937,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($137,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,000Hospital Data Collection AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,000Health Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($36,706,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,093,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($101,000))Â Â Â Â Â $99,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,623,000))Â Â Â Â Â $367,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($124,000))Â Â Â Â Â $332,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($17,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,000Abortion Savings AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$144,000Safe Drinking Water AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,171,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,085,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($4,637,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,564,000Waterworks Operator Certification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($499,000))Â Â Â Â Â $445,000Drinking Water Assistance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($525,000))Â Â Â Â Â $497,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($33,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($290,000))Â Â Â Â Â $233,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,321,000Medical Test Site Licensure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($869,000))Â Â Â Â Â $477,000Secure Drug Take-Back Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($241,000))Â Â Â Â Â $221,000Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($518,000))Â Â Â Â Â $506,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .(($512,000))Â Â Â Â Â $506,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($65,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,646,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,766,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,962,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,250,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($188,431,000))Â Â Â Â Â $166,981,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($1,164,000))$1,234,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $1,164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system.(2) (($296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the master person index as part of the health and human services coalition master person index initiative.(3))) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate work related to dementia, including but not limited to:(a) Coordinating dementia-related activities with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and other state agencies as needed;(b) Implementing recommendations from the dementia action collaborative in the updated state Alzheimer's plan within the department; and(c) Other dementia-related activities as determined by the secretary.(((4) $166,000))(3) $193,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $166,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for community compensation stipends for low-income individuals who participate in priority engagements across the department.(((5)))(4) $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing to support an office of tribal policy at the department.(5) $1,690,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to remediate the impacts of the opioid epidemic. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(6) $2,662,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to launch a telebuprenorphine hotline that facilitates access to medications for opioid use disorder. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(7) Within existing resources, the department shall transition sending newsletters for the watch me grow program from physically mailed newsletters to newsletters delivered electronically. The department shall cease sending physical newsletters beginning fiscal year 2027.Sec. 223. 2025 c 424 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH SCIENCESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($25,569,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,626,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($26,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,568,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($73,411,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,235,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($44,311,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,397,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$12,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($573,000))Â Â Â Â Â $598,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($501,000))Â Â Â Â Â $974,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($60,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,637,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$83,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($177,788,000))Â Â Â Â Â $201,186,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to pass-through to a nonprofit Washington-based organization with expertise in end-of-life care and in chapter 70.245 RCW (death with dignity act), to provide training, outreach, and education to medical professionals, hospice teams, and other Washingtonians, to support the provision of care under chapter 70.245 RCW.(2) $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(3) $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (pregnancy loss). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to:(a) Maintain sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;(b) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;(c) Maintain an epidemiology and technical team;(d) Provide field-based treatment for syphilis; and(e) Maintain an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.(6) $5,909,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone to agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs.Sec. 224. 2025 c 424 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâENVIRONMENTAL PUBLIC HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($9,579,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,382,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($9,707,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,907,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($31,114,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,845,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($26,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,666,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($544,000))Â Â Â Â Â $546,000((Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,000))Safe Drinking Water AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($11,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,260,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($22,281,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,535,000Waterworks Operator Certification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,893,000Drinking Water Assistance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,988,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,016,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($167,000))Â Â Â Â Â $169,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($976,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,012,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($9,522,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,264,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($561,000))Â Â Â Â Â $607,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($16,745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,445,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($60,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($327,000))Â Â Â Â Â $332,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($52,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($144,159,000))Â Â Â Â Â $171,999,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used for implementation costs, including continued development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures; technical assistance; and training.(2) $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.(3)(a) (($4,000,000))$2,948,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support and administer a workplace health and safety program for workers who are affected by climate impacts, including but not limited to, extreme heat and cold, wildfire smoke, drought, and flooding. This program will focus on workplace health and safety for farmworkers, construction workers, and other workers who face the most risk from climate-related impacts. This amount shall be limited to supporting vulnerable populations in overburdened communities under the climate commitment act as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. Funding shall be provided for:(i) Pass through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations to support workplace health and safety for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts; and(ii) Procurement and distribution of equipment and resources for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts directly by the department of health, or through pass-through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations. Equipment and resources may include but are not limited to: Personal protective equipment, other protective or safety clothing for cold and heat, air purifiers for the workplace or worker housing, protection from ticks and mosquitoes, and heating and cooling devices.(b) The department of health, in consultation with the environmental justice council, community groups, and the department of labor and industries, shall evaluate mechanisms to provide workers with financial assistance to cover lost wages or other financial hardships caused by extreme weather events and climate threats.(c) No more than five percent of this funding may be used to administer this grant program.(4) $5,264,000 of the drinking water assistance accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the office of drinking water to provide technical assistance, direct engineering support, and construction management to small water systems.(5) $685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to assist with access to safe drinking water for homes and businesses with individual wells or small water systems that are contaminated.(6) $1,690,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement actions provided in the nitrate water hazard mitigation plan to support safe drinking water in the lower Yakima valley. Implementation of this plan includes, but is not limited to, education and outreach, well testing, and provision of alternate water supplies. The department may contract with local governments, local health jurisdictions, and nonprofit organizations to administer the plan.(7) $362,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 156, Laws of 2021 (risk-based water standards), to create standards for developers seeking to reuse wastewater in buildings.(((8) $7,924,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the healthy environment for all act under chapter 70A.02 RCW, including additional staff and support for the environmental justice council and implementation of a community engagement plan.(9)))(8)(a) (($4,000,000))$3,816,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer capacity grants to tribes and tribal organizations and to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations to provide guidance and input:(i) To agencies and to the environmental justice council on implementation of the healthy environment for all act; and(ii) To the department on updates to the environmental health disparities map.(b) At least 50 percent of the total amount distributed for capacity grants in this subsection must be reserved for grants to tribes and tribal organizations.(c) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for tribes and tribal organizations to hire staff or to contract with consultants to engage in updating the environmental health disparities map or on implementing the healthy environment for all act.(d) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(((10) $382,000))(9) $333,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for one staff to lead cross agency coordination for wildfire and extreme heat emergency management.(((11) $1,124,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to migrate, maintain, and continue community engagement to update the health disparities map and increase operating staff to complete environmental assessments.(12)))(10) $160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1232 (private detention facilities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $300,000))(11) $592,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to King county to address the disproportionate rates of asthma among children who reside within 10 miles of the Seattle-Tacoma international airport by increasing access to community health worker asthma interventions.(12) $2,469,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,251,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to implement recommendations from an independent analysis of the commercial shellfish program's fee structure by Greene economics published in 2025. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) Operation license fees in fiscal year 2026 shall be limited:(i) For a harvester of two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $263;(ii) For a harvester of three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $523;(iii) For a shellstock shipper operating two or fewer sites on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $297;(iv) For a shellstock shipper operating three or more sites on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $1,280;(v) For a shellstock shipper operating on 50 or more acres, the fee may not exceed $1,280;(vi) For a wholesale shellstock shipper operating on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $1,198;(vii) For a wholesale shellstock shipper operating on a department of natural resources tract, the fee may not exceed $1,089;(viii) For a shucker-packer plant of less than 2,000 square feet with:(A) Two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $542; or(B) Three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $3,354;(ix) For a shucker-packer plant between 2,000 and 5,000 square feet with:(A) Two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $2,868; or(B) Three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $3,387; and(x) For a shucker-packer plant of more than 5,000 square feet, the fee may not exceed $2,868.(b) Operation license fees in fiscal year 2027 shall be limited:(i) For a harvester of two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $518;(ii) For a harvester of three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $1,046;(iii) For a shellstock shipper operating two or fewer sites on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $1,191;(iv) For a shellstock shipper operating three or more sites on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $2,561;(v) For a shellstock shipper operating on 50 or more acres, the fee may not exceed $2,560;(vi) For a wholesale shellstock shipper operating on 49 acres or less, the fee may not exceed $2,396;(vii) For a wholesale shellstock shipper operating on a department of natural resources tract, the fee may not exceed $2,178;(viii) For a shucker-packer plant of less than 2,000 square feet with:(A) Two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $2,698; or(B) Three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $6,709;(ix) For a shucker-packer plant between 2,000 and 5,000 square feet with:(A) Two or fewer sites, the fee may not exceed $5,737; or(B) Three or more sites, the fee may not exceed $6,775; and(x) For a shucker-packer plant of more than 5,000 square feet, the fee may not exceed $5,737.(c) The department may not charge a fee for biotoxin testing and geoduck paralytic shellfish testing services beginning in fiscal year 2027.(d) The department must provide refunds for fees paid between February 1, 2026, and June 30, 2026, in excess of the fee limits established in (a) of this subsection.(e) Funding is provided for inspection and licensing services provided to tribal treaty or individual treaty shellfishing operations pursuant to the shellfish sanitation consent decree of 1994.(f) By June 30, 2027, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the department must submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor, including an analysis of possible fee amounts and structures while adhering to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.110, including:(i) Alternative licensing and fee structures that alleviate strain on small commercial shellfish businesses; and(ii) An analysis of approximate fee levels, impacts to program costs, and timeline for implementation for each structure identified under (f)(i) of this subsection.(13) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a rural wastewater pilot in Island county to implement findings from a 2023 study to identify regulatory barriers and recommendations. The county and department will collaboratively develop a quality assurance plan, inclusive of monitoring protocols and technical standards, to inform regulation.Sec. 225. 2025 c 424 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH SYSTEMS QUALITY ASSURANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($17,222,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,169,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($16,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,903,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($13,994,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,942,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($38,997,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,992,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .(($1,038,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,043,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($1,062,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,071,000Hospital Data Collection AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($502,000))Â Â Â Â Â $822,000Health Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($167,775,000))Â Â Â Â Â $185,210,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,603,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,858,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($23,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,936,000Medical Test Site Licensure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,446,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,837,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($41,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,425,000Secure Drug Take-Back Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,117,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,137,000((Public Health Supplemental AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$288,000))Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .(($197,000))Â Â Â Â Â $485,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($271,737,000))Â Â Â Â Â $296,830,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington board of nursing must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.(2) (($1,793,000))$1,709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,793,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))medicaid fraud penalty accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.(3) $1,908,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing for nursing licensure and other regulatory activities.(4) $2,107,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementing improvements to licensure processes. Improvements may include, but are not limited to, updating internal policies and procedures, creating web-based tutorials for applicants, updating existing web content for applicants, and researching the feasibility of live chat technology for applicants. In identifying and implementing improvements, the department shall document and incorporate feedback from licensed professionals and utilize continuous quality improvement methodologies.(5) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than $525 annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.(6) (($493,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $493,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))$986,000 of the emergency medical services and trauma care systems trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for three full-time emergency medical technicians and other resources necessary for the Franklin county public hospital district #1 to provide health services as part of medical transport operations services, including services to the Coyote Ridge corrections center.(7)(a) $1,260,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and education coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.(b) The department must submit a preliminary report regarding the pilot project by September 1, 2025, to the fiscal committees of the legislature regarding:(i) The pilot project, including:(A) Performance metrics and baseline data;(B) Targeted areas for change;(C) Current and planned efforts to address targeted areas;(D) An implementation plan, barriers to implementation, and strategies to address barriers;(E) Nurse participant data; and(F) Anticipated impacts to culture and practices in long term care settings; and(ii) Apprenticeship pathways, including:(A) Performance metrics and baseline data;(B) Targeted areas for change;(C) Current and planned efforts to address targeted areas;(D) An implementation plan, barriers to implementation, and strategies to address barriers;(E) Recruitment strategies; and(F) Nurse participation data, including nurse assistants recruited, participating, and advancing to apprenticeship programs.(c) By September 1, 2026, the department must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing:(i) Progress towards meeting performance metrics;(ii) Completed efforts to address targeted areas;(iii) The work conducted to meet the outlined objectives in this subsection;(iv) The rules that have been updated and amended to support a career path for nursing assistants;(v) The number of participating nurses in the apprenticeship program and current recruiting practices;(vi) A status update on the implementation of the virtual training and testing modalities; and(vii) Any changes to the nursing workforce for long term care settings.(8) $646,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance of the HEALWA web portal to provide access to health information for health care providers.(9) $219,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1114 (respiratory care compact). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(10) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1142 (in-home care training). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11) $155,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1190 (UW health sciences library). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1720 (community care/Rx assistance). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1722 (secondary career education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(14) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1824 (accredited birthing centers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(15) $161,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(16) $2,955,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,955,000))$1,476,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.(((18)))(17) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the doula licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees.(((19)))(18) $515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $507,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20)))(19) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5672 (home care aide certification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21)))(20) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5493 (hospital price transparency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22)))(21) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5557 (pregnancy/emerg. treatment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23)))(22) $52,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5568 (state health plan). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24)))(23) $191,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $188,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $214,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (health/contract terminations). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25)))(24) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall exempt a hospital located in Burien, Washington that serves 23 percent medicaid patients from the certificate of need requirement under chapter 70.38 RCW for elective percutaneous coronary interventions.(((26)))(25) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for continuation of the rural nursing education program to allow students to remain in rural environments while working towards nursing credentials for the purposes of increasing the nursing workforce in rural critical access hospitals. With the amounts provided, the department shall provide support services to an eight student cohort, which may include tuition vouchers and travel assistance.(26) Within existing resources, the department must submit a report by September 30, 2026, to the governor and legislature regarding an equitable alternative fee structure for the health professions licensing program. The department must:(a) Review the department's current health professions licensing and regulatory costs and the department's methodology for setting fees;(b) Consider relevant fees and methods from other states with comparable licensing and regulatory programs;(c) Include analysis and recommendations on alternative methods, including recommendations to distribute the fee burden more equitably across professions; and(d) Provide estimated costs associated with any recommended alternative methods.(27) Within existing resources, the department shall participate in the advisory group for the behavioral health facilities program referenced in chapter 474, Laws of 2023 and chapter 414, Laws of 2025. Responsibilities of the department include:(a) Attend monthly advisory group meetings;(b) Designate subject matter experts to provide input and technical assistance in developing program guidelines, notices of funding availability, and application questions;(c) Designate subject matter experts to serve as application reviewers including scoring applications and making recommendations on funding decisions; and(d) Provide guidance, technical assistance, and training related to behavioral health facility development, behavioral health service modalities, unmet demand for different types of behavioral health facilities and services, insurance, and other programmatic issues.(28) $1,022,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5988 (opioid treatment prg. fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(29) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2168 (overdose mapping information). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $44,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5185 (international med. pathways). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(31) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1187 (delayed ambulance bills). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(32) $75,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the rule making costs necessary to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2088 (dietitian licensure compact), House Bill No. 2113 (radiologic technologists), and Substitute House Bill No. 2363 (music therapy exemptions). If none of the bills identified in this subsection are enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2540 (EMT recertification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall charge no more than $998 annually for new or renewed licenses for birthing centers as defined in RCW 18.46.010.(35) $89,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2247 (veterinarian relationships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(36) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall take actions in response to recommendations from the joint legislative audit and review committee's 2025 audit of hospital inspection timeliness, data reporting, and related oversight activities. The department's actions may include, but are not limited to, addressing overdue inspections, improving oversight of third-party accreditation and inspection processes, enhancing performance monitoring, improving compliance intake and language access, and identifying funding options for the adverse event program and hospital financial data reporting. The department shall provide an update to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026, describing progress toward improving hospital inspection timeliness, key milestones achieved, and anticipated next steps.(37) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the pharmacy quality assurance commission shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to alternative distribution models until legislative direction and authority has been granted, and the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute.Sec. 226. 2025 c 424 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâPREVENTION AND COMMUNITY HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($45,021,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,067,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($44,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,488,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($395,004,000))Â Â Â Â Â $399,732,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($63,257,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,313,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .(($11,268,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,295,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($11,629,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,616,000Abortion Savings AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,855,000Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,767,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,779,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($51,907,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,681,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $349,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .(($3,087,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,046,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($632,409,000))Â Â Â Â Â $661,221,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($1,914,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,914,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;(c) Staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;(h) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington; and(k) By December 1, 2025, an updated suicide prevention plan, to include a report on completed activities, planned activities, and outcomes from implementation, which shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Trends in suicide among service members, agricultural workers, youth, and incarcerated persons;(ii) Outcomes of implemented public awareness campaigns; and(iii) Outcomes of trainings with first responders, including the number of trainings.))$4,034,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,613,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for suicide prevention at the department.(a) Suicide prevention activities may include:(i) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, including suicide prevention efforts for military service members, veterans, and incarcerated persons;(ii) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;(iii) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;(iv) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts, including providing support to tribes in developing and implementing culturally appropriate, evidence-based programs and tribal best practices to support youth and adults;(v) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector, including implementing recommendations of the agricultural industry task force;(vi) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;(vii) Developing continuing education for mental health professionals and partnering with agencies and organizations serving high-risk populations;(viii) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(ix) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington;(x) Developing and implementing postvention aftercare programs; and(xi) Creating a safer homes community campaign on suicide prevention.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,098,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,008,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.(c) By December 1, 2026, the department must provide to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a report on completed activities, planned activities, outcomes from implementation, and recommendations for future funding, which must include, but not be limited to:(i) Trends in suicide among service members, agricultural workers, youth, and incarcerated persons;(ii) Outcomes of implemented public awareness campaigns;(iii) Outcomes of trainings with first responders, including the number of trainings; and(iv) Recommendations on how future funding can be used to improve outcomes related to suicide prevention.(2) $1,477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentives program.(3) (($3,834,000))$3,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to support school-based health centers and behavioral health services. The department must develop a plan for the school-based health centers to become financially self-sufficient.(4) (($1,098,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,098,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.(5) $1,690,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to remediate the impacts of the opioid epidemic. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(6) $3,500,000))$7,735,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($3,500,000))$7,735,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for programs and grants to maintain access to abortion care, including but not limited to staffing at the department and grants to providers of abortion care to fund abortion care, workforce retention and recruitment initiatives to ensure continuity of care, training, outreach, and security investments.(((7) $513,000))(5) $463,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $513,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the early hearing detection, diagnosis, and intervention program.(((8)))(6) $972,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($972,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))$2,913,000 of the public health supplemental accountâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to expand the birth equity project with the goal of reducing prenatal and perinatal health disparities.(((9)))(7) $2,112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment, and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine, specifically flavored nicotine products, addiction on specific populations, including youth, and racial or other disparities.(((10)))(8) $257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely to support health equity zones, as defined in RCW 43.70.595, in identification and implementation of targeted interventions to have a significant impact on health outcomes and health disparities.(((11)))(9) $3,579,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for behavioral crisis coordination.(((12)))(10) $369,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely as pass-through funding to an organization that specializes in culturally relevant sports programs for indigenous children and adolescents, with the goal of keeping at-risk youth out of the juvenile justice system.(((13) $2,662,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to launch a tele-buprenorphine hotline that facilitates access to medications for opioid use disorder. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(14)))(11) $346,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for perinatal opioid use disorder information and services. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(((15) $266,000))(12) $182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate the universal development screening system.(((17)))(13) $1,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.(((18)))(14) $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance of the community health worker platform and continued implementation of the community health worker trainings in the pediatric setting for children with behavioral health needs.(((19)))(15) $211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.(((20) $6,895,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone to first responders and agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, house providers, and street outreach programs.(21)(a) $1,042,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the planning phase of the 988 technology platform implementation project.(b) The department must actively collaborate with Washington technology solutions and the health care authority so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(c) By October 1, 2025, the department must provide an update to legislative fiscal committees with the following details:(i) An identified technology solution, with a list of functionalities and the statutory requirement met by each functionality;(ii) Software, processes, and methods currently used by call centers and designated 988 contact hubs that the proposed technology platform would replace;(iii) The number of call centers and designated 988 contact hubs planning to transition all work processes to the proposed technology platform; and(iv) Identified risks and changes to the schedule and scope of the project.(d) These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act.(22)))(16) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23)))(17) $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (mobile markets). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to:(a) Maintain sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;(b) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;(c) Maintain an epidemiology and technical team;(d) Provide field-based treatment for syphilis; and(e) Maintain an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.))(18) $1,200,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for contracting with an organization that has expertise in providing culturally competent suicide prevention services to lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and other sexual and gender minority youth and young adults to collaborate with designated 988 contact hubs in providing crisis response, crisis intervention, and suicide prevention services. These services may include, but not be limited to, responding to calls, chats, and texts to the 988 crisis hotline and coordinating follow-up services. Of the amounts provided, the department must make $300,000 available to each designated 988 contact hub. The department may not use any of the provided funding for administrative, overhead, agency staffing, or indirect costs.(19) $9,855,000 of the abortion savings accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6182 (abortion savings program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $246,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $246,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington's Harborview abuse and trauma center for the sexual assault nurse examiner training program, which includes expanding virtual training modules, access to forensic sexual assault examinations, and access to services for victims of sexual assault.Sec. 227. 2025 c 424 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâSTATE BOARD OF HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,711,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,767,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,604,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,664,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,315,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,431,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1946 (local board of health/tribes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 228. 2025 c 424 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâRESILIENCY AND HEALTH SECURITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,916,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($4,873,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,827,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($35,149,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,455,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$257,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($44,938,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,455,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($4,873,000))$4,827,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operation of the statewide medical logistics center. Within these amounts, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop processes that will minimize the disposal and destruction of personal protective equipment and for interagency distribution of personal protective equipment. It is the intent of the legislature to end funding for the statewide medical logistics center after the end of the lease in effect during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.Sec. 229. 2025 c 424 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH DATA AND PLANNINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($3,473,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,339,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,913,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,419,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($7,148,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,500,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($947,000))Â Â Â Â Â $968,000((Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,486,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,226,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,786,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,156,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain public health information technology infrastructure in a cloud-based environment.(2) (($686,000))$619,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $757,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain the WA Health bed tracking and supply database.(3) $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the master person index as part of the health and human services coalition master person index initiative.Sec. 230. 2025 c 424 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSThe health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2026, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($159,476,000))Â Â Â Â Â $163,217,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($162,022,000))Â Â Â Â Â $167,135,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,054,000((General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$168,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($322,066,000))Â Â Â Â Â $331,406,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(b) $2,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(c) $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(d) $761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($758,000))$508,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training statewide program administration team and contract.(e) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $324,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(f) $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Eleanor Chase reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(g) $319,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $333,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Brownstone reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(h) Within existing resources, the department must collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to help them as they develop a juvenile rehabilitation capacity needs assessment model (CNAM) for secure facilities, community residential facilities, and community transition services, as required in section 235(18) of this act, comparable in detail to the capacity needs assessment model that the department of corrections research and analytics team maintains for capacity.(i) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (pregnancy loss). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(j) $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5323 (theft from first responders). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(k) $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(l) $222,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $228,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1068 (DOC WMS employee arbitration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(m) Within existing resources, and based on the budget structure changes in policy transfers included in the 2025-27 biennial omnibus operating budget, the department of corrections must submit the following to the office of financial management and the legislative accountability and evaluation program, by December 31, 2025:(i) A narrative description of changes to include how these changes will affect the availability and understanding of budget and accounting information for policy makers and the public;(ii) A crosswalk that displays details within the affected programs in the existing structure compared to the revised transferred structure;(iii) A comparison of the current structure to the revised transferred structure that must compare the current total estimated biennial expenditures and FTEs for all programs, before and after the changes; and(iv) A comprehensive 10-year restructure of historical data.(n) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5105 (sexually explicit depictions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($785,488,000))Â Â Â Â Â $807,095,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($812,962,000))Â Â Â Â Â $829,458,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($4,326,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,535,000((General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$334,000))Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$577,000Institutional Welfare((/Betterment)) AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,000,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$469,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,214,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,213,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,621,370,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,656,347,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close, medium, or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.(b) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department of corrections to provide wages and gratuities of no less than $1.00 per hour to incarcerated persons working in class III correctional industries.(c) Within the appropriated amounts in this subsection, the department of corrections must provide a minimum of one dedicated prison rape elimination act compliance specialist at each institution.(d) $284,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $284,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(e) $5,316,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,316,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(f) $2,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,805,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(g) $1,411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include state identification cards, reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(h) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time costs necessary to close Mission Creek corrections center for women.(i) $172,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $230,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for direct variable costs at Washington corrections center for women.(j) $646,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $861,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Mission Creek corrections center for women.(k) $2,262,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,949,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(l) (($195,000))$22,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time staff relocation costs given the closure of the Mission Creek corrections center for women.(m) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(n) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5139 (reentry council members). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(o) $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(p) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5219 (partial confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(q) $1,385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,792,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reopen and operate unit A in the Washington state reformatory at the Monroe correctional complex to provide new close custody bed capacity.(r) $1,237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $967,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional close custody bed capacity in units A, B, and D at the Clallam Bay corrections center.(s) $167,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a dedicated canine detection team at the Coyote Ridge corrections center. The canine detection team's work schedule must be prioritized around the facility's visiting hours and shift changes, as well as areas of entry by work crews, visitors, employees, contract staff and volunteers entering the secure perimeter of the correctional facility, to ensure that the canine detection team has high visibility and presence during these times.(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($237,463,000))Â Â Â Â Â $237,886,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($252,309,000))Â Â Â Â Â $251,718,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($4,142,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,197,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($10,000))Â Â Â Â Â $185,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($493,924,000))Â Â Â Â Â $490,986,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service. The department shall pay the bed rate for the day of release.(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.(c) $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(d) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(e) $19,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $19,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(f) $4,011,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,057,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(g) $2,735,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,255,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Eleanor Chase reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(h) $3,465,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Brownstone reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(i) $385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $577,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Ahtanum view reentry center in Yakima.(j) $238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Peninsula reentry center in Port Orchard.(k) $238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Tri-Cities reentry center in Kennewick.(l) $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5219 (partial confinement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($4,653,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,329,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($9,696,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,669,000((General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$600,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,034,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,983,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,998,000(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($72,125,000))Â Â Â Â Â $71,723,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($63,129,000))Â Â Â Â Â $82,273,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$50,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($135,304,000))Â Â Â Â Â $154,046,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(b) $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reopen and operate unit A in the Washington state reformatory at the Monroe correctional complex to provide new close custody bed capacity.(c) $88,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional close custody bed capacity in units A, B, and D at the Clallam Bay corrections center.(d) $66,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for conversion and operation of unit B at the Coyote Ridge corrections center to operate existing medium security beds as a therapeutic community treatment program.(6) ((OFFENDER CHANGE))REENTRY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($89,407,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,379,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($91,651,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,247,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($1,436,000))Â Â Â Â Â $226,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($182,494,000))Â Â Â Â Â $95,852,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for programming for incarcerated individuals. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for programming for incarcerated individuals that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody.(c) $11,629,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,629,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expanded reentry investments to include, but not be limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(d) Within existing resources, the department of corrections may provide reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.(e) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for work on reentry 2030, continued internal and cross agency reentry collaboration, and work on the state's medicaid 1115 transformation waiver impacts to the department.(f) $268,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for education services for incarcerated individuals in living unit L of the Washington corrections center for women.(g) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $601,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for substance use staffing and treatment for incarcerated individuals in living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(h) $176,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(i) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(j) $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $405,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reopen and operate unit A in the Washington state reformatory at the Monroe correctional complex to provide new close custody bed capacity with basic skills education.(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($270,784,000))Â Â Â Â Â $326,403,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($275,569,000))Â Â Â Â Â $337,345,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($6,720,000))Â Â Â Â Â $983,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($2,000))Â Â Â Â Â $120,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($8,916,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,916,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($561,991,000))Â Â Â Â Â $680,767,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.(b) $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care, addiction care, and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.(c) $2,238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(d) $441,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $441,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(e) $3,308,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, enhanced health care discharge planning, case management, health care discharge teams, and evaluation of physical health and behavioral health.(f) (($8,916,000))$11,957,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for opioid treatment for individuals in the department of corrections' custody on full confinement. ((This funding))Funding is provided((:(ii) To ensure each and every single individual transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement is provided))for the department to provide medications for opioid use disorder for individuals transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement if they were on medications for opioid use disorder while in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(g) $1,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder ((to ensure each and every single individual))for the department to provide medications for opioid use disorder for individuals transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement ((is provided medications for opioid use disorder)) if they were on medications for opioid use disorder while in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(h) $3,959,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder for the department to provide medications for opioid use disorder for individuals transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement if they were on medications for opioid use disorder while in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(i)(i) (($2,505,000))$1,351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $7,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The federal match for the department is appropriated to the health care authority, see ((section 211(60) of this act))section 211(70) of this act.(ii) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(iii) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(iv)(A) The department must collaborate with the department of social and health services and the health care authority and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(B) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department of corrections agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(C) The information provided to the health care authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(D) The requirements of the quarterly report are listed in section 211(58) of this act.(((i)))(j) $159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $212,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for direct variable costs at Washington corrections center for women.(((j)))(k) $247,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $329,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(((k)))(l) $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(((l)))(m) The department of corrections shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department of corrections shall require contracted entities to notify the department of corrections promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(((m)))(n) $451,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $468,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(o) $774,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,831,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reopen and operate unit A at the Washington state reformatory at the Monroe correctional complex to provide new close custody bed capacity.(p) $612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,224,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for conversion and operation of unit B at the Coyote Ridge corrections center to operate existing medium security beds as a therapeutic community treatment program.(q) $5,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for legal costs that exceed the amount covered by the self-insurance liability account for costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Estavillo v. Washington State Department of Corrections, King County Superior Court, Cause No. 24-2-13933-8 KNT.Sec. 231. 2025 c 424 s 231 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLINDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($5,820,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,924,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($6,060,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,216,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($29,824,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,024,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$68,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,772,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,232,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to federally recognized tribes of Washington to support culturally appropriate vocational rehabilitation services, independent living, youth supports, and adaptive technologies for tribal members who are blind, low-visioned, or deaf-blind.Sec. 232. 2025 c 424 s 232 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT((General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$18,000))General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($180,070,000))Â Â Â Â Â $164,230,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($38,716,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,726,000Unemployment Compensation Administration AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($307,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $309,447,000Administrative Contingency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($44,230,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,541,000Employment Service Administrative AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($126,348,000))Â Â Â Â Â $127,822,000Family and Medical Leave Insurance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($192,400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $193,746,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($49,760,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,814,000((Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$26,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($938,645,000))Â Â Â Â Â $931,326,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.(2) $6,397,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1st of each fiscal year.(4) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by October 15th of each fiscal year:(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.(5) $4,684,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050, including sector intermediary grants, technical assistance and support grants, and administrative expenses associated with grant administration.(6)(a) (($9,154,000))$14,255,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) (($5,938,000))$3,804,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operations of the WorkSource integrated technology project.(7) (($12,338,000))$10,338,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $3,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the economic services for all programs as defined in chapter 92, Laws of 2024. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the economic security for all program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including, but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2026, that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery. The federal funding provided in this subsection is one-time and comes from the workforce innovation and opportunity act's governor's reserve account.(8) $3,826,000 of the employment services administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.(9) $280,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.(10)(a) $7,792,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation ((and)), $14,470,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation, and $19,030,000 of the unemployment compensation administrative accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely to address a projected shortfall of federal revenue that supports the administration of the unemployment insurance program. The department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection.(b) The department must submit a report no later than November 1st of each year in the fiscal biennium to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining how the funding in (a) of this subsection is being utilized and recommendations for long-term solutions to address future decreases in federal funding.(11) $10,823,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the paid family and medical leave program to process claims and respond to customer and employer inquiries in a timely manner.(12) $8,966,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for information technology staffing to complete system enhancements for any remaining statutorily required components of the paid family and medical leave program, including, but not limited to, the establishment and collection of overpayments, crossmatching eligibility with other programs, and elective coverage for tribes. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(13) $5,074,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 120, Laws of 2024 (LTSS trust access). This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(14) $500,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a vendor to evaluate current unemployment insurance technology systems and to produce a comprehensive roadmap that addresses system challenges, makes recommendations for future enhancements, and identifies costs associated with the recommendations. If the department does not receive adequate funding form the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(15) Within existing resources, the department must submit a report to the legislature and the governor by September 12, 2026, that provides an analysis of unemployment insurance fraud, strategies deployed to address fraud including those that reduce the false-positive rate, percentage of fraudulent issues identified to claims filed and the average number of days to resolve, alternative approaches that the department could consider along with potential benefits, risks, and costs, and the necessary staffing levels to address fraudulent claims.(16) $11,156,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the unemployment insurance program to process claims and respond to customer inquiries in a timely manner and to maintain unemployment insurance ambassadors.(17) (($852,000))$1,308,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5041 (unemp ins/strikes & lockouts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(18) $30,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5191 (dockworkers/PFML premiums). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(19) $9,606,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(20) $556,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5525 (business closures & layoffs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(21) $51,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(22) $4,936,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family & medical leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(23) $1,000,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to improve access to the unemployment insurance program to underserved communities by expanding the use of navigators within community-based organizations. At a minimum, $684,000 of the amount shall be used to contract with community-based organizations to raise awareness of the unemployment insurance program and help individuals navigate the application process.(24) $1,160,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2345 (paid leave contributions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25) $2,706,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement in fiscal year 2027 with the state board for community and technical colleges to increase capacity in programs that serve workforce innovation and opportunity act eligible participants, including but not limited to, basic education for adults and integrated basic education and skills training. The state board for community and technical colleges may use up to five percent of these funds for the administration associated with the increased capacity. The federal funding provided in this subsection is one-time and comes from the workforce innovation and opportunity act's governor's reserve account.(26) $200,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a third-party vendor to conduct a higher education and workforce development landscape analysis and a related engagement process with relevant parties to analyze the current talent development system and to produce recommendations that would improve access to high-quality employment, education, and training. The federal funding provided in this subsection is one-time and comes from the workforce innovation and opportunity act's governor's reserve account. The department may only implement the work in this subsection upon guidance and approval from the governor's office.(27) Within existing resources, the department shall report on the current state of the paid family and medical leave program under Title 50A RCW to the governor, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the paid family and medical leave advisory committee by November 1, 2026. The report must include:(a) An evaluation of the solvency of the program. This evaluation should include:(i) Potential program changes to achieve long-term fund solvency;(ii) An economic analysis that examines potential program changes and their implications; and(iii) A comparison of program designs from other states with a similar program;(b) An evaluation of the integrity of the program. This evaluation should include:(i) Current practices in place to ensure program integrity;(ii) Applicable rules and laws pertaining to the integrity of the program; and(iii) A review of best practices used in other similar state and federal benefit programs;(c) Comments on the report provided by members of the paid family and medical leave advisory committee established in RCW 50A.05.030; and(d) Any recommendations from the department.Sec. 233. 2025 c 424 s 233 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâGENERAL(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. However, after May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2026 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the foster care, adoption support, child protective services, working connections child care, and the juvenile rehabilitation programs, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(4) The department of children, youth, and families shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(5) At least 30 calendar days prior to a change in program policies or procedures which the department determines is likely to have an adverse impact to a majority of that program's clients, the department shall communicate the change to impacted persons. The department may leverage multiple communication platforms and diverse methods to communicate the change under this subsection. In cases where the change in program policies or procedures must be implemented in a time frame that renders 30-day advance notice infeasible, the department shall make efforts to notify impacted persons as soon as possible. The department shall partner with community-based organizations, tribes, and state and local agencies to share information broadly, prioritizing language access where possible.Sec. 234. 2025 c 424 s 234 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâCHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($539,542,000))Â Â Â Â Â $557,911,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($547,301,000))Â Â Â Â Â $579,422,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($519,549,000))Â Â Â Â Â $534,083,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,824,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,888,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,312,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,613,104,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,677,552,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $110,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.(2) $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.(3) $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.(4) In each fiscal year, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail continued implementation of the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:(a) Total full-time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification, and band, and job duty or program;(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.(5) $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.(6)(a) $539,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $540,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $656,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist, or youth with high educational needs. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.(7) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.(8) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.(9)(a) $7,106,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,106,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,188,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.(b) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.(10) The department must provide semiannual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. To the extent the information is available, the report shall include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.(11) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.(12) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.(13) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.(14) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.(15) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.(16) $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.(17) The department will only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.(18) The department shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to identify, place, and assist in the voluntary transition of adolescents aged 13 and older who have complex developmental disabilities, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, alongside potential mental health or substance use diagnoses, into a leased facility for specialized residential treatment at Lake Burien operated by the department of social and health services. The partnership is dedicated to transitioning individuals to community-based settings in a seamless and voluntary manner that emphasizes care in less restrictive community-based environments.(19) (($9,376,000))$6,511,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($8,709,000))$8,874,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $512,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, statewide hub home model, emergent facility-based receiving care resources, and exceptional placement costs. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:(a) (($1,576,000))$1,979,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,576,000))$2,381,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the emerging adulthood housing program.(b) $245,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the statewide hub home model. The department shall develop and adapt the existing hub home model to serve youth as described in the settlement agreement.(c) (($5,959,000))$2,656,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($7,016,000))$6,211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for emergent facility-based receiving care resources.(d) $1,474,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $428,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for exceptional placement costs.(e) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $84,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for continuous quality improvement.(f) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for stakeholder engagement related to system improvements in the settlement agreement.(20) $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,940,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.(21) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $112,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. ((The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by September 1, 2025. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.))(22) $2,351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization in Spokane that has experience administering a family-centered drug treatment and housing program for families experiencing substance use disorder. As a requirement for receiving this funding, the nonprofit organization must provide an annual report to the governor and the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: Number of children and families served each month, number of families that entered and exited the program each month, and a comprehensive budget for all costs incurred by the program.(23) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1509 (family reconciliation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(24) Funding in this section is sufficient to maintain rates paid to family preservation services providers.(25) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $365,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $112,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an evidence-based program that is used to help tribal families reunite with their children.(((28)))(26) $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $60,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(27) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,092,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $813,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement the department's updated workload model developed as required by chapter 297, Laws of 2022. Funding is intended to achieve an average caseload ratio in fiscal year 2027 of 15.1 for child protective services investigations and 14.2 for child protective services family assessment response. This includes funding for additional staff and also assumes reassignment of some existing staff.(28) $920,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $340,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to establish a regional disability liaison program as required by the voluntary resolution agreement with the United States department of health and human services office for civil rights and the United States department of justice.(29) $613,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5911 (DCYF/financial stability). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to expand the plan of safe care program to five high-needs communities, which provides care coordination and resource navigation to expecting mothers and newborns with prenatal exposure.(31) $329,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to purchase an updated assessment tool and implement the tool in two communities.(32) $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to refer families to family resource centers in five high-needs communities. Family resource centers will provide information, assess needs, make referrals to family services, and provide direct delivery of services to families exiting the child welfare system with a child older than age three.(33) $876,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for public health nurse supports in five high-needs communities, which will serve child welfare families with a child under age three where substance use is a factor.(34) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to contract with one or more community-based organizations to develop a services referral system to serve families exiting the child welfare system.(35) $849,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $849,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the intensive foster care assessment program to assess the needs of children who have been in foster care for more than 90 days.(36) The department may contract with one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their parent or parents. The contract shall require the center to allow parents to board in the room with the child, provide eat, sleep, and console services, and provide support for substance use disorder treatment for the parent or parents. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract. The pediatric interim care center shall cover any costs associated with the establishment of the contract with the department. By December 1, 2026, the department shall notify the chair and ranking members of both the house appropriations and senate ways and means committees regarding the status of the contract with a pediatric interim care center.Sec. 235. 2025 c 424 s 235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâJUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($183,158,000))Â Â Â Â Â $191,265,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($180,765,000))Â Â Â Â Â $184,958,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($720,000))Â Â Â Â Â $694,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($28,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$652,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$196,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($365,519,000))Â Â Â Â Â $377,823,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development, not just reducing recidivism. Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute. The block grant oversight committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall identify effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development to receive funding.(b) By June 30, 2026, the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation program must provide a service inventory by county that shows how much each county court received in block grant funding under this subsection and how those funds were disbursed and spent. The service inventory must be provided in the form of a spreadsheet. The spreadsheet must contain the following data by county:(i) The total amount of funding disbursed to each county;(ii) The amount retained by the county court versus the amount disbursed to other organizations and entities for services;(iii) The name of each organization or entity in that county that ultimately received the grant funding for services provided;(iv) The grant amount that each organization or entity received;(v) The services and programs provided by each organization;(vi) The number of individuals served by each organization and entity as a result of the grant funding received; and(vii) By entity, the amount of grant funding that was spent on the direct services for offenders and individuals versus the amount spent on administrative expenses and court salaries.(2) $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in the department of children, youth, and families. The juvenile rehabilitation evidence-based expansion committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, will work with community expert partners to identify culturally relevant and research-informed programs for prevention and intervention services. These programs will include principles of positive youth development, healing centered engagement, or peer centered approaches that holistically benefit young people, or all three principles. The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.(3)(a) $8,198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($8,198,000))$10,198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2027, $3,500,000 must be used solely for services for youth in the county juvenile justice system, which may include staffing used to provide direct services to youth, but may not be used for general court staff salaries.(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative, and suspended disposition alternative. The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (b) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.(e) By June 30, 2026, the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation program must provide a service inventory by county that shows how much each county court received in block grant funding under this subsection and how those funds were disbursed and spent. The service inventory must be provided in the form of a spreadsheet to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The spreadsheet must contain the following data by county:(i) The total amount of funding disbursed to each county;(ii) The amount retained by the county court versus the amount disbursed to other organizations and entities for services;(iii) The name of each organization or entity in that county that ultimately received the grant funding for services provided;(iv) The grant amount that each organization or entity received;(v) The services and programs provided by each organization;(vi) The number of individuals served by each organization and entity as a result of the grant funding received; and(vii) By entity, the amount of grant funding that was spent on the direct services for offenders and individuals versus the amount spent on administrative expenses and court salaries.(4) $808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(7) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(8) $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.(9)(a) (($878,000))$1,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($879,000))$2,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2021 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for housing vouchers.(10)(a) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 150, Laws of 2023 (sexual offenses by youth).(b) The department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation shall develop and implement a grant program that allows defense attorneys and counties to apply for funding for sex offender evaluation and treatment programs. The department shall provide funding to counties for: (a) Process mapping, site assessment, and training for additional sex offender treatment modalities such as multisystemic therapy-problem sexual behavior or problematic sexual behavior-cognitive behavioral therapy; and (b) for any evaluation and preadjudication treatment costs which are not covered by the court.(11) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for contracted services for housing for youth exiting juvenile rehabilitation facilities.(12) $1,182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a dedicated institutional educational oversight and accountability team and staff at Green Hill and Echo Glen secure facilities that will serve as an educational engagement team at the facility and will also coordinate and engage with community enrichment programs and community organizations to afford more successful transitions.(13) $1,048,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,048,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a contract to provide opioid use disorder post-release education and intervention services.(14) $652,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for medical personnel to provide medications for opioid use disorder (MOUD) education and treatment.(15) $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to open and operate a 48-bed living unit, a modular building, and recreation area at the Stafford Creek corrections center in Aberdeen.(16) $406,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $392,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $16,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for dedicated classification specialists to create and operate a formal classification process to provide more frequent individualized security-level reviews at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation program. The classification specialists must also review and update the policies for assigning security classification levels for juvenile rehabilitation youth to provide more frequent individualized security-level reviews at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department. The department shall update any rules necessary to implement the updated policies. This review and update must include: (a) The consideration of incorporating evidence-based criteria for assigning security classification; (b) the frequency for the review of each person's classification; (c) if deemed necessary, the development of additional security classifications to better reflect the population and available institutional settings; and (d) criteria for the override of a security classification by the superintendent or other authorized person. The classification specialists are encouraged to consult with experts in trauma-informed juvenile rehabilitation policy, experts with experience in noninstitutional approaches to juvenile justice, experts in child psychology and development, individuals with lived experience in juvenile rehabilitation institutions, and experts that may be able to provide a culturally relevant perspective to policies and programs offered in juvenile rehabilitation institutions. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature any statutory barriers to incorporating evidence-based best practices into the updated policies.(17) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $10,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for dedicated infraction specialists to create and implement an infractions policy to respond to incidents of violence, harmful behaviors, and safety issues at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department. The department shall, in consultation with organizations focused on juvenile justice policy and reform, review every six months the infraction data to identify disparities and implement any necessary changes to the system to address such disparities. This review shall also include an assessment of factors that lead to the most common infractions, including staffing, facility population, and availability of programming.(18)(a) $133,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation to develop an Excel spreadsheet capacity needs assessment model (CNAM) for all secure residential facilities, community residential facilities, and community transition services for which the juvenile rehabilitation is responsible or that are operated, managed, or administered by the juvenile rehabilitation. The capacity needs assessment model must provide a level of detail comparable to that provided by the capacity needs assessment model maintained by the department of corrections research and analytics team for bed capacity. This capacity needs assessment model shall provide the department with a predictive tool that shows the current number of beds available and the forecasted number of beds that are needed, by security level, by fiscal year, over a 10 fiscal-year period. Similar to the department of corrections' capacity needs assessment model, the model developed by juvenile rehabilitation must specify current and forecasted needed beds based on crime of conviction and assigned custody level over 10 fiscal years, by gender, age, custody level, and fiscal year.(b) The Excel spreadsheet capacity needs assessment model must be updated after each caseload forecast council's adopted caseload forecast for the juvenile rehabilitation. No later than 30 calendar days after each adopted caseload forecast, the model shall be electronically transmitted to the appropriate chairs of the fiscal committees for the house of representatives and senate or posted on the department of juvenile rehabilitation's external-facing website.(19) (($1,418,000))$709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Naselle youth camp in Naselle.(((21)))(20) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The juvenile rehabilitation program shall require contracted entities to notify the juvenile rehabilitation program promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(((22)))(21) $183,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $172,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab. ombuds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(22) At least 30 calendar days prior to a change in program policies or procedures which the department determines is likely to have an adverse impact to a majority of that program's clients, the department shall communicate the change to impacted persons. The department may leverage multiple communication platforms and diverse methods to communicate the change under this subsection. In cases where the change in program policies or procedures must be implemented in a time frame that renders 30-day advance notice infeasible, the department shall make efforts to notify impacted persons as soon as possible. The department shall partner with community-based organizations, tribes, and state and local agencies to share information broadly, prioritizing language access where possible.Sec. 236. 2025 c 424 s 236 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâEARLY LEARNING PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($934,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,064,991,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,140,922,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,130,751,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($462,759,000))Â Â Â Â Â $511,364,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$579,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($410,875,000))Â Â Â Â Â $410,342,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($34,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,200,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$37,059,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($80,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $120,000,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$13,166,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,114,816,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,320,452,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) (($127,001,000))$127,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($133,386,000))$93,485,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $91,810,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and (($80,000,000))$120,000,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,278 slots in fiscal year 2026 and 14,528 slots in fiscal year 2027. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.(b) Funding provided in (a) of this subsection is sufficient to:(i) Provide a slot rate increase of five percent on full day slots beginning in fiscal year 2026; and(ii) Increase 250 full day slots beginning in fiscal year 2027.(c) In addition to the funding provided for the slots in (a) of this subsection, the department will make efforts to increase the number of early childhood education and assistance program slots by leveraging private philanthropic dollars in the pre-k promise account pursuant to Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5872 (PreK promise account). It is the intent of the legislature to fund up to 10,000 additional early childhood education and assistance program slots from the pre-k promise account.(d) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(2) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.(3) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(4)(a) (($185,996,000))$192,331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($321,821,000))$336,347,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are ((provided solely))sufficient for enhancements to the working connections child care program.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $126,974,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided ((solely)) to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2024 market rate survey for child care centers, beginning July 1, 2026.(ii) (($185,996,000))$192,331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($194,847,000))$209,373,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are ((provided solely))sufficient to implement the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 907 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(A) $5,342,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a 50 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2025.(B) $2,785,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a health care contribution increase.(C) (($81,367,000))$87,702,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($84,919,000))$99,445,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a cost of care rate enhancement.(D) $96,502,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,801,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2024 market rate survey for licensed family homes.(E) $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for trauma informed care supports.(c) Funding in this subsection must be expended with internal controls that provide child-level detail for all transactions.(d) On July 1st of each fiscal year, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;(ii) The reason for each overpayment;(iii) The total cost of overpayments;(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.(5) (($10,754,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to comply with new federal requirements of the child care development fund grant, including implementing enrollment-based pay, prospective pay, and to not pursue overpayments in certain cases.))Within existing resources, the department of children, youth, and families and the office of the superintendent of public instruction must determine best practices, shared strategies, and data sharing approaches for the joint development of regional, public-facing data dashboards that support the transition from early learning to the K-12 education system. The department and the office must collaborate to identify system needs and information technology infrastructure requirements to improve access to actionable, consumer-friendly data for families, school districts, and early learning providers. The joint dashboards developed as part of this work must build from existing dashboards and must include regularly updated key indicators such as program supply and demand, enrollment trends, and outcomes of state early learning investments, disaggregated by geography, program type, and family demographics. The joint dashboards must be completed by June 30, 2026.(6) $13,166,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.806(1)(a).(7) $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is reimbursed by the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families for qualifying expenditures of the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.(8) (($3,313,000))$3,456,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($3,323,000))$3,466,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($9,303,000))$9,018,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.(9) The department shall place a ((ten))10 percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. ((In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature,))By November 1st of every year the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements to the governor and legislature.(10) $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.(11) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.(12) $265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.(13)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry each school year. By October of each fiscal year, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.(14) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, the tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.(15) Within existing resources, the department, in consultation with the office of tribal relations, must prioritize complex needs funds and equity grants to tribal early learning providers.(16) $8,144,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,264,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) Sufficient funding is provided in this section for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5752 (child care & early dev.).(18) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(19) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive.(20) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with Washington communities for children to maintain a community-based early childhood network.(21) $1,812,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2689 (working connect. child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22) $181,266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $2,000,000 of the education legacy trustâstate appropriation, and $7,138,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the early support for infants and toddlers program, including staffing and operational costs to administer the program, to provide early intervention services to all eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age, as established by RCW 43.216.580. The department shall reimburse providers in accordance with state and federal requirements, including part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act and Title XIX of the federal social security act. By December 1, 2026, the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, shall report to the legislature the following information, delineated by early intervention service provider:(a) An unduplicated count of children served;(b) Total state funding reimbursed including, but not limited to, the state share of any payments under Title XIX or XXI of the social security act;(c) Total federal funding reimbursed including, but not limited to, any public insurance;(d) Other funding expended for qualifying services, which may include private insurance, fees, family contributions, grants, philanthropy, or other fund sources that are available; and(e) An assessment of whether service providers are fully leveraging federal and other nonstate funding for qualifying services, including billing applicable funding sources such as public and private insurance and family fees such as copayments and deductibles prior to using state and federal funds for early intervention services, as required by WAC 110-400-0140.(23) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128 (child care workforce board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 237. 2025 c 424 s 237 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($291,756,000))Â Â Â Â Â $963,589,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($293,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $638,403,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($224,909,000))Â Â Â Â Â $370,862,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$713,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,374,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,086,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$484,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$380,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($812,863,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,975,517,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(((2)))(1) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $47,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(((3)))(2) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.(((4) $2,640,000))(3) $3,560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($2,640,000))$3,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $181,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to plaintiff's fees, the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, exceptional placement costs, and monitoring and implementation.(((5)))(4) $1,494,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(((6)))(5) $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of the emergency adolescent housing pilot program. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.(((7)))(6) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(((8)))(7) $13,990,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $17,903,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $31,893,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to begin design, development, and implementation of the comprehensive child welfare information system. The funding in this section is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((9) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(10)))(8) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain rates for independent living service providers.(((11)))(9) $88,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $82,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $29,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12)))(10) $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $11,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13)))(11) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1177 (child welfare housing assist.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14)))(12) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $38,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for the department to:(a) Provide information and support to parents and caregivers on how to become the representative payee for a child or youth receiving social security benefits and maintain eligibility for those benefits when the department is the representative payee and the child is exiting the department's care;(b) Provide information and support to youth turning 18 on how to become the payee for social security benefits and maintain eligibility for those benefits when the department is the representative payee, unless the youth requires a representative payee to manage the funds;(c) Adopt rules to notify caregivers and parties to the dependency proceeding when the department applies for social security or other benefits on behalf of a child and establish procedures for children and caregivers to request and for the department to approve the disbursement of social security and other public benefits to meet the unmet personal needs of a child when the department is the representative payee for such benefits. The department shall adopt rules by January 1, 2026; and(d) Submit a report to the legislature by November 1, 2025, that includes:(i) An updated implementation plan to discontinue the practice of using any benefits paid to or on behalf of a child or youth to reimburse itself for the cost of care and conserve benefits for the future needs of the child by the earliest date feasible;(ii) A description of costs and recommendations for statutory changes necessary to conserve benefits in a manner in which the funds will not count against eligibility for federal or state means-tested programs;(iii) Data on the number of children or youth receiving social security and other public benefits, by age;(iv) The average amount of federal benefits collected per child or youth in fiscal year 2025; and(v) Recommendations for additional supports for families and youth to maintain benefits after reunification or exit from care.(((15)))(13) $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab. ombuds). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(14) $42,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for legal costs that exceed the amount covered by the self-insurance liability account as follows:(a) $5,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Wolf for Estate of Ford v. State, King County Superior Court, Cause No. 23-2-25597-6 SEA.(b) $5,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in J.P., et al. v. State, Thurston County Superior Court, Cause No. 22-2-00326-34.(c) $2,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Anderson by Graves, et al. v. State, et al., Thurston County Superior Court, Cause No. 24-2-02642-34.(d) $10,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in A.G., et al. v. State, et al., King County Superior Court, Cause No. 23-2-02517-2 SEA.(e) $4,600,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in K.W.L. by Wolf v. State, Spokane County Superior Court, Cause No. 24-2-05153-32.(f) $8,500,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Wolf for Estate of Green v. State, et al., King County Superior Court, Cause No. 23-2-09548-1 SEA.(g) $1,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Tandberg, et al. v. State, King County Superior Court, Cause No. 19-2-25178-6 SEA; and(h) $6,500,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in D.H., et al. v. State, Pierce County Superior Court, Cause No. 18-2-10118-8.(15) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $23,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for dedicated staffing in the community to work directly with youth on the community transition services program.(16) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to meet financial obligations under the terms of a voluntary resolution agreement relating to discrimination against parents with disabilities that has been made with the department of health and human services and the department of justice.(17) $231,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $31,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2689 (working connect. child care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(End of part)PART IIINATURAL RESOURCESSec. 301. 2025 c 424 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($693,000))Â Â Â Â Â $723,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($730,000))Â Â Â Â Â $784,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$32,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,699,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,780,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$138,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,292,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,457,000Sec. 302. 2025 c 424 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($32,456,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,668,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($35,602,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,532,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($245,110,000))Â Â Â Â Â $245,164,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($39,590,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,596,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($15,805,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,295,000Emergency Drought Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,000,000Laboratory Accreditation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,102,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($12,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,498,000Reclamation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,907,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,910,000Flood Control Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,826,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,840,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$692,000Refrigerant Emission Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,385,000State Emergency Water Projects Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($44,132,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,404,000State Drought Preparedness AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$219,000State and Local Improvements Revolving AccountâWaterSupply FacilitiesâState Appropriation. . . .$186,000Water Rights Tracking System AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$48,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$582,000Wood Stove Education and Enforcement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$618,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,258,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,257,000Water Rights Processing AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$39,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($74,491,000))Â Â Â Â Â $78,080,000Underground Storage Tank AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,122,000Biosolids Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,118,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,132,000Hazardous Waste Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($11,589,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,632,000Radioactive Mixed Waste AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($27,611,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,864,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,929,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,012,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,382,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,364,000Air Operating Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,995,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,010,000Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator CertificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($831,000))Â Â Â Â Â $830,000Oil Spill Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,076,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($361,962,000))Â Â Â Â Â $355,896,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâLocalAppropriation. . . .$499,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$17,323,000Voluntary Cleanup AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$373,000Paint Product Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$152,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,517,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,563,000Clean Fuels Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($6,850,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,898,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($71,424,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,709,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,070,583,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,072,610,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to provide funding, technical assistance, and/or coordination support equally to the seven Puget Sound marine resources committees.(2) $600,000 of the oil spill prevention accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.(3) (($102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))$204,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.(4) $24,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.(6) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from overburdened communities, to assist with developing a water quality implementation plan for polychlorinated biphenyls and to address other emerging contaminants in the Spokane river. The department must also consult with the Spokane tribe of Indians and other interested tribes when developing and implementing actions to address water quality in the Spokane river.(7) $4,002,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to address flood prevention in the Nooksack basin and Sumas prairie. Of this amount:(a) $2,000,000 is provided solely to expand and sustain Whatcom county's floodplain integrated planning (FLIP) team planning process, including supporting communication, community participation, coordination, technical studies and analysis, and development of local solutions.(b) $900,000 is provided solely for the department to support transboundary coordination, including facilitation and technical support to develop and evaluate alternatives for managing transboundary flooding in Whatcom county and British Columbia.(c) $1,102,000 is provided solely to support dedicated local and department capacity for floodplain planning and technical support. Of the amount in this subsection (7)(c), $738,000 is solely for a grant to Whatcom county. The remaining amount is for the department to provide ongoing staff technical assistance and support to flood prevention efforts in this area.(8) $24,536,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for capacity grants to federally recognized tribes for: (a) Consultation on spending decisions on grants in accordance with RCW 70A.65.305; (b) consultation on clean energy siting projects; (c) activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation; (d) developing tribal clean energy projects; (e) applying for state or federal grant funding; (f) participation on a science advisory panel and other associated work on offshore wind; and (g) other related work. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their grant application. Of this amount, $3,000,000 is reserved solely to ensure completion of grants awarded or amended between January 1, 2025, and June 30, 2025.(9) $1,375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in water resource inventory area 1 (Nooksack).(10) $2,468,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for addressing air quality in overburdened communities highly impacted by air pollution under RCW 70A.65.020.(11) $2,256,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to landowners and local governments to promote voluntary compliance, implement best management practices, and support implementation of water quality clean-up plans in shellfish growing areas, agricultural areas, forestlands, and other types of land uses, including technical assistance focused on protection and restoration of critical riparian management areas important for salmon recovery.(12) $1,914,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities related to coastal hazards, including expanding the coastal monitoring and analysis program, operating a coastal hazard organizational resilience team, and operating a coastal hazards grant program to help local communities design projects and apply for funding opportunities. At least 25 percent of the funding in this subsection must be used for the benefit of tribes.(13) $276,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to San Juan county for the enhancement of ongoing oil spill response preparedness staff hiring, spill response equipment acquisition, and spill response training and operational expenses.(14) $750,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(a) Identify additional priority consumer products containing PFAS for potential regulatory action; and(b) Issue orders to manufacturers under RCW 70A.350.040 and 70A.350.030 to obtain ingredient information, including for chemical ingredients used to replace priority chemicals.(((17)))(15) $4,428,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation, $2,212,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, and $1,864,000 of the hazardous waste assistance accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to address and mitigate 6PPD. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection. Of these amounts:(a) $1,094,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to conduct monitoring and analyze water and sediment for 6PPD.(b) $1,864,000 of the hazardous waste assistance accountâstate appropriation and $1,118,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to find safer alternatives to 6PPD in consumer products.(c) $4,428,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to identify effective best management practices to treat 6PPD in stormwater.(((18)))(16) $1,317,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist local governments in building climate resilience by addressing emerging implementation challenges and updating guidance for local jurisdictions, including integration of updated climate policies through amendments to local shoreline master programs.(((19) $331,000))(17) $166,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate implementation of the state's climate resilience strategy developed pursuant to chapter 70A.05 RCW. The department shall coordinate resilience activities among state agencies identified in the strategy, gather data from state agencies to support tracking and progress reporting, and conduct outreach and engagement. The department may also facilitate the establishment of the recommended durable governance structure and support implementation of key resilience activities, as resources allow.(((20)))(18) $542,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support research to enhance understanding of European green crab behavior and dispersal in Washington's waters and inform the state's response to this invasive pest. The department shall hold technical assistance workshops for natural resource managers to implement larval identification monitoring programs.(((21)))(19)(a) $3,908,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation and $100,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to:(i) Investigate and monitor the sources and impacts of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in the environment;(ii) Identify and reduce the risks posed by PFAS used in industry, manufacturing, and businesses through outreach activities and technical assistance to those that have or currently use PFAS;(iii) Support water quality source control and treatment of PFAS at municipal wastewater facilities and cleanup sites. The department will use the amount identified in this subsection from the water quality permit account to complete a study of state waste discharge permittees to inform how the state should best manage these discharges; and(iv) Increase cleanup capacity at PFAS contaminated sites.(b) When engaging in work benefiting specific communities, the department shall prioritize investments to benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010 with a goal of investing at least 40 percent of funds to this purpose.(((22)))(20) $400,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a report that analyzes equity and accessibility considerations for environmental incident reporting and resolution, and to provide recommendations for changes and improvements. The department will consult with relevant government entities that manage environmental incident reporting for incidents that pollute and damage land, air, and water, such as the department of health, the office of the attorney general, regional air agencies, and relevant state and local agencies. The department will consult with Washington state community based and non-governmental organizations representing overburdened communities. The department may contract with a third party to prepare the report.(a) The report must include: (i) An overview of the existing environmental incident reporting systems in Washington state and a description of business objectives; (ii) challenges, barriers, and accessibility concerns with the current state environmental incident reporting systems; (iii) evaluation of possible service gaps in incident reporting in overburdened communities; and (iv) options and recommendations for improving environmental incident reporting, including improvements to reporting access, process transparency, and equitable service to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations.(b) By October 1, 2026, the department must submit its final report and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.(((23)))(21) $639,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, $255,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation, $128,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation, and $128,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of environmental justice requirements in the HEAL act, state and federal environmental justice and equity mandates, and embed expertise within specific environmental programs.(((24)))(22) The department must report the department's expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department approved calculator tool or methodology.(((25)))(23) $275,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1912 (agricultural fuel/CCA exemption). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26)))(24) $2,816,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1975 (climate commitment act). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27)))(25) $1,115,000 of the clean fuels program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28)))(26) $426,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1462 (hydrofluorocarbons). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(29)))(27) $196,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5033 (biosolids/PFAS chemicals). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30)))(28) $89,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1670 (sewage-containing spills). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(31)))(29) $493,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1154 (solid waste handling). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(32) $1,656,000))(30) $2,133,000 of the waste, reduction, recycling, and litter control accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33)))(31) $261,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1497 (waste material management). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34)))(32) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when determining the placement of air quality monitoring for the benefit of overburdened communities as required in RCW 70A.65.020(1)(b), the department must prioritize:(a) Placing air monitoring stations in locations that are physically within overburdened communities;(b) Engaging with local and tribal governments and community organizations; and(c) Funding and supporting, to the extent feasible, evidence-supported community-based air monitoring for PM 2.5 pollutants in overburdened communities.(((36)))(33) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.(((39) $670,000))(34) $510,000 of the ((model toxics control operating))climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5036 (statewide emissions data). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(35) $148,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 419, Laws of 2025 (SHB 2077).(36) $2,102,000 of the laboratory accreditation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement Senate Bill No. 6151 (env. programs/fee accounts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(37) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the development and implementation of phase 3 of the Vancouver lake clean-up plan.(38) $603,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6246 (emissions/trade-exposed). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(39) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to engage with the department of archaeology and historic preservation in the development of a model ordinance for archaeological and cultural resource protection.(40) $466,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation and $45,000 of the air pollution control accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2215 (fuels/climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(41) $226,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2416 (waste to energy facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(42) $50,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to develop a report to the legislature to characterize and, to the extent feasible, quantify water and energy use for emerging large energy use facilities and estimate no cost allowances allocated to emerging large energy use facilities in Washington under RCW 70A.65.120. The department shall use information that is publicly available or voluntarily disclosed by utilities to provide estimations. In its report, the department shall also describe assumptions and limitations of its findings and gaps. "Emerging large energy use facility" means a facility that has a maximum aggregate contract demand of 20 megawatts or more and is primarily engaged in providing a service described under code 518210 of the 2022 North American industry classification system. The department must submit the report to the legislature by December 1, 2026.Sec. 303. 2025 c 424 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($1,139,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,138,000Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,241,000Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,311,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,360,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,690,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,739,000Sec. 304. 2025 c 424 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($32,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,196,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($33,007,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,905,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($7,289,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($980,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,591,000Millersylvania Park Current AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,000Winter Recreation Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,943,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$333,000Snowmobile AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,732,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$375,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($166,674,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,805,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$720,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($252,904,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,607,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.(2) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the commission must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(3) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for cultural resource vulnerability assessments.(4) (($1,111,000))$2,565,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operation costs at the Fort Worden state park campus. The state parks and recreation commission shall develop a long-term management plan for the campus.(5) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for grants for water safety education for both motorized and nonmotorized water users of Lake Union.(6) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,200,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the commission. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. It is the intent of the legislature to provide up to $3,800,000 of general fundâstate appropriations in each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium and each subsequent fiscal year for the purposes of this subsection.(7) $454,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to replace energy systems in state park buildings with more energy efficient models, which must be fully electric where feasible.Sec. 305. 2025 c 424 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($4,354,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,015,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($3,717,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,777,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($6,332,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,328,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$24,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$483,000Firearms Range AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$394,000((Recreation Access Pass AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$150,000))Recreation Resources AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,402,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,493,000NOVA Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,601,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,600,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($22,494,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,151,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $37,000 of the firearms range accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.(2) (($5,402,000))$5,493,000 of the recreation resources accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).(3) (($1,601,000))$1,600,000 of the NOVA program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.(4) $1,704,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,704,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operational and administrative support of lead entities and salmon recovery regions.(5) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install and store near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood canal bridge.(6) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the office must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(((9)))(7) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5281 (vessel length/nonresident). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 306. 2025 c 424 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,997,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($4,118,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,987,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$100,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$245,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,460,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,329,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $100,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the agency to hire staff to respond to increased caseloads, including appeals as a result of the climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021.(2) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the office must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(3) $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(5) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5334 (DNR civil enforcement appeal). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 307. 2025 c 424 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$14,114,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($14,101,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,406,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,482,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,506,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,756,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,719,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,110,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,032,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,587,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($2,500,000))$3,750,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the commission to work with conservation districts to implement priority forest health and community wildfire resilience projects.(2) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to connect scientists, practitioners, and researchers and coordinate efforts to monitor and quantify benefits of best management practices on agricultural lands, and better understand values and motivations of landowners to implement voluntary incentive programs.(3) $10,719,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(4) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the commission must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(5) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to increase native tree and shrub availability for riparian restoration projects under the governor's salmon strategy.Sec. 308. 2025 c 424 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($168,876,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,325,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($164,430,000))Â Â Â Â Â $162,098,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($172,080,000))Â Â Â Â Â $171,247,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($76,648,000))Â Â Â Â Â $76,238,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,560,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,394,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,146,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$558,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,651,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,702,000Recreational Fisheries Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,999,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,009,000State Agency Office Relocation Pool AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$344,000Warm Water Game Fish AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,116,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,126,000Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($396,000))Â Â Â Â Â $400,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($40,680,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,748,000Special Wildlife AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,945,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,965,000Special Wildlife AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($532,000))Â Â Â Â Â $538,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($3,864,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,900,000Wildlife Rehabilitation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($361,000))Â Â Â Â Â $486,000Ballast Water and Biofouling Management AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid RecoveryAccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$5,001,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,334,000Aquatic Invasive Species Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,038,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,158,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($9,805,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,804,000Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($105,030,000))Â Â Â Â Â $107,597,000Oyster Reserve Land AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($524,000))Â Â Â Â Â $528,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($783,833,000))Â Â Â Â Â $787,822,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.(2) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(3) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(4) $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(5) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.(6) $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide annual progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 15th of each fiscal year.(7)(a) $390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources statewide for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department shall not hire contract range riders in northeast Washington unless there is a gap in coverage from entities funded through the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. The department must focus on facilitating coordination with other entities providing conflict deterrence, including range riding, and technical assistance to livestock producers in order to minimize wolf-livestock issues. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.(b) ((Of))Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, (($200,000))the department shall ((be used to)) implement a conflict mitigation pilot program in Southeast Washington ((in partnership with projects guarding the respective interests of predators and humans)).(8) $639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.(9) $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.(10) $6,042,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue and increase the capacity to analyze salmon contaminants of emerging concern (CEC), including substances such as 6PPD-quinone, per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), and polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) in already collected tissue samples. This research will accelerate recovery and protection by identifying the location and sources of CEC exposure.(11) $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an external facilitator to seek solutions through a collaborative process using the department's wolf advisory group.(12) $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to manage electronic tracked crab fishery gear to avoid whale entanglements during their migration in accordance with the endangered species act incidental take permit.(13) $1,200,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to reduce severe wildfire risk and increase forest resiliency through fuels reduction, thinning, fuel break creation, and prescribed burning on agency lands. The amounts provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(14) $14,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($14,000,000))$13,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the protection, recovery, and restoration of biodiversity, the recovery of threatened and endangered species, and a review of the department of fish and wildlife. Examples include habitat protection and restoration, technical assistance for growth management act planning, fish passage improvements, conservation education, scientific research for species and ecosystem protection, and similar activities. Funding in this subsection may include pass-throughs to public, nonprofit, academic, or tribal entities for the purposes of this subsection.(15) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(16) $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.(17) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($3,750,000))$3,170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,200,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands. It is the intent of the legislature to provide up to $3,800,000 of general fundâstate appropriations in each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium and each subsequent fiscal year for the purposes of this subsection.(18) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.(19) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for habitat recovery and restoration work on agency owned and managed lands damaged from wildfires.(20) (($1,866,000))$933,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($584,000))$292,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($1,219,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $513,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation,)) $5,000 of the ORV and nonhighway vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $104,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation, $22,000 of the warm water game fish accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement accountâstate appropriation, $271,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $21,000 of the special wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $9,000 of the oil spill prevention accountâstate appropriation, $56,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, and (($634,000))$1,859,000 of the fish, wildlife, and conservation accountâstate appropriation, are provided solely to procure a human resource management system. The agency will evaluate and prioritize management systems that have the capability to track and manage volunteer safety training requirements. A letter must be sent to the director of the office of financial management explaining the rationale if the agency selects a technical solution that is not able to support management of volunteer training requirements. The project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(21) $1,810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,620,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for monitoring and response efforts for invasive quagga mussels. Possible activities include coordination with tribal, federal, regional, state, and local entities, watercraft inspections and decontamination, equipment and training, monitoring of potential residential and commercial pathways, and public outreach.(22) $1,150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $530,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for increasing management planning capacity for habitat connectivity and to achieve meaningful greenhouse gas emissions reduction through energy efficiency projects.(23) (($900,000))$694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($489,000))$695,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement response efforts to chronic wasting disease in accordance with the chronic wasting disease management plan.(24) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue operations of the Toutle and Skamania hatcheries.(25) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5076 (nonspot shrimp pot license). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(26) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a conflict resolution process mediated by the federal mediation and conciliation service. This funding must be used by the department to facilitate meetings between Skagit tribes, drainage and irrigation districts, and state and federal resource agencies and support the technical work necessary to resolve conflict. Invited parties must include the national marine fisheries service, Washington state department of agriculture, Washington state department of fish and wildlife, Swinomish Indian tribal community, Upper Skagit Indian Tribe, Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe, and Skagit drainage and irrigation districts consortium LLC. A report documenting meeting notes, points of resolution, and recommendations must be provided to the legislature no later than June 30, 2026.(((28)))(27) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall work with its wolf advisory group and the department of agriculture to explore the concept of a "pay for presence" program to defray some of the costs incurred by livestock producers who ranch in the presence of wolves. Such programs have been used in other parts of wolf range in the western United States and could serve as a replacement for the state's current indirect livestock compensation program. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, on potential alternatives, estimated costs, and feasibility, including the appropriate administering agency, of implementing such a program in Washington state.(28) $350,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to complete the identification of offsets and opportunities for recreation associated with the potential draw down of reservoirs on the lower Snake river. The funding in this subsection may be used to match private funds and in-kind staff contributions. For the purposes of this analysis, recreational fishing areas include fisheries constrained by the ESA listings in the Snake river basin, including buoy 10 and marine area 1, lower mainstem Columbia river, the lower Snake river, and the Snake river tributaries. The analysis shall include estimated fisheries numbers provided by tribal and joint state fishery professionals. The department shall provide a final report to the governor and the natural resource committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.Sec. 309. 2025 c 424 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIPGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($8,278,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,198,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($8,468,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,489,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($32,210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,218,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,514,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,520,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,365,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,371,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($51,835,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,796,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) By October 15, 2026, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2027-2029 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.(2) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the partnership to implement shipping noise reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington maritime blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington maritime blue will support a quiet sound leadership committee and work groups that include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.Sec. 310. 2025 c 424 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($163,143,000))Â Â Â Â Â $162,670,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($163,174,000))Â Â Â Â Â $157,030,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($117,454,000))Â Â Â Â Â $141,086,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($5,772,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,361,000Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,248,000))Â Â Â Â Â $624,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($7,072,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,117,000Derelict Structure Removal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,605,000Forest Development AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($58,281,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,641,000Forest Fire Protection Assessment NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($492,000))Â Â Â Â Â $246,000Forest Fire Protection Assessment NonappropriatedAccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($578,000))Â Â Â Â Â $289,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($11,734,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,796,000Natural Resources Federal Lands RevolvingNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($108,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,000NOVA Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$750,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($8,094,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,212,000State Forest Nursery Revolving NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($194,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,000Surveys and Maps AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,362,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,595,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($21,801,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,233,000Resource Management Cost AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($124,332,000))Â Â Â Â Â $140,343,000Surface Mining Reclamation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($6,643,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,663,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($23,874,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,968,000Forest and Fish Support AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($11,564,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,579,000Budget Stabilization AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$141,291,000Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$395,000Natural Resources Conservation Areas StewardshipAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($54,000))Â Â Â Â Â $303,000Forest Practices Application AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,157,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,170,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($936,000))Â Â Â Â Â $946,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($959,000))Â Â Â Â Â $966,000Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and CommunityResilience AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($117,658,000))Â Â Â Â Â $124,305,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,627,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,644,000Community Forest Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,000Agricultural College Trust Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,543,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,829,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($868,156,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,063,360,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,823,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.(3) $1,583,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.(4) (($85,320,000))$79,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($85,320,000))$79,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, ((and)) $16,050,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation, and $141,291,000 of the budget stabilization accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed. The department shall also provide a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with an update of costs and accomplishments resulting from implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2021.(5) $8,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $396,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression.(6) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding $8,000,000 per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than $8,000,000 but less than $8,500,000 for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and $8,500,000 shall lapse.(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2025, and December 1, 2026, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.(8) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.(9) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to $100 per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.(((11)))(10) $3,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for investment in urban forestry to support reduction of negative environmental conditions such as heat, flooding, and pollution and helping communities become greener, cleaner, healthier, and more resilient.(((12)))(11) $1,830,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to make investments in education and training to bolster a statewide natural resources workforce to support the health and resilience of Washington's forests. Of this amount, $400,000 is provided solely to provide wildland fire management training to tribal communities and members.(((13)))(12) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(((14)))(13) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, fully implement the T3 watershed experiments on state trust lands, continue field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration.(((15)))(14) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($3,750,000))$3,170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands. It is the intent of the legislature to provide up to $3,800,000 of general fundâstate appropriations in each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium and each subsequent fiscal year for the purposes of this subsection.(((16)))(15) $2,543,000 of the resource management cost accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs on state-owned aquatic lands and adjacent lands as appropriate. The department must report to and coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife to support the department of fish and wildlife's quarterly progress reports to the legislature.(((17)))(16) The department must enter into an interagency agreement with the department of fish and wildlife to complete biological survey work necessary to implement the wildstock geoduck commercial fishery. The department must compensate the department of fish and wildlife for direct costs, but not for agency overhead or indirect costs.(((18)))(17) $440,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1563 (prescribed fire claims). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(18) $50,000,000 of the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the following purposes: $20,000,000 is provided solely for wildfire response as described in RCW 76.04.511(3)(a), $20,000,000 is provided solely for forest restoration as described in RCW 76.04.511(3)(b), and $10,000,000 is provided solely for community resilience as described in RCW 76.04.511(3)(c).Sec. 311. 2025 c 424 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($98,069,000))Â Â Â Â Â $101,222,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($95,345,000))Â Â Â Â Â $99,159,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($47,675,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,097,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$193,000Agricultural Pest and Disease Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,894,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,932,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,609,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,649,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$73,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,527,000Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock ManagementNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($911,000))Â Â Â Â Â $912,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($263,201,000))Â Â Â Â Â $270,764,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $20,570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $20,570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as base funding for the emergency food assistance program as provided in RCW 43.23.290.(2) $46,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $46,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as additional funding for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.(3) $4,342,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($4,000,000))$3,262,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants.(4) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as base funding for the farm to school program established in RCW 15.64.060.(5) (($2,380,000))$5,460,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,380,000))$5,475,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing a Popillia japonica monitoring and eradication program in central Washington and King county.(6) $912,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:(a) Offer grants for the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a high probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other grantees of the program and other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with GPS track logs and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife on a monthly basis. The department shall incorporate the requirements of this subsection into contract language with the grantees.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department may provide up to $100,000 each fiscal year to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.(7) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($425,000))$850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 135, Laws of 2022, which requires the department to establish and maintain cannabis testing lab quality standards by rule.(8) $1,490,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity and support work to reduce nitrate pollution in groundwater from irrigated agriculture in the lower Yakima valley.(9) (($462,000))$651,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($462,000))$651,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($700,000))$988,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to match federal funding for eradication treatments in King and Pierce counties and follow-up monitoring of invasive moths.(10) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue the early detection program for the spotted lanternfly and the associated invasive Ailanthus altissima, known colloquially as tree-of-heaven, survey and control programs.(11) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the department must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(12) $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position.(13) $318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $317,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.(((15)))(14) $893,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support planning and development of statewide livestock composting infrastructure to protect human health and reduce greenhouse gas emission.(((16)))(15) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1309 (burrowing shrimp). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17)))(16) $118,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1294 (pesticide application committee). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) $140,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to create program guidelines for a future green fertilizer grant program that aligns with the recommendations of the 2024 green fertilizer work group report.(18) The department shall transfer $500,000 from the fruit and vegetable inspection account to the plant pest account within the local agricultural fund. The amount transferred must be derived from fees collected for state inspections of tree fruit and shall be used solely to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards for the cost of pest control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their existing authority in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW. The transfer of funds shall occur by June 30, 2026.(19) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2238 (statewide food security). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 312. 2025 c 424 s 312 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ENERGY FACILITY SITE EVALUATION COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,626,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,633,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,679,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,069,000Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$28,231,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($37,572,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,605,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,068,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support agency operations and to hire additional environmental siting and compliance positions needed to support an anticipated workload increase from new clean energy projects.(2) $1,034,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for preapplication development and clean energy manufacturing review, reimbursement to tribes for costs associated with clean energy project application reviews, and contracted services for green hydrogen and clean energy manufacturing programs.(3) The council must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the council must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(End of part)PART IVTRANSPORTATIONSec. 401. 2025 c 424 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,575,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,338,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,110,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,788,000Architects' License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($298,000))Â Â Â Â Â $281,000Real Estate Commission AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($17,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,880,000Uniform Commercial Code AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,358,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,374,000Real Estate Education Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$276,000Real Estate Appraiser Commission AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($395,000))Â Â Â Â Â $453,000Business and Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($37,266,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,991,000Real Estate Research AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($415,000))Â Â Â Â Â $825,000Concealed Pistol License Renewal NotificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$224,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($41,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($65,598,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,472,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $146,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5294 (professional accounts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(2) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5281 (vessel length/nonresident). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4)))(3) $16,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5714 (bail bond agents/immigration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5)))(4) $2,440,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1023 (cosmetology compact). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7)))(5) $150,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).(6) $4,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation and $23,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5420 (veteran benefits access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7) $13,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (real estate/exclusive market). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 402. 2025 c 424 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($81,686,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,343,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($83,860,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,237,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$17,026,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($3,173,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,232,000911 AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,867,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,804,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,710,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,672,000County Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,916,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,917,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,811,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,810,000Fire Service Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$131,000Vehicle License Fraud AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$119,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,400,000Fire Service Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($14,289,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,343,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$596,000Fingerprint Identification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($15,490,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,539,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($242,611,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,036,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($7,500,000))$19,900,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.(2) $500,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation, is provided solely for the early deployment or prepositioning of Washington state fire service resources in advance of an expected mobilization event. Any authorization for the deployment of resources under this section must be authorized in accordance with section 6 of the Washington state fire services resource mobilization plan.(3) $1,000,000 of the fire service training accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.(4) Any funds provided to the missing and exploited children task force shall ensure operations are adherent to federally established internet crimes against children standards.(5) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5655 (child care centers/buildings). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $71,000 of the fingerprint identification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearm purchasing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(7)(a) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to provide assistance to the forensic investigation council for the following:(i) Compliance with chapter 42.56 RCW (public records act), chapter 42.30 RCW (open public meetings act), records management requirements, general administrative support, and payment processing;(ii) In coordination with Washington technology solutions, the creation and maintenance of a website for the forensic investigation council; and(iii) In coordination with Washington technology solutions, state email addresses for the forensic investigation council.(b) To provide this assistance, the Washington state patrol may assist directly or may enter into interagency agreements as it deems appropriate.(8) $318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to fund one field responder position and one fiscal technician position within the all-risk mobilization program.(9) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a grant to the Snohomish county sheriff's office to support their rotary wing aviation support unit.(10) $60,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5880 (toxicology testing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(End of part)PART VEDUCATIONSec. 501. 2025 c 424 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($59,939,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,262,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($55,045,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,456,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($149,780,000))Â Â Â Â Â $149,347,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,083,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$637,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($658,000))Â Â Â Â Â $655,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$291,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$213,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($274,646,000))Â Â Â Â Â $278,944,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE(a) (($27,766,000))$28,089,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($27,685,000))$29,120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Funding in this subsection may only be used for the following purposes:(i) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in this section and sections 515 and 523 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements;(ii) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year;(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall perform ongoing program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor;(iv) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within 30 days of finalizing contracts. The data must include, but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data;(v) Ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee;(vi) Activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW; and(vii) The office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule; and(viii) Beginning July 1, 2026, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature when allocating title II, part A and title IV, part A federal funding to eligible local education agencies. The report must include:(A) The amount of funding received by each local education agency;(B) The purpose of the funding;(C) The amount of funding received by the office as set-aside funding for statewide activities;(D) The amount of funding received by the office as set-aside funding for administrative purposes;(E) A list of contracts funded by the office using the set-aside funding described in (c) and (d) of this subsection.(b) $826,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $804,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.(c) $3,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the financial education public-private partnership and for the implementation of chapter 238, Laws of 2022 (student financial literacy) which provides grants to school districts for integrating financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff. Of the amounts provided within this subsection, up to $1,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in each fiscal year may be used for the operational expenses of the financial education public private partnership.(d) $2,393,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for providing proactive and solutions-oriented regional and local technical and financial assistance to districts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for ((school)):(i) School districts that have been removed from their insurance risk pool due to district financial trouble for the difference between the previous cost of insurance provided through the Washington schools risk management pool and the cost of purchasing private insurance; and(ii) School districts with enrollment of less than 500 students under enhanced financial oversight, to support the repayment of outstanding interfund loans. Priority shall be given to the school district that has been in binding conditions for the longest period.(e) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5004 (school emergency response). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(f) $224,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5009 (vehicle types student transpo). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(g) $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (educational interpreters). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(h) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(i) $747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1296 (public education system). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(j) $6,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). The funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for 20 pilot schools to establish school-wide centers of excellence for inclusionary practices. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(k) $194,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $156,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(l) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (materials, supplies and op costs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(m) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1079 (remote testing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(n) $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education to 22). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(o) $21,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 (interfund loans/schools). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(p) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and)), $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $400,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation of funds attributable to state-level activities under title II, part A of the elementary and secondary education act, are provided solely for demonstration projects showcasing the processes and outcomes of building school-wide systems to support students in distress and prevent crisis escalation cycles that may result in restraint or isolation.(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide grants to school districts for:(A) ((Six))Up to 10 demonstration sites to showcase best practices and serve as learning communities and examples that allow other school districts to observe positive practices in real-world settings; and(B) Increasing the number of pilot sites to engage in targeted professional development through learning experiences offered by the demonstration sites and contracted providers.(ii) The pilot sites must:(A) Build school-level and district-level systems that incorporate positive, trauma-informed behavior support practices to prevent crisis escalation and reduce the use of restraint and isolation; and(B) Improve data collection and reporting systems and complete other tasks to achieve the project goal.(iii) By November 15, 2026, and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with a report on the demonstration projects. The report must, to the extent possible, quantify the impact of the demonstration projects in terms of student outcomes, such as changes in disruptive student behavior, increases in the amount of time students with disabilities spend in the general education setting, or increases in assessment scores. The report must include an estimate of the fiscal impact that use of the practices identified in this subsection might have on school district budgets if adopted statewide. The report must also address key implementation challenges and findings, as well as include recommendations for statewide policy changes.(iv) Beginning July 1, 2026, school districts may use federal title II, part A funding under the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 to continue previous or existing demonstration sites and pilot sites, or to implement trauma-informed professional development programs, as defined in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1795 (student restraint, isolation), as an allowable use of federal title II, part A funding in order to improve the quality and effectiveness of teachers, principals, and other school leaders to increase student achievement.(q) $164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5969 (IEP transition plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(r) $84,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (financial aid applications). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(s) $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5922 (transportation vehicle fund). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(t) $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6268 (special ed. complaint record). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(u) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for increased dues for the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children.(v) $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5346 (student mobile device use). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(w) $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6065 (school vehicle funds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) DATA SYSTEMS(a) $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).(b) $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.(c) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.(d) Within existing resources, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of children, youth, and families must determine best practices, shared strategies, and data sharing approaches for the joint development of regional, public-facing data dashboards that support the transition from early learning to the K-12 education system. The office and the department must collaborate to identify system needs and information technology infrastructure requirements to improve access to actionable, consumer-friendly data for families, school districts, and early learning providers. The joint dashboards developed as part of this work must build from existing dashboards and must include regularly updated key indicators such as program supply and demand, enrollment trends, and outcomes of state early learning investments, disaggregated by geography, program type, and family demographics. The joint dashboards must be completed by June 30, 2026.(3) WORK GROUPS(a) $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 128, Laws of 2023 (regional apprenticeship prgs).(b) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).(c) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).(d) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).(e) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (CTE careers work group). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS(a) $11,705,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($11,586,000))$14,184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $637,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, and (($658,000))$655,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the following statewide programs:(i) The Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080;(ii) The Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs;(iii) School bullying and harassment prevention activities;(iv) Provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being);(v) The school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(vi) Youth suicide prevention activities;(vii) To support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090;(viii) To provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:(A) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;(B) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and(C) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge;(ix) To develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course;(x) To establish a media literacy and digital citizenship ambassador program to promote the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship instruction;(xi) The implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap), chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal), chapter 202, Laws of 2024 (dual and tribal language edu.), chapter 233, Laws of 2020 (educational outcomes), chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot), chapter 164, Laws of 2021 (institutional ed./release), and chapter 107, Laws of 2022 (language access in schools); ((and))(xii) Dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, the entire dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the building bridges statewide program and for grants to districts for life skills training for children and youth in K-12; and(xiii) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $1,399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided for school districts to support youth who are truant under chapter 28A.225 RCW or at risk of becoming truant, and for costs associated with filing or serving petitions under RCW 28A.225.030.(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING$1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.Sec. 502. 2025 c 424 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,104,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,921,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,919,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$361,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,386,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,384,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,890,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,911,000))$1,909,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for the operation and expenses of the state board of education. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the state board of education to be a member in the education commission of the states.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the state board of education for implementation of mastery-based learning in school district demonstration sites. The state board of education shall require grant recipients to report on impacts and participate in a collaborative to share best practices. The funds must be used for grants to school districts, charter schools, or state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW; professional development of educatorsÍ¾ development of a resource suite for school districts statewideÍ¾ evaluation of the demonstration projectÍ¾ and implementation and policy support provided by the state board of education and other partners. Grants for mastery-based learning may be made in partnership with private matching funds.(3) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 503. 2025 c 424 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($17,230,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,680,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($17,171,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,621,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($34,401,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,301,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,518,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($2,523,000))$2,517,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the professional educator standards board must initiate the development of standards for two specialty endorsements, one in elementary ethnic studies and one in secondary ethnic studies. The professional educator standards board must consult with teacher education faculty and ethnic studies faculty to confirm the endorsements reflect the appropriate content necessary for the discipline at developmentally appropriate levels. The ethnic studies specialty endorsements must be available to all certificated teachers who hold a valid teaching license and who demonstrate content and pedagogical knowledge in ethnic studies.(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and up to $496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.(3) $1,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $997,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.(4)(a) (($13,035,000))$12,485,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($13,035,000))$12,485,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, (($12,250,000))$11,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($12,373,000))$11,823,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for grants to districts to provide two days of training per school year in the paraeducator certificate program to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide paraeducators with two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program in each of the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for new paraeducators to receive four days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during their first year. School districts receiving grants under this subsection must prioritize funding toward compensation for paraeducators who complete the required hours of instruction per school year. Of the amounts provided within this subsection (4)(b), up to $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for each fiscal year may be used to further develop, update, and maintain the paraeducator training program and professional learning materials, increase paraeducator access across the full spectrum of training curriculum, and remove barriers for paraeducators who are unable to afford the cost of assessments.(5) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (educational interpreters). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(6) $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1651 (teacher residency & apprent.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(7) $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6278 (teacher & principal programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 504. 2025 c 424 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($9,956,991,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,829,877,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($10,303,630,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,992,139,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,357,730,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,992,730,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($22,618,351,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,814,746,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.(c) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 504 and 505, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.(e) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:General education class size:Â Â Â GradeRCW 28A.150.2602025-26School Year2026-27School YearGrade KÂ 17.0017.00Grade 1Â 17.0017.00Grade 2Â 17.0017.00Grade 3Â 17.0017.00Grade 4Â 27.0027.00Grades 5-6Â 27.0027.00Grades 7-8Â 28.5328.53Grades 9-12Â 28.7428.74The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12.(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade.(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and is considered certificated instructional staff.(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:Â 2025-26School Year2026-27School YearCareer and Technical Education3.913.91Skill Center4.254.25(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:Prototypical School Building:Â Â Elementary SchoolÂ 1.253Middle SchoolÂ 1.353High SchoolÂ 1.880(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025Skill Center students. . . .1.198(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONSIn addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.46 percent in the 2025-26 school year and ((12.46))12.49 percent in the 2026-27 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.79 percent in the 2025-26 school year and ((17.79))17.83 percent in the 2026-27 school year for skill center students.(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSFringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.02 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 16.02 percent in the 2026-27 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.07 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 18.07 percent in the 2026-27 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSInsurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 910 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONSFunding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.(a)(i) Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, general education students generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,614.28 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,656.25 for the 2026-27 school year.(ii) Of the amounts allocated in (a)(i) of this subsection, $35.27 per student FTE for the 2025-26 school year and $37.76 per student FTE for the 2026-27 school year are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.))(iii) For the 2025-26 school year and 2026-27 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (8) exceeds (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (8), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,810.11 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,857.17 for the 2026-27 school year.(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,810.11 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,857.17 for the 2026-27 school year.(d)(i) Subject to (d)(ii) of this subsection, students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at $214.84 for the 2025-26 school year and $220.43 for the 2026-27 school year.(ii) Of the amounts allocated in (d)(i) of this subsection, $4.69 per student FTE for the 2025-26 school year and $5.03 per student FTE for the 2026-27 school year are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.))(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONSFor the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAMThe superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTSFor small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as follows:(a) (($650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and)) $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((are))is provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.(b) $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.(15) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.(16) ((Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2026. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.(17)))(a) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.4 FTE in the 2025-26 school year and 1.3 FTE in the 2026-27 school year including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.4 or 1.3 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction:(i) Must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses provided by the institution of higher education during the summer academic term; and(ii) May average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and the institution of higher education.(b) In consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the participating institutions of higher education, the student achievement council, and the education data center, must annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.(((18)))(17) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.(((19)))(18)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.Sec. 505. 2025 c 424 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâBASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2025-26 school year and the 2026-27 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.Statewide Minimum Salary AllocationÂ Staff Type2025-26School Year2026-27School YearÂ Â Â Certificated Instructional$80,164$82,248Certificated Administrative$118,994$122,088Classified$57,507$59,002(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March 3, 2024, at 11:16 hours and adopted in the 2024 operating budget.(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at the rates specified in section 506 of this act.(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).Sec. 506. 2025 c 424 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($593,474,000))Â Â Â Â Â $368,331,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($738,666,000))Â Â Â Â Â $777,595,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,332,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,145,926,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.5 percent for the 2025-26 school year, and 2.6 percent for the 2026-27 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2025-26 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 15.39 percent for the 2025-26 school year and 15.39 percent for the 2026-27 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 14.72 percent for the 2025-26 school year and 14.72 percent for the 2026-27 school year for classified staff.(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in part IX of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2025-26 school year, $1,307 per month and for the 2026-27 school year, (($1,341))$1,374 per month.(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.(6) $3,554,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier and enrollment limit as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.))Sec. 507. 2025 c 424 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($856,979,000))Â Â Â Â Â $880,949,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($868,449,000))Â Â Â Â Â $871,386,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,725,428,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,752,335,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 507, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year. Funding in this section assumes depreciation payments are adjusted pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6260 (public education funding).(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.(9) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 may be used for increased costs that are directly attributable to increased benefits as provided for under RCW 28A.160.250(4), after all formula and grant obligations in this section are met.Sec. 508. 2025 c 424 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâSCHOOL FOOD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($120,073,000))Â Â Â Â Â $122,053,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($120,062,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$891,898,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$122,041,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,132,033,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,135,993,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $11,703,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,692,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in chapter 74, Laws of 2021 (reduced-price lunch copays);(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs including the summer electronic benefit transfer program, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(4) $83,617,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $83,617,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate.(5) (($24,634,000))$26,614,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($24,634,000))$26,614,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027))education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 379, Laws of 2023 (free school meals).(6) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, funds are assumed in the budget outlook for access to breakfast and lunch for all children served without charge in schools, upon the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6346 (tax on millionaires). Within amounts appropriated in this section, the office shall, no later than November 1, 2026, submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a forecast of the anticipated caseload of children expected to participate in a free breakfast and lunch program. This forecast shall be used to inform the budgets for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.Sec. 509. 2025 c 424 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,247,317,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,328,636,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,381,953,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,466,585,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$646,520,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,694,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,330,484,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,496,435,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:(i) Special education students are basic education students first;(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.(b)(i) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006, except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement any changes to excess cost accounting methods required under chapter 417, Laws of 2023 (special education funding).(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(4)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 509, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(5) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.(6) (($205,458,000))$261,935,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($205,458,000))$320,785,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $29,574,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (6) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.(7) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fundâstate appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.(8) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.(9) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.(10) $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $214,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(11) $660,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for litigation costs for N.D. v. Reykdal, United States District Court for the Western District of Washington.(12) (($114,271,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $195,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier, enrollment limit, and safety net payments as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.(13))) $5,356,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,339,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14)))(13) $5,123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 510. 2025 c 424 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($202,536,000))Â Â Â Â Â $226,420,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($252,636,000))Â Â Â Â Â $241,355,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($455,172,000))Â Â Â Â Â $467,775,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $31,627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($105,389,000))$80,296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an inflation enhancement in addition to the state local effort assistance threshold under RCW 28A.500.015 of $150 per pupil in the 2026 calendar year and (($250))$150 per pupil in the 2027 calendar year.Sec. 511. 2025 c 424 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($19,276,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,410,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($19,361,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,165,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($38,637,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,575,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fundâstate fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.(5) Funding in this section is sufficient to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.(7) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support two student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center and for the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school.(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.(9) $742,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $743,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.(11) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.Sec. 512. 2025 c 424 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($34,718,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,871,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($34,955,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,889,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($69,673,000))Â Â Â Â Â $70,760,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 513, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.Sec. 513. 2025 c 424 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâEDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($119,573,000))Â Â Â Â Â $115,640,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($122,469,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,192,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($97,685,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,680,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,454,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,671,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($342,852,000))Â Â Â Â Â $333,637,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) ACCOUNTABILITY$26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM(a) (($71,642,000))$67,709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($74,508,000))$71,946,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $6,514 per teacher in the 2025-26 school year and a bonus of (($6,677))$6,514 per teacher in the 2026-27 school year;(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and(iv) During the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.(b) $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).(c) $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.(d) $810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($810,000))$405,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.(e) $11,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($11,500,000))$9,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program in the 2025-26 school year. During the 2026-27 school year, funding for the program may only support first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely to support first year educators in the mentoring program.(f) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.Sec. 514. 2025 c 424 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($293,614,000))Â Â Â Â Â $294,655,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($302,318,000))Â Â Â Â Â $295,681,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$137,159,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($733,091,000))Â Â Â Â Â $727,495,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2025-26 and 2026-27; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 516, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.38 percent for school year 2025-26 and ((1.36))2.04 percent for school year 2026-27.(4) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.(5) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.(6) $1,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2026 ((and $1,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.Sec. 515. 2025 c 424 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($515,259,000))Â Â Â Â Â $538,294,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($522,631,000))Â Â Â Â Â $536,498,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$636,542,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,674,432,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,711,334,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The general fundâstate appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b)(i) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) 15 learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(ii) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 517, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the school year period defined under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). A school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.(3) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.(5) Within existing resources, during the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.Sec. 516. 2025 c 424 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâPER PUPIL ALLOCATIONSStatewide Average AllocationsPer Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent StudentBasic Education Program2025-26School Year2026-27School YearGeneral Apportionment(($11,024))$11,029(($11,302))$11,416Pupil Transportation(($835))$849(($856))$889Special Education Programs(($13,928))$14,216(($14,514))$14,863Institutional Education Programs(($27,712))$29,203(($28,355))$29,935Programs for Highly Capable Students$684(($701))$708Transitional Bilingual Programs(($1,686))$1,677(($1,729))$1,708Learning Assistance Program(($1,075))$1,099(($1,103))$1,133Sec. 517. 2025 c 424 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocation purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.(4) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 910 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 910 of this act.(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.(6) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2026, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable programs; and learning assistance programs.(7) The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.Sec. 518. 2025 c 424 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR CHARTER SCHOOLSWashington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($201,773,000))Â Â Â Â Â $178,073,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($201,773,000))Â Â Â Â Â $178,073,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(2) $1,012,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.))(3) $7,715,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enrichment payments to charter schools.(4) $418,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for materials, supplies, and operating costs pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.))Sec. 519. 2025 c 424 s 521 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSIONWashington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($459,000))Â Â Â Â Â $233,000Charter Schools Oversight AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($4,939,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,945,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,398,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,178,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.Sec. 520. 2025 c 424 s 522 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITION TO KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($94,183,000))Â Â Â Â Â $94,152,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($95,936,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,178,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($190,119,000))Â Â Â Â Â $166,330,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((Funding in this section is sufficient for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5769 (transition to kindergarten).)) Funding provided in this section is sufficient to support the enrollment ((of))in the transition to kindergarten program: (1) Of 7,266 annual average full-time equivalent eligible children ((per school year))in school year 2025-26; and pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6260 (public education funding) in school year 2026-27.Sec. 521. 2025 c 424 s 523 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($7,079,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,079,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$8,450,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,079,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,529,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for tribal language grants.(b) Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program, including but not limited to: Determining which schools and languages will be prioritized; conducting outreach to the community; and addressing enrollment considerations and the hiring of staff. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current or former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.(2) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.(3) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).(4) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop and provide a Latino youth-on-youth gang violence prevention program for students and may offer a parent coaching program. The program must target Latino students ages 11 through 17 who are either involved in or at risk of becoming involved in a gang or in gang activities, and parents of the students. The nonprofit organization must have at least 15 years of experience serving Latino communities and promoting advocacy and must provide kindergarten through 12th grade social emotional learning, mental health wraparound services, and parent engagement programs in Washington.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to increase hands-on learning opportunities for Title I K-5 students statewide by increasing access to science on wheels and virtual field trips.(6) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization that supports Washington teachers in implementing lessons on the Holocaust for the expansion of comprehensive Holocaust and genocide education.(7) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to school districts for ninth grade success. Within the amounts in this subsection, funding is provided for the office to contract with an evaluator to conduct a yearly evaluation of the program's success.(8) $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the Peninsula school district aviation academy to prepare students for diverse careers in the aviation industry.(9)(a) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities for demonstration sites to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to chapter 71, Laws of 2016 (foster youth edu. outcomes). The office shall require the recipient of these funds to report the impacts of the recipient's efforts in alignment with the measures of the Washington school improvement framework.(b) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection, $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for maintaining and implementing the data sharing agreement between the office, the department of children, youth, and families, and the contractors to support targeted service delivery, program evaluation, and statewide education outcomes measurement for students served under this section.(10) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for subsidizing exam fees for dual credit programs for low-income students.(End of part)PART VIHIGHER EDUCATIONSec. 601. 2025 c 424 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: The appropriations in sections ((605 through 611))602 through 608 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections ((605 through 611))602 through 608 of this act.(2) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.(3) Teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.(4) Institutions must include the phone number of a campus, local, state, or national suicide, crisis, or counseling hotline on the back of newly issued student and faculty identification cards.(5) Institutions of higher education shall not use appropriated funds to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(6)(a) The student achievement council and institutions as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;(iii) Washington college grant recipient grade point averages; and(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.(7) The institutions shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The institutions shall require contracted entities to notify the institutions promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(8) Institutions of higher education shall not use appropriated funds to support external governmental relations.(9) Any administrative reduction made by an institution of higher education must prioritize retaining staff that provide direct student supports.Sec. 602. 2025 c 424 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($949,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $913,517,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($960,088,000))Â Â Â Â Â $924,241,000Community/Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$21,368,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($166,595,000))Â Â Â Â Â $166,637,000Invest in Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$174,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($368,202,000))Â Â Â Â Â $367,936,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,466,127,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,393,873,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2026 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2027.(2) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.(3) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's allied health programs.(4) $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.(5) $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $904,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(6) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.(8) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.(9) $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.(10) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to continue a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.(11) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 full-time equivalent enrollments annually.(12) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.(13) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.(14) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.(15) $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.(16) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are))is provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to continue a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.(17) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to maintain high-demand enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.(18) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.(19) $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,526,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(20) (($20,473,000))$19,449,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of equity and access provisions in chapter 28B.50 RCW.(21) $3,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with grants awarded in fiscal year 2023 for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.(22) $4,668,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support cybersecurity academic enrollments of 250 FTE students.(23) (($408,000))$204,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a center for excellence in cybersecurity.(24) $1,648,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,648,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).(25) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.(26) $7,456,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.(27) $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for nursing education.(28) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bellingham Technical College maritime apprenticeship program.(29) $2,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Skagit Valley College dental therapy education program.(30)(a) $854,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle Central College for partnership with the Seattle maritime academy. Seattle Central College must enter into a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Seattle Central College certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries has been executed. The memorandum of agreement must address:(i) The shared use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities where practicable;(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(iii) Development of a training program and recruitment plan and a five-year operational plan.(b) The joint training program and recruitment plan and the five-year operational plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(31) $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $110,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of state registered apprenticeship provisions in chapter 28B.124 RCW.(32) (($4,276,000))$5,382,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(33) $7,436,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 339, Laws of 2023 (student homelessness pilot).(34) (($7,278,000))$7,980,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(35) $1,024,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 126, Laws of 2023 (nurse supply).(36) $1,602,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for community college staff to recruit, advise, and support early achievers scholars completing their early childhood qualifications. The state board shall prioritize colleges with longer wait lists for early achievers scholars. The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to submit a report, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by September 30, 2025, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on early achievers grant participation data, including data on enrollment and waitlists for the grant program.(37) $408,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Olympic College health care pathways.(38) $2,280,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the bachelor of science computer science programs.(((40)))(39) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Edmonds College to provide support to students who are military veterans, focusing on counseling services, financial assistance, and reentry services.(((41)))(40) $616,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (dual credit program access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(42)))(41) $7,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(43)))(42) $1,190,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand the student aid outreach and completion initiative pilot program in RCW 28B.50.940. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (((43)))(42):(a) $850,000 of the amounts in this subsection (((43)))(42) are provided to participating community and technical colleges located within capital region educational service district 113.(b) $340,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (((43)))(42) are provided to participating community and technical colleges located within north central educational service district 171.(43) $25,512,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $26,227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(44) By December 1, 2026, the state board for community and technical colleges must submit a report, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature. The report shall include recommendations that may reduce redundancy and expenses that do not directly correlate to student success. The state board shall also consider locations of current colleges by regions, districts that have more than one campus and other regional considerations where reduction and proximity may not substantially impact access to postsecondary education institutions. The state board shall include a review of the district structure and how it impacts campus operations and student success.(45) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.(46) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.(47) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.Sec. 603. 2025 c 424 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($442,276,000))Â Â Â Â Â $400,788,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($41,821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,616,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$377,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($390,000))Â Â Â Â Â $388,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,671,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($2,526,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,263,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$840,000University of Washington Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,546,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($40,637,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,628,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,149,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$635,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($9,015,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,010,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,378,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,373,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($544,868,000))Â Â Â Â Â $517,563,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,098,129,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,029,847,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one head archivist for the labor archives of Washington and reserved solely for labor archives activities, staffing, supplies, and equipment. The head archivist will determine budget priorities and oversee expenditures on the budget. Budget funds will be reserved solely for the labor archives and shall not be used to supplant or supplement other activities of the University of Washington libraries unrelated to the collections and activities of the labor archives. The university and the head archivist shall work in collaboration with the friends of the labor archives community advisory board.(2) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain and expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.(3) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(4) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.(5) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.(6) $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.(7) $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.(8) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.(9) $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.(10) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the psychiatry integrated care training program.(11) $640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $426,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.(12) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.(13) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.(14) $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to implement a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.(15) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.(16) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Latino center for health.(17) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.(18) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.(19) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.(21) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.(22) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is for Washington State University to implement expansion of MESA activities at the Everett campus to facilitate increased attendance and degree completion by students who are underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.(23) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.(24) $16,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 200 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on the program graduation rates, waitlist for entry into the program, time to degree completion, and degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027.(25) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.(26) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $160,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state;(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program; and(d) Support of tribal consultation work, including expanding Native programming, and digitization of Native collections.(27) $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.(28) $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.(29) $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(30) $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of the center for environmental forensic science.(31) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.(32) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services shall retain two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to implement a residency program focused on behavioral health.(33) $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $742,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.(34) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.(35) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.(a) The operation of the database shall be the responsibility of the director of the database, who shall be employed by the University of Washington with training and experience in demography, statistical analysis, and electoral systems. The director shall appoint necessary staff to implement and maintain the database.(b) The database shall maintain in electronic format at least the following data and records, where available, for at least the previous 12-year period:(i) Estimates of the total population, voting age population, and citizen voting age population by race, ethnicity, and language-minority groups, broken down to the election district and precinct level on a year-by-year basis for every political subdivision in the state, based on data from the United States census bureau, American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a public office;(ii) Election results at the precinct level for every statewide election and every election in every political subdivision;(iii) Regularly updated voter registration lists, voter history files, voting center locations, ballot drop box locations, and student engagement hub locations for every election in every political subdivision;(iv) Contemporaneous maps, descriptions of boundaries, and shapefiles for election districts and precincts;(v) The following records for every election in every political subdivision:(A) Records of all voters issued a ballot and all voters who returned a ballot; and(B) Records of all ballots with missing and mismatched signatures, including the date on which the voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on which the voter submitted updated information;(vi) Apportionment plans for every election in every political subdivision; and(vii) Any other data that the director deems advisable.(c) Upon the certification of election results and the completion of the voter history file after each general election, the secretary of state shall transmit copies of the following to the director of the database:(i) Election results at the precinct level, including information about rejected and cured ballots;(ii) Voter history files;(iii) Shapefiles for election districts; and(iv) Lists of voting centers, ballot drop boxes, and student engagement hubs.(d) The director and staff shall update election data in the database as soon as it is available from the office of the secretary of state, following certification of each election as required by RCW 29A.60.190 or 29A.60.250.(e) Except for any data, information, or estimates that identify individual voters, the data, information, and estimates maintained by the database shall be posted online and made available to the public at no cost.(f) The database shall prepare any estimates made pursuant to this section by applying scientifically rigorous and validated methodologies.(g) The database shall publish on its website and transmit to the state for dissemination to county auditors and the secretary of state a list of political subdivisions required, pursuant to section 203 of the federal voting rights act, 52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503, to provide assistance to members of language-minority groups and each language in which those political subdivisions are required to provide assistance. Each county auditor shall transmit the list described in this subsection to all political subdivisions within their jurisdiction.(h) The database will complete regular analysis of ballot rejections and cures, identifying population subgroups with higher than average ballot rejection rates. An annual report of ballot rejections will be posted online and made available to the public at no cost. Database staff may work with the secretary of state and county auditors to examine new practices and solutions for reducing ballot rejections and increasing ballot cure rates.(i) Staff at the database may provide nonpartisan technical assistance to political subdivisions, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the resources of the database.(36) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.(37) $5,010,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the University of Washington school of dentistry regional initiatives in dental education (RIDE) program.(38) Within existing resources, the institution must resume a mentoring, organization, and social support for autism inclusion on campus program. The program must focus on academic coaching, peer-mentoring, support for social interactions, and career preparation.(39) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for indigenous health to increase the number of American Indian and Alaska Native physicians practicing in the state of Washington.(40) $4,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing enrollments in computing and engineering programs at the Tacoma campus.(41) $520,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the biological response to ocean acidification to advance high-priority biological experiments to better understand the relationship between marine organisms and ocean acidification.(42) $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for monitoring assistance at the Washington ocean acidification center.(43) $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continued implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2022 (veterans & military suicide).(44) $800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a program to support pathways from prison to the university's Tacoma campus. The university shall collaborate with formerly incarcerated women, Tacoma Community College, the freedom education project Puget Sound, the women's village, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the department of corrections, in development and implementation of the pathways program.(45) $910,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Allen school scholars program.(46) $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $798,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism professional development for faculty and staff, student training, and campus climate assessments in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(47) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the institution must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(48) $586,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(49) (($2,862,000))$3,170,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(50) $730,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 364, Laws of 2023 (psilocybin).(51) $288,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 232, Laws of 2023 (alternative jet fuel).(52) (($526,000))$263,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for two grant writers to support the ongoing need for tribal and overburdened communities to access state and federal funding opportunities that advance environmental justice through the thriving communities technical assistance program.(53) (($15,000,000))$30,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for behavioral health learning.(54) $3,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the institution to address challenges and capacity with discharging patients from acute care settings into post-acute care community settings at Harborview medical center and the University of Washington medical center. Of the amount in this subsection, $600,000 shall be used to continue the complex discharge task force in order to conclude the work of the task force and the complex discharge pilot program based on Harborview's bed readiness program.(55) $1,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue behavioral health education and training opportunities at the behavioral health institute.(56) $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to the behavioral health teaching facility.(57) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $72,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to develop and implement the Washington reproductive access alliance. The alliance shall provide a service coordination website and phone line, administrative support and coordination of the alliance, patient care coordination, and social support for patient travel.(58) $650,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (E2SSB 5440).(59) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 366, Laws of 2024 (substance use treatment).(60) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue establishing Washpop, a statewide integrated data repository for population and policy research on topics including criminal justice and safety, economic prosperity and equity, and health and social well-being.(61) $24,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(62) $10,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington to conduct a prospective, randomized cohort study between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2027, to determine the extent to which ibogaine-assisted therapy conducted through a licensed clinic in North America followed by structured therapeutic support presents advantages over treatment as usual for adults diagnosed with opioid use disorder compared to the current standard United States interventions of medication-assisted treatment and psychotherapy. The study must measure outcomes including, but not limited to, treatment engagement, reduction in opioid use, mortality, functional status, craving, motivation to change, and self-efficacy, using toxicology, standard scales, and other credible research techniques. The university may obtain and utilize private philanthropic funding to assist with the study required by this subsection.(63) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the University of Washington Friday Harbor labs for an ongoing project that focuses on restoration of a critically endangered species of starfish that could help stabilize foundational Washington state marine ecosystems including kelp forests and eelgrass.(((65)))(64) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1811 (crisis co-response). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(65) $107,387,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(66) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the center for biotech innovation and training at the Bothell campus.Sec. 604. 2025 c 424 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($280,947,000))Â Â Â Â Â $258,766,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($282,113,000))Â Â Â Â Â $259,933,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$203,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .(($210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $209,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($7,722,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,791,000Washington State University Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$792,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,076,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$77,057,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($685,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $638,822,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.(3) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.(4) $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.(5) $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (1) of this section.(6) $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (1) of this section.(7) ((General fundâstate appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.))$37,641,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $38,694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(8) $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 82.16.120 and 82.16.165 (renewable energy, tax incentives).(9) $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 28B.30.357 (children's mental health).(10) $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 77.12.272 (elk hoof disease).(11) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.(12) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(13) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((is))are provided solely for compensation funding for Western Washington University employees that work on the Washington State University Everett campus.(14) $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((is))are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences shall retain two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to implement a residency program focused on behavioral health.(15) $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 ((is))are provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.(16) $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.(17) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.(18) (($7,722,000))$5,791,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the institute for northwest energy futures.(19) (($568,000))$68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($568,000))$68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2022 (community solar projects).(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for base funding for the William D. Ruckleshaus Center.(21) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the institution must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(22) $3,910,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing nursing salaries at the institution.(23) $4,112,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.(24) $3,470,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor of science in public health degree at the Pullman, Spokane, and Vancouver campuses.(25) $2,014,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor's and master's degree in social work at the Tri-Cities campus.(26) $1,529,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and operations of a journalism fellowship program focused on civic affairs.(27) $496,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(28) $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for continued funding of the statewide broadband coordinator within the Washington State University extension program. This funding will support the salary and benefits of this position.(29) $706,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the complex social interactions lab.(30)(a) $2,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the native American scholarship to continue for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Of the amounts in this subsection, no more than $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation may be spent on administration, support services for students, outreach regarding the program, and technical support for application.(b) "Eligible student" means a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located within Washington who files a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) and enrolls in an undergraduate degree program. Eligible students need to maintain satisfactory academic progress during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to remain eligible for the scholarship. The institution shall determine award priorities based on tribal consultation. Awards must be distributed to students no later than May of each fiscal year.(c) The institution must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2027. The report must include: The number of eligible students; the number of students who receive a scholarship; how recipients were determined; and how many members of federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington received scholarships versus members of federally recognized Indian tribes from other states.(31) $180,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1705 (large animal veterinarians). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(32) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2525 (heritage orchard program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 605. 2025 c 424 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($66,544,000))Â Â Â Â Â $61,623,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($66,663,000))Â Â Â Â Â $61,753,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$16,838,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($32,328,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,664,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($182,373,000))Â Â Â Â Â $175,878,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) At least $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and at least $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(4) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(5) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.(6) $268,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.(7) $2,144,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.(8) (($4,598,000))$8,438,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain a cohort of 80 students in the bachelor of nursing program.(9) $2,108,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(10) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a summer bridge program.(11) $1,040,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the establishment and operating support of a university mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(12) $158,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(13) (($5,142,000))$7,714,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(14) $10,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(15) $13,521,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(16) $764,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of funding provisions of the 2025â27 master collective bargaining agreements that were inadvertently excluded from the enacted biennial budget. When requesting funding for the 2027â29 collective bargaining agreements, the university must coordinate with the office of financial management to ensure that all compensation-related changes included in the agreements are fully and accurately reflected in the institution's budget request.Sec. 606. 2025 c 424 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($70,400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,060,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($70,597,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,473,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$692,000Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$76,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($25,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,929,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($185,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $180,306,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(3) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for two counselor positions to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.(4) $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health outreach and service coordination position who has knowledge of issues relevant to veterans.(5) $240,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.(6) $586,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(7) $286,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(8) $1,396,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student success. Students will receive discipline specific tutoring programs, peer assisted learning sessions, and academic success coaching.(9) $1,418,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grow your own teacher residency programs in high need areas of elementary, bilingual, special education, and English language learners.(10) $1,074,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for dual language expansion programs in Yakima and Des Moines.(11) $168,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(12) (($7,938,000))$10,506,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(13) $766,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student basic needs. This funding will support two financial aid coaching specialists, support a coordinator for the food pantry, support a director and advocate to assist students who have experienced sexual violence, and help with prevention initiatives.(14) $422,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for civil rights and risk mitigation staffing.(15) $692,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase enrollment in the occupational safety and health programs.(16) $32,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) $116,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a graduate mental health program and an undergraduate behavioral health degree.(18) $15,240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $15,667,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(19) $130,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of funding provisions of the 2025â27 master collective bargaining agreements that were inadvertently excluded from the enacted biennial budget. When requesting funding for the 2027â29 collective bargaining agreements, the university must coordinate with the office of financial management to ensure that all compensation-related changes included in the agreements are fully and accurately reflected in the institution's budget request.Sec. 607. 2025 c 424 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($37,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,525,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($34,053,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,811,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$80,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,789,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,552,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($92,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $86,418,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(3) (($2,090,000))$2,259,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, (($2,035,000))$2,630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and (($793,000))$556,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (3):(a) (($1,685,000))$1,720,000 of the ((amounts in))general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and (($1,685,000))$1,744,000 of the ((amounts in))general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided for administration and core operations.(b) (($546,000))$539,000 of the ((amounts in))general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((and $449,000)), $630,000 of the ((amounts in))general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $204,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.(c) $82,000 of the ((amounts in fiscal year 2026 are))workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1606 (journal access/state employ). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(d) $80,000 of the ((amounts in fiscal year 2026 are))workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a review of the funding mechanisms and policies adopted by other states to support the implementation of small modular reactors. The review shall be submitted to the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2025.(e) (($146,000))$190,000 of the ((amounts in fiscal year 2026 and $44,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2027 are))workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of the amount of savings to the state of Washington of allowing legally responsible individuals to become paid parental caregivers for their developmentally disabled children. The office of the state actuary, department of social and health services, health care authority, and department of children, youth, and families must cooperate with the institute to facilitate access to data or other resources necessary to complete this work. The institute shall provide an initial report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025, and a final report by November 15, 2026. To the extent possible, the study shall:(i) Quantify cost savings from reductions of entitlement program usage by parental caregivers;(ii) Quantify cost savings from reduced hospital, foster care, and residential facility usage by developmentally disabled children due to having a parental caregiver; and(iii) Summarize any additional cost savings likely to occur due to allowing paid parental caregivers.(f) $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the institute to conduct a comprehensive review of Washington's universal communication service program and provide a final report by June 30, 2027. To the extent possible, the institute shall:(i) Review current universal communication service programs and statutes, including funding levels, eligibility, and administration;(ii) Analyze impacts of the programs on low-income households, communities of color, immigrant/refugee and limited English proficiency residents, elderly residents, gender and sexual minorities, residents with disabilities, youth in foster care, people experiencing homelessness, and deaf or hard of hearing residents across urban and rural areas;(iii) Identify potential funding models for a sustainable affordable connectivity program designed to make internet access and devices more affordable for low-income households, including options of expanding current revenue sources, creation of a dedicated fund for subsidized internet access, or other options determined; and(iv) Conduct a cost-benefit analysis of each potential funding model to fully implement the state digital equity plan, addressing affordability, access, and sustainability.(g)(i) $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study examining state programs that have, within the last 15 years, increased the overall rate of students who enroll in postsecondary education within one year of high school graduation. The study may include, but is not limited to, researching programs and initiatives in peer states that improved matriculation within one year of high school graduation in two-year and four-year degrees, career-technical education programs, certificates, credentials, and apprenticeships. To identify peer states, the institute may consider factors such as workforce needs, demographics, student population, postsecondary system structure, and state funding levels for postsecondary education. The study must include, but is not limited to, an examination of the following types of policies and programs:(A) A statewide strategy or college-going campaign for increasing direct postsecondary enrollment; and(B) Targeted workforce initiatives that addressed specific areas of credential or workforce shortages.(ii) In describing the policies and programs reviewed under the study, the study must include information about the outcomes, lessons learned from implementation, and scalability of statewide strategies, programs, or initiatives.(iii) The institute must submit a report of findings from the review to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2027, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(h) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2025-27 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.(4) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.(5) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.(6) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a tribal liaison position.(7) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(8) $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(9) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.(10) $988,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student enrollment and retention support. Funding is provided for hiring a student advisor and underserved student specialist to provide student support and administrative support for the native pathways program.(11) $142,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(12) $1,347,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Shelton promise pilot program.(13) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 272, Laws of 2024 (incarcerated student grants).(14) $50,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for captioning, sign language interpreters, and other accessibility tools and services.(15) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for contracting with the department of enterprise services for maintenance and operations of the Lord Mansion.(16) $4,635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,765,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.Sec. 608. 2025 c 424 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($100,730,000))Â Â Â Â Â $95,835,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($101,249,000))Â Â Â Â Â $96,380,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,790,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,837,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($36,713,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,033,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($254,319,000))Â Â Â Â Â $244,875,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.(3) $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.(4) $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic collegeâBremerton, Olympic collegeâPoulsbo, and Peninsula collegeâPort Angeles that are above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.(5) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.(6) $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.(7) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(8) $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.(9) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a master of science program in nursing.(10) $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.(11) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(12) $908,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.(13) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for upgrading cyber range equipment and software.(14) $2,520,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.(15) $3,632,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the western on the peninsulas expansion. This includes new two plus two degrees programs such as industrial engineering, data science, and sociology.(16) $1,552,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanded remedial math and additional English 101 courses, as well as first year seminars, and disability accommodation counselors.(17) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for mental health first aid training for faculty.(18) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the small business development center to increase technical assistance to black, indigenous, and other people of color small business owners in Whatcom county.(19) $1,010,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a master of social work program at western on the peninsulas.(20) $2,412,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expansion of bilingual educators education.(21) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional student support and outreach at western on the peninsulas.(22) $580,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to convert the human services program at western on the peninsulas from self-sustaining to state-supported to reduce tuition rates for students in the program.(23) $158,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(24) $2,612,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to administer a teacher residency program focused on special education instruction. Amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient to support one cohort of 17 residents per school year, and must be prioritized to communities that are anticipated to be most positively impacted by teacher residents who fill teacher vacancies upon completing the teacher residency program and who remain in the communities in which they are mentored. The teacher residency program must meet the following requirements:(a) Residents receive compensation equivalent to first year paraeducators, as defined in RCW 28A.413.010;(b) Each resident is assigned a preservice mentor;(c) Preservice mentors receive a stipend of $2,500 per year;(d) Residents receive at least 900 hours of preservice clinical practice over the course of the school year;(e) At least half of the residency hours specified in (d) of this subsection are in a coteaching setting with the resident's preservice mentor and the other half of the residency hours are in a coteaching setting with another teacher;(f) Residents may not be assigned the lead or primary responsibility for student learning;(g) Coursework taught during the residency is codesigned by the teacher preparation program and the school district, state-tribal education compact school, or consortium, tightly integrated with residents' preservice clinical practice, and focused on developing culturally responsive teachers; and(h) The program must prepare residents to meet or exceed the knowledge, skills, performance, and competency standards described in RCW 28A.410.270(1).(25) $890,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the expansion of the undergraduate electrical and computer engineering program.(26) (($36,000))$128,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(27) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects.(28) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Kitsap county that performs no-cost cyber monitoring for small local governments using students at qualified colleges and universities as the cyber analysts to continue providing cyber security curriculum to students at postsecondary institutions, giving them operational experience as cyber analysts by protecting rural communities.(29) $55,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department of urban and environmental planning and policy to conduct a series of projects and studies for Point Roberts, Washington.(30) $21,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $21,624,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(31) $228,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of funding provisions of the 2025â27 master collective bargaining agreements that were inadvertently excluded from the enacted biennial budget. When requesting funding for the 2027â29 collective bargaining agreements, the university must coordinate with the office of financial management to ensure that all compensation-related changes included in the agreements are fully and accurately reflected in the institution's budget request.Sec. 609. 2025 c 424 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâPOLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($9,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,564,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($8,807,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,413,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($5,055,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,054,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,850,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($7,171,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,170,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($30,598,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,051,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.(2) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.(3) $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.(4) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.(5) $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the complete Washington program.(6) $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the state of Washington's annual dues to the education commission of the state.(7) $650,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(8) $1,388,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to four-year institutions of higher education participating in the students experiencing homelessness program without reduction by the Washington student achievement council, pursuant to chapter 339, Laws of 2023 (student homelessness pilot). Of the amounts included in this subsection, no more than $46,000 per fiscal year is for the administration of the program. The Washington student achievement council may evenly distribute funds provided in this subsection to all university campuses that apply for funding.(9) $356,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to staff the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board as provided in chapter 282, Laws of 2023 (workforce investment board).(10) $204,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for students experiencing homelessness program. This funding will allow for the Northwest Indian College to be added to the program as provided in House Bill No. 1540 (homelessness/tribal colleges). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11) Within existing resources, the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board shall work with high-tech trade associations to develop recommendations for its 2026 report to the legislature for expanding industry-aligned, high-demand degree programs.Sec. 610. 2025 c 424 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâOFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($300,013,000))Â Â Â Â Â $300,012,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($299,568,000))Â Â Â Â Â $299,588,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($12,342,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,347,000((General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$300,000))Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$85,488,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($107,193,000))Â Â Â Â Â $113,195,000Aerospace Training Student Loan AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($222,000))Â Â Â Â Â $223,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($446,507,000))Â Â Â Â Â $586,777,000Health Professionals Loan Repayment and ScholarshipProgram AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,724,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,253,357,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,399,354,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,034,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.(2) $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, (($458,742,000))$582,922,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fundâstate appropriation, and $67,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.(4) $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and (($39,720,000))$45,541,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.(5) $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for this purpose.(6) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the national guard grant program.(7) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 369, Laws of 2024 (behav. health scholarship).(8) $2,250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 203, Laws of 2024 (Native American apprentices).(9) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2024 (college in the HS fees).(10) Within amounts appropriated in the 2025-27 biennium for the behavioral health loan repayment and conditional scholarship account at least five percent must be dispersed for conditional scholarships. If demand is not met and no eligible applications are submitted for conditional scholarships, then funds may be used for loan repayment.(11) Within amounts appropriated in the 2025-27 biennium for the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account at least five percent must be dispersed for conditional scholarships. If demand is not met and no eligible applications are submitted for conditional scholarships, then funds may be used for loan repayment.(12) Within existing resources the council shall collaborate with the University of Washington to maximize skills training for Washington health corps and behavioral health corps conditional scholarship recipients.(13) Sufficient funding is provided in this section to implement Senate Bill No. 5963 (passport to careers program). Additional Washington college grant costs for individuals eligible for passport to careers must be funded from the Washington college grant carryforward balance of the state financial aid account or from the state education trust fund account.Sec. 611. 2025 c 424 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($2,793,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,817,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($2,415,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,401,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($56,409,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,407,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$212,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($759,000))Â Â Â Â Â $382,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,032,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,033,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($65,620,000))Â Â Â Â Â $65,252,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines and incorporate the recommended action plan completed in 2020.(2) $564,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $564,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to conduct health workforce surveys, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission, to collect and analyze data on the long-term care workforce, and to manage a stakeholder process to address retention and career pathways in long-term care facilities.(3) (($2,000,000))$1,880,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the workforce board to award grants for the purposes of providing apprenticeship, industry certifications and wraparound student supports to workers pursuing job advancement and enhancement through college readiness, apprenticeship, degree, certification, or professional development opportunities in the health care field. Grant recipients must be labor-management partnerships established under section 302 of the labor-management relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186 that demonstrate adequate funding match and competency in the provision of student supports, or employers who can demonstrate service serving greater than 50 percent medicaid populations who can demonstrate that they will use the grant to join or establish a labor-management partnership dedicated to the purposes of this section. Preference must be given to applications that demonstrate an ability to support students from racially diverse backgrounds, and that are focused on in-demand fields with career ladders to living wage jobs. Grant recipients must use the funds to provide services including, but not limited to, development and implementation of apprenticeship and industry certifications, benefits administration, tuition assistance, counseling and navigation, tutoring and test preparation, instructor/mentor training, materials and technology for students, childcare, and travel costs.(4) The workforce board must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the board must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.(5) $20,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 126, Laws of 2023 (nurse supply).(6) (($754,000))$377,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the clean energy technology workforce advisory committee, created in chapter 231, Laws of 2023 (climate-ready communities).(7) $504,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the career bridge platform.(8) $20,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for reasonable accommodation requests.(9) $21,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 612. 2025 c 424 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLINDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($11,462,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,460,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($11,551,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,005,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($23,047,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,499,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.Sec. 613. 2025 c 424 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($19,190,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,578,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($19,329,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,404,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($4,119,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,124,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($42,638,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,106,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through 21 enrolled at the center the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.Sec. 614. 2025 c 424 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($6,585,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,322,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($6,011,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,186,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,854,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$184,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($15,634,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,546,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the creative districts program.(2) $868,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $867,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the establishment of a tribal cultural affairs program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to support tribal cultural, arts, and creative programs.(3) (($708,000))$395,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 ((is))and $388,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 387, Laws of 2023 (Billy Frank Jr. statue).Sec. 615. 2025 c 424 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($5,535,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,532,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($5,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,648,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,180,000Sec. 616. 2025 c 424 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($4,705,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,723,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($4,667,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,857,000Local Museum AccountâEastern Washington StateHistorical SocietyâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$229,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($9,601,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,809,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a museum art curator.(2) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for a tribal liaison.(End of part)PART VIISPECIAL APPROPRIATIONSSec. 701. 2025 c 424 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOLGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($12,049,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,850,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,242,000Other Appropriated FundsâAppropriation. . . .$11,059,000((State Treasurer's Service AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$260,000))TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($18,551,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,151,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Amounts in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2025, dated April 26, 2025, and IT-2026, dated March 10, 2026, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2025, dated April 26, 2025, and IT-2026, dated March 10, 2026, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. Restricted federal funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.(2) Agencies must apply to Washington technology solutions for certification and release of funding for each gate of the project. When Washington technology solutions certifies the key deliverables of the gate have been met, a current technology budget is approved and includes updated milestone deliverables with start dates and estimated completion dates for each deliverable through each stage of the entire project investment through project implementation and close out; and if applicable to the stage or gate of the project, that the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality that Washington technology solutions will post to their website by July 1, 2025, it must notify the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office of financial management may not approve funding for the certified project gate any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.(3)(a) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by Washington technology solutions and the office of financial management.(b) Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and Washington technology solutions, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project and only after Washington technology solutions certifies the stage as required in subsection (2) of this section. For the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least 20 percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project. If there is no significant risk to the project, the holdback does not apply to the final gate during a biennial close.(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.(b) As part of the development of a technology budget, as key milestone deliverables change that impact scope, schedule, or budget, and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and Washington technology solutions. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project, as well as maintenance and operations costs, to include and identify at least:(i) Fund sources:(A) If the project is funded from the information technology revolving account, the technology budget must include a worksheet that provides the fund sources that were transferred into the account by fiscal year;(B) If the project managed is by a central service agency, and funds are driven out by the central service model, the technology budget must provide a statewide impact by agency by fund as a worksheet in the technology budget file;(C) Funding amounts must not exceed the enacted budget amounts by fund by fiscal year on the budgeted resources worksheet;(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions. This is to assure that the project has adequate state staffing and agency support to ensure success, ensure user acceptance, and adequately test the functionality being delivered in each sprint before it is accepted by the agency's contracting officer or their representative. Key project functions that are deemed "critical" must be retained by state personnel and not outsourced, to ensure that knowledge is retained within state government and that the state can self-sufficiently support the system and make improvements without long-term dependence on a vendor;(iii) Discrete financial budget codes to include at least ((the appropriation index and program index))a unique cost center code for the project, such as a project code, program index, or an equivalent project-specific code. If the subproject or project is appropriated funding at more than one agency, as is done with the statewide electronic health records solution where federal funding for the department of corrections is appropriated to the health care authority, then:(A) The project technology budget and each impacted agency that receives appropriated funding must use the same ((program index))designated cost center code for the project for consistency across each agency;(B) Each ((appropriation index))expenditure authority code from each impacted agency must be identified on the technology budget input page; and(C) The technology budget must be compiled in the lead agency technology budget only, referencing any differences in ((appropriation index))expenditure authority code, as described in (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection;(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;(v) Anticipated deliverables that must include a start date and estimated completion date for each deliverable to include, but not limited to, requests for proposals release dates, go-live dates, and software demonstration dates;(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year based on enacted budget funding for historical budget amounts and based on the agency financial reporting system (AFRS) for historical budget expenditure amounts; ((and))(vii) Historical agency in-kind expenditure detail by fiscal year, by fund, based on agency base resources used for the project; and(viii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet.(c) If a project technology budget changes, including technical changes within the workbook, and varies from the prior posted technology budget posted on the dashboard, and once a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last posted approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how the changes impact the project scope, budget, and schedule.(d) Each technology budget posted to the statewide dashboard must remain posted to the dashboard for historical purposes and must not be removed or replaced.(e) If a project is aware of deliverable and milestone changes compared to the last office of financial management approved funding gated release, before applying for certification and release of funding, the project must update the technology budget deliverables and spending plan to reflect these changes.(5)(a) Each project must have a project charter. The charter must include:(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities, and shows that the project is adequately staffed by state personnel in key functions to ensure success;(ii) The Washington technology solutions staff assigned to the project;(iii) A project roadmap that includes the problems the team is solving and the sequence in which the team intends to take on those problems, updated periodically to reflect what has been learned;(iv) Metrics to support the project strategy and vision, to determine that the project is incrementally meeting user needs;(v) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;(vi) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;(vii) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and(viii) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete financial coding for the project.(b) If required by Washington technology solutions, a project may also need to have an investment plan. Washington technology solutions must:(i) Base the requirement of an agency needing to have an investment plan on the complexity and risk of the project;(ii) Establish requirements by project risk level in statewide technology policy, and publish the requirements by September 30, 2025; and(iii) In collaboration with the department of enterprise services, define the circumstances under which the vendor will be terminated or replaced and establish the process by which the agency will transition to a new vendor with a minimal reduction in project productivity.(6)(a) Projects with estimated costs greater than $100,000,000 from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by Washington technology solutions, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget as provided in this section.(b) If the project affects more than one agency:(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared by each agency; and(ii) There must be a budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.(7) Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. The statewide dashboard must meet the requirements in ((section 156 of this act))section 154 of this act.(8) For any project that exceeds $2,000,000 in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:(a) Independent quality assurance services for the project must report independently to Washington technology solutions;(b) Washington technology solutions, based on project risk assessments, may require additional quality assurance services and independent verification and validation services;(c) Washington technology solutions must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;(d) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;(e) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed;(f) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements;(g) The agency and project must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint, except for:(i) Hardware or infrastructure projects; and(ii) Projects that have implemented all phases and are now in maintenance and operations;(h) The project solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and(i) The agency and project must deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date of an executed procurement contract in response to a competitive request for proposal.(9) Washington technology solutions must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is projected to be completed within budget, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality, and whether the project is planned, managed, meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan, and that the current technology budget reflects updated scope, schedule, and budget to include updated milestone deliverables with start dates and estimated completion dates through each stage of the entire project investment through project implementation and close out.(10) Washington technology solutions may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. Washington technology solutions must report on December 1 each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.(11) Washington technology solutions, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. Washington technology solutions must report on December 1 each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.(12) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.(13) The following information technology projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section:(a) The resident portal project of the Washington technology solutions agency;(b) The human resource management system (HRMS) cloud migration project of the office of financial management;(c) The d365 enterprise resource planning project of the department of corrections; and(d) The secure access Washington (SAW) project of the Washington technology solutions agency.Sec. 702. 2025 c 424 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMITGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($1,547,070,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,534,275,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($1,701,995,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,651,050,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,174,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$84,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$293,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,260,616,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,196,876,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.Sec. 703. 2025 c 424 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,400,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,400,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,567,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($92,000))Â Â Â Â Â $312,000Excess Earnings AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($7,497,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,718,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 704. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR SUNDRY CLAIMSThe following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2026, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.(1) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:(a) Angel I. Garcia, claim number 9991023802. . . .$161,411(b) Anthony L. Chastain, claim number 9991023751. . . .$147,953(c) Robert J. Peterson, claim number 9991022223. . . .$4,500(d) Jeremy R. McBryde, claim number 9991021907. . . .$14,288(e) Jeremy J. Spidle, claim number 9991021879. . . .$10,250(f) Osman Morales-Santo, claim number 9991024240. . . .$137,040(g) Joshalynn (La Chelle) Williams, claimnumber 9991024244. . . .$17,978(h) Juan Bonilla Vasquez, claim number 9991024692. . . .$723,944(i) Bacari Hunter, claim number 9991024855. . . .$13,500(j) Dondre Butler, claim number 9991024986. . . .$64,047(k) Ashton Walker, claim number 9991025137. . . .$25,798(l) Pasha Salimiaghdam, claim number 9991025252. . . .$7,895(m) Doris Watkins, claim number 9991025309. . . .$5,000(n) Darian Downing, claim number 9991025487. . . .$60,000(2) This appropriation is to be disbursed on a voucher approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for payment of compensation for wrongful convictions pursuant to RCW 4.100.060, as follows:Scott Meier, claim number 9991025490. . . .$79,669Sec. 705. 2025 c 424 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâFOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$129,091,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$129,091,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$42,048,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$300,230,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations are provided solely for distribution as provided in RCW 43.70.515.(2) $719,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,825,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain core public health information technology infrastructure and staff at the department of health.Sec. 706. 2025 c 424 s 719 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâINDIAN HEALTH IMPROVEMENT REINVESTMENT ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$8,208,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($708,000))Â Â Â Â Â $758,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,916,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,966,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in RCW 43.71B.040.Sec. 707. 2025 c 424 s 722 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMSâCONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$102,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$106,300,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$208,300,000(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,900,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($4,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $600,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($9,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,500,000Sec. 708. 2025 c 424 s 723 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERSâCONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMSThere is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($25,548,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,548,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($25,548,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,548,000Sec. 709. 2025 c 424 s 727 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâOPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($11,471,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,459,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($11,471,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,459,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the opportunity scholarship match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.050.Sec. 710. 2025 c 424 s 709 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâSTATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$55,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($85,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $110,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130.Sec. 711. 2025 c 424 s 729 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($12,847,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,547,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$12,847,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($25,694,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,394,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account created in RCW 43.216.130 for the home visiting program.Sec. 712. 2025 c 424 s 732 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâWASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($743,000))Â Â Â Â Â $864,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .(($820,000))Â Â Â Â Â $838,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,563,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,702,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington state leadership board account created in RCW 43.388.020.Sec. 713. 2025 c 424 s 740 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâEXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .(($300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $745,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $745,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute (($300,000))$745,000 to Kitsap county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 714. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâADULT DAY SERVICE FACILITIES ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$500,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$500,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the adult day service facilities account created in House Bill No. 2675 (accounts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2026, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 715. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESâWILDFIRE RESPONSE, FOREST RESTORATION, AND COMMUNITY RESILIENCE ACCOUNTNatural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation (FY 2026). . . .$20,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation (FY 2027). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$60,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account, for the implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 716. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâINSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION OPERATING FEES ACCOUNTCommunity/Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$71,168,000Eastern Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,800,000Washington State University Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$45,000,000Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,000,000University of Washington Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$85,575,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,184,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,144,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$239,871,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the institutions of higher education operating fees account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 717. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHORSE RACING COMMISSION OPERATING ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$288,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$288,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Washington horse racing commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280.Sec. 718. 2025 c 424 s 726 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâRURAL JOBS PROGRAM MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $753,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $753,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the rural jobs program match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.120.Sec. 719. 2025 c 424 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$945,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,715,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($945,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,660,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 720. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâYAKIMA CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$65,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$65,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute $65,000 to Yakima county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.(End of part)PART VIIIOTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONSSec. 801. 2025 c 424 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONGeneral Fund Appropriation for fire insurancepremium distributions. . . .(($16,905,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,490,000General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneydistributions. . . .$9,778,000General Fund Appropriation for boating safety andeducation distributions. . . .$3,230,000General Fund Appropriation for public utilitydistrict excise tax distributions. . . .(($72,286,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,329,000Death Investigations Account Appropriation fordistribution to counties for publicly fundedautopsies. . . .(($6,329,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,753,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation forharbor improvement revenue distributions. . . .(($150,000))Â Â Â Â Â $225,000Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation fordistribution to "timber" counties. . . .$81,852,000County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($152,169,000))Â Â Â Â Â $152,228,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($60,343,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,367,000City-County Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($43,751,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,021,000Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquorexcise tax distribution. . . .$87,960,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Confederated Tribes of the ColvilleReservation. . . .(($10,140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,145,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .$7,489,000Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquorprofits distribution. . . .$98,876,000General Fund Appropriation for other taxdistributions. . . .$104,000Dedicated Cannabis Account Appropriation forCannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant tochapter 169, Laws of 2022 (cannabis revenue). . . .(($44,177,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,068,000General Fund Appropriation for Habitat ConservationProgram distributions. . . .(($3,596,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,665,000General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu oftaxes to counties under Department of Fish andWildlife Program. . . .$3,882,000Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties inamounts not to exceed actual deposits into theaccount and attributable to those counties'share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520. . . .(($25,430,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,700,000Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers AccountAppropriation for distribution to local taxingjurisdictions to mitigate the unintendedrevenue redistributions effect of sourcing lawchanges pursuant to chapter 83, Laws of 2021(warehousing & manufacturing jobs). . . .$2,770,000State Crime Victim and Witness Assistance AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties. . . .$4,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($735,217,000))Â Â Â Â Â $739,932,000The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.Sec. 802. 2025 c 424 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSAdministrative Hearings Revolving Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$6,000,000Apple Health and Homes Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $7,500,000 for fiscal year2026 and $7,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$15,000,000Business and Professions Account: For transferto the state general fund, $5,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$5,000,000Certified Public Accountants' Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,060,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$575,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($1,060,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,635,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$40,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$154,153,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$154,153,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$162,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$162,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thenatural climate solutions account,$33,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$33,000,000Construction Registration Inspection Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,000,000Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thebasic health plan trust account, the lesser ofthe amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540or this amount for fiscal year 2026,(($250,000,000))$220,000,000 and this amountfor fiscal year 2027, (($250,000,000))$220,000,000. . . .(($500,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $440,000,000Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, the lesser of the amountdetermined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or thisamount for fiscal year 2026, (($155,000,000))$135,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year2027, (($155,000,000))$135,000,000. . . .(($310,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $270,000,000Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$3,052,000 for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000for fiscal year 2027. . . .$6,052,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$142,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$17,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$17,142,000Electrical License Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $6,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$6,000,000Enterprise Services Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $35,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$35,000,000Financial Services Regulation Account: For transferto the state general fund, $6,880,000 forfiscal year 2026 and (($3,500,000))$8,300,000for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($10,380,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,180,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(((b)))(d): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,600,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,600,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(((c)))(d): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,600,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,600,000Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $2,200,000 for fiscal year2026. . . .$2,200,000General Fund: For transfer to the deathinvestigations account, $2,050,000 forfiscal year 2026 and $2,050,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$4,100,000General Fund: For transfer to the disaster responseaccount, (($30,000,000))$112,378,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $112,378,000General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund underRCW 15.76.115, $2,250,000 for fiscal year 2026and $2,250,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$4,500,000General Fund: For transfer to the flood controlassistance account under RCW 86.26.007,$1,850,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$1,850,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$3,700,000General Fund: For transfer to the home securityfund, $20,227,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$49,868,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$70,095,000General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing andwarehousing job centers account pursuant to RCW82.14.545 for distribution in section 801 ofthis act, $2,770,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,770,000General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,forest restoration, and community resilienceaccount, solely for the implementation ofchapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)(long-term forest health), $20,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$20,000,000Higher Education Personnel Services Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund, $98,000for fiscal year 2026. . . .$98,000Horse Racing Commission Class C Purse FundAccount: For transfer to the horse racingcommission operating account, $340,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$340,000Limited Fish and Wildlife Account: For transferto the fish, wildlife, and conservationaccount, $3,950,000 for fiscal year 2026and (($3,100,000))$4,100,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .(($7,050,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,050,000Medical Student Loan Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,751,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,751,000Model Toxics Control Capital Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$60,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$60,000,000Model Toxics Control Operating Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$10,000,000Municipal Revolving Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $5,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$5,000,000Natural Climate Solutions Account: For transferto the wildfire response, forest restoration,and community resilience account, solely forthe implementation of chapter 298, Laws of2021 (2SHB 1168) (long-term forest health),$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$40,000,000OFM Central Services Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,000,000Opioid Abatement Settlement Account: Fortransfer to the tribal opioid preventionand treatment account, the lesser of theamount determined pursuant to RCW 43.79.483or this amount for fiscal year 2026,$10,000,000 and this amountfor fiscal year 2027, (($8,500,000))$14,000,000. . . .(($18,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,000,000Performance Audits of Government Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$2,536,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$2,800,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($2,536,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,336,000Personnel Service Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $3,827,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .(($3,827,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,827,000Pipeline Safety Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,000,000Pressure Systems Safety Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $260,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$260,000Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $440,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$440,000Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$18,187,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$18,187,000Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $7,167,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $2,167,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$9,334,000Public Works Administration Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,800,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$1,800,000Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer tothe state general fund on June 30, 2026,$288,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and, onJune 30, 2027, $375,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .(($288,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $663,000,000Real Estate Commission Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $3,500,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$3,500,000Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account: Fortransfer to the fish, wildlife, andconservation account, $300,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$300,000School Employees' Insurance Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $2,551,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$2,551,000Shared Game Lottery Account: For transfer tothe education legacy trust account,$8,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$8,000,000State Drought Preparedness Account: For transferto the state general fund, $4,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$4,000,000State Financial Aid Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $945,000 for fiscal year2026. . . .$945,000State Seizure Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $500,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$500,000State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, (($50,000,000))$55,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and(($60,000,000))$65,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .(($110,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $120,000,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2026 and additional payments for fiscal year2026 resulting from the diligent enforcementsettlement. . . .(($92,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $163,014,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2027. . . .(($92,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $99,425,000Traumatic Brain Injury Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $1,111,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,111,000Warm Water Game Fish Account: For transfer tothe fish, wildlife, and conservationaccount, $930,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$380,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$1,310,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention AuthorityAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $900,000 for fiscal year 2026 and(($900,000))$3,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($1,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,900,000Washington State Library-Archives BuildingAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $18,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($18,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,000,000Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, (($88,967,000))$90,634,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .(($88,967,000))Â Â Â Â Â $90,634,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccount: For transfer to the water pollutioncontrol revolving account, $3,000,000 forfiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$6,000,000Air Operating Permit Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$2,000,000Budget Stabilization Account: For transfer to thegeneral fund, $514,000,000 for fiscal year2026 and $366,000,000 for fiscal year 2027.Pursuant to enactment of Engrossed SecondSubstitute House Bill No. 2034 (LEOFF 1restatement), it is intended that a transferof $880,000,000 will be made from the pensionsurplus holding account to the budgetstabilization account by June 30, 2029, as arepayment for amounts transferred from thebudget stabilization account to the generalfund in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. . . .$880,000,000Capital Community Assistance Account: For transferto the state general fund, $8,300,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$8,300,000Climate Commitment Account: For transfer to thenatural climate solutions account,$400,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$400,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to theclimate commitment account, $20,000,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$20,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$40,000,000Developmental Disabilities Community ServicesAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,000,000Education Technology Revolving Fund: For transferto the state general fund, $9,000,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$9,000,000Fingerprint Identification Account: For transferto the state general fund, $3,000,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$3,000,000Fire Service Training Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $3,000,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$3,000,000Manufacturing Cluster Acceleration Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$2,798,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,798,000Military Department Rental and Lease Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund, $2,000,000for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,000,000Reclamation Account: For transfer to the stategeneral fund, $5,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .$5,000,000Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For transferto the state general fund, $5,000,000 forfiscal year 2027. . . .$5,000,000Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative Fund: For transfer to thestate general fund, $5,000,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$5,000,000Washington Technology Solutions Revolving Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$3,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$3,000,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$3,000,000Water Quality Permit Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $5,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .$5,000,000(End of part)PART IXMISCELLANEOUSSec. 901. 2025 c 424 s 901 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONSThe appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the ((2023-2025))2025-2027 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 902. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: 2026 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS(1) In accordance with chapter 41.80 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and organizations representing state employee bargaining units and nonstate employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium presented to the legislature during the 2026 legislative session. Funding is not provided for compensation and fringe benefit provisions not presented to the legislature by the end of the 2026 legislative session. Funding is approved for agreements and awards with the following organizations:(a) Washington public employees association, general government; and(b) Washington public employees association, higher education community college coalition.(2) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between institutions of higher education and employee organizations representing state employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in Part VI of this act for agreements and awards with the following organization: Highline College agreement with the Washington public employees association.(3) Expenditures for agreements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.Sec. 903. 2025 c 424 s 907 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS(1) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and organizations representing state employee bargaining units and nonstate employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium presented to the legislature during the 2025 legislative session. Funding is not provided for compensation and fringe benefit provisions not presented to the legislature by the end of the 2025 legislative session. Funding is approved for agreements and awards with the following organizations:(a) Washington federation of state employees, general government;(b) Teamsters local 117, department of corrections;(c) Service employees international union, healthcare 1199NW;(d) Professional and technical engineers, local 17;(e) Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals;(f) The coalition of unions;(g) Association of Washington assistant attorneys general;(h) Washington federation of state employees, administrative law judges;(i) Washington state patrol troopers association;(j) Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association;(k) Fish and wildlife officers guild;(l) Teamsters 760, fish and wildlife sergeants;(m) Washington federation of state employees, higher education community college coalition;(n) Service employees international union local 925, family child care providers;(o) Adult family home council, adult family home providers; and(p) Washington federation of state employees, language access providers.(2) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between institutions of higher education and employee organizations representing state employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in Part VI of this act for agreements and awards with the following organizations:(a) University of Washington:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Service employees international union local 925;(iii) Teamsters local 117, police; and(iv) Washington federation of state employees, police management;(b) Washington State University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Police guild; and(iii) International union of operating engineers;(c) Central Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Public school employees; and(iii) Teamsters local 760 police and sergeants;(d) The Evergreen State College:(i) Washington federation of state employees; and(ii) Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel;(e) Western Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Fraternal order of police, lodge no. 24; and(iii) Public school employees;(f) Eastern Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) ((Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel))Eastern Washington University police guild; and(iii) Public school employees; and(g) Yakima Valley College: ((Public school employees [Washington public employees association]))Washington public employees association.(3) Expenditures for agreements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.(4) Collective bargaining agreements that are not required to be approved by the legislature under RCW 41.80.010(4)(c)(ii)(A) are not rejected but are left to the institutions delegated to manage those bargained relationships under state employee collective bargaining law. The following agreements are not rejected, but do not require legislative approval:(a) Service employees international union local 1199, research/hall health;(b) Service employees international union local 1199, Harborview medical center/airlift northwest;(c) Service employees international union local 1199, UW medical centerânorthwest;(d) Washington state nurses association, UW medical centerânorthwest; and(e) Washington state nurses association, UW medical centerâMontlake.Sec. 904. 2025 c 424 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: COMPENSATIONâINSURANCE BENEFITS(1)(a) An agreement was reached for the 2025-2027 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement.(b) Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition and for nonrepresented state employee health benefits.(2) The appropriations for state agencies in this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,333 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2026.(b) For fiscal year 2027, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed (($1,350))$1,334 per eligible employee.(c) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2026 and 2027, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized in this subsection.(d) The monthly employer funding rate paid by school districts and educational service districts to the health care authority includes $67.61 per month beginning September 1, 2025, and $77.56 beginning September 1, 2026, for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120.(3) The funding rates in subsection (2) of this section are sufficient to cover, effective January 1, 2026, the following:(a) In the uniform medical plan, coverage for doula services;(b) In the uniform dental plan, the following:(i) Increasing the temporomandibular joint benefit to $1,000 annually and $5,000 per lifetime;(ii) Eliminating the deductible for children up to age 15; and(c) Implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5083 (hospital affordability); and(d) Elimination of the smart health program as provided in Senate Bill No. 5807 (health plan incentives).(4) The funding rates in subsection (2) of this section are not sufficient to continue offering an accountable care plan as of plan year 2026.(5) The rates are not sufficient to add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature. Nothing in this section requires removal of any existing coverage of prescription drugs to treat diabetes.(6) Current funding allows for the public employees' benefits board to adjust the employer paid long term disability benefit to a maximum monthly benefit of $450 within the current funding resources.Sec. 905. 2025 c 424 s 913 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: INITIATIVE 732 COST-OF-LIVING INCREASESPart VI of this act includes funding for the greater of the general wage increase identified in section 911 of this act or a cost of living adjustment for state employees pursuant to RCW 28B.50.465 and 28B.50.468, as amended by Senate Bill No. 5790 (CTC employee COLAs), for a total increase of 3.0 percent, effective July 1, 2025, and ((2.7))2.6 percent, effective July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 906. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: WILDLAND FIREFIGHTERS STUDYDuring the 2025â2027 fiscal biennium, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board shall conduct a study of the enrollment of wildland and aviation firefighters employed by the department of natural resources in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement system. In conducting this study, the department of natural resources, the department of retirement systems, and the office of the state actuary shall provide any information or technical assistance requested by the board. The board shall also solicit and consider stakeholder input as part of its deliberations. The board shall submit a report summarizing the findings of the study to the legislature by January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 907. A new section is added to 2025 c 424 (uncodified) to read as follows: JOINT LEGISLATIVE-EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE ON BUDGET TRANSPARENCY AND FISCAL SUSTAINABILITY(1) A joint legislative-executive committee on budget transparency and fiscal sustainability is established, with members as provided in this subsection.(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house;(c) The director of the office of financial management;(d) The executive director of the economic and revenue forecast council;(e) The executive director of the caseload forecast council;(f) The chief impact officer from the office of the governor;(g) Two chief financial officers representing large state agencies administering forecasted programs, appointed by the governor;(h) Two business representatives, jointly appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house from a list provided by the Washington roundtable; and(i) Two labor representatives, jointly appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house from a list provided by the Washington state labor council.(2) The joint committee shall be co-chaired by three of its members: A member of the senate designated by the president of the senate, a member of the house designated by the speaker of the house, and the director of the office of financial management. Staff support for legislative members of the joint committee shall be provided by senate committee services and the house office of program research. As the co-chairs may collectively agree and reasonably request, additional assistance may be provided by the office of financial management, the economic and revenue forecast council, the caseload forecast council, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of equity, and your Washington. These agencies shall enter into any data sharing agreements that are necessary for the work of the joint committee in a timely manner.(3)(a) The co-chairs shall jointly request technical assistance from a nonpartisan organization working to strengthen state government with specific technical expertise in state fiscal policy to provide technical assistance and make recommendations for promoting budget transparency, fiscal sustainability, program accountability, and equitable outcomes.(b) The co-chairs shall jointly request that the organization conduct its work over a two-year period.(i) During the first phase, the organization shall review: Revenue growth projections and spending assumptions in the four-year budget outlook; statutory cost drivers and their effect on carryforward and maintenance levels; and relevant budget practices in other states.(ii) During the second phase, the organization shall review: Management staffing levels, administrative overhead costs, and performance management practices; public reporting tools and data accessibility; and relevant budget practices in other states.(c) The co-chairs shall jointly request that the organization also:(i) Participate in meetings of the joint committee;(ii) Conduct interviews of members of the joint committee, fiscal staff for the house appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee, staff for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and other stakeholders as part of its work;(iii) Provide members of the joint committee with periodic updates, with progress reviews, preliminary findings, next steps, and opportunities for feedback;(iv) Submit written reports of its findings and recommendations to the joint committee, the house appropriations committee, and the senate ways and means committee for the first phase by November 15, 2026, and for the second phase by November 15, 2027; and(v) Present its findings and recommendations at meetings of the joint committee for the first phase by December 1, 2026, and for the second phase by December 1, 2027.(4) The senate and the house of representatives may contract with additional persons who have specific technical expertise if the co-chairs collectively agree that such expertise is necessary for the work of the joint committee. The senate and the house of representatives may enter into such a contract only if an appropriation is specifically provided for this purpose.(5) The co-chairs shall jointly convene up to three meetings of the joint committee per year to review the scope of work to be conducted by the nonprofit organization described in subsection (3)(a) of this section, receive presentations on the organization's findings and recommendations, and make its own recommendations, which shall be submitted to the legislature and the governor for the first phase by December 15, 2026, and for the second phase by December 15, 2027. At least two meetings per year shall be fully virtual.(6) Legislative members of the joint committee are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses by the senate or the house of representatives if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization.(7) The expenses of the joint committee must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.Sec. 908. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2025 c 414 s 8026 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the University of Washington building account to the institutions of higher education operating fees account.Sec. 909. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2025 c 414 s 8027 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the Washington State University building account to the institutions of higher education operating fees account.The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.Sec. 910. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2025 c 414 s 8029 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing 12 months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any 12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the respective capital projects accounts to the institutions of higher education operating fees account.(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.Sec. 911. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2025 c 414 s 8030 are each amended to read as follows:Within 35 days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing 12-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any 12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the community and technical colleges capital projects account to the institutions of higher education operating fees account.(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.Sec. 912. RCW 28B.76.526 and 2025 c 58 s 3003 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs in chapter 28A.710 RCW (charter schools), chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW (opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW 28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92 RCW (Washington college grant program), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to careers), chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), and chapter 43.216 RCW (early childhood education and assistance program). During the 2019-2021, 2021-2023, ((and)) 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the account may also be appropriated for public schools funded under chapters 28A.150 and 28A.715 RCW.Sec. 913. RCW 29B.60.080 and 2024 c 164 s 497 are each amended to read as follows:The public disclosure transparency account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from penalties collected pursuant to enforcement actions or settlements under this title, including any fees or costs, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used only for the implementation of chapter 304, Laws of 2018 and duties under this title, and may not be used to supplant general fund appropriations to the commission, except during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.Sec. 914. RCW 38.40.210 and 2025 c 424 s 1905 are each amended to read as follows:The military department rental and lease account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the rental or lease of state-owned military department property must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for operating and maintenance costs of military property. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the military department rental and lease account to the state general fund.Sec. 915. RCW 41.24.030 and 2023 c 73 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund is created in the state treasury as a trust fund for the benefit of the volunteer firefighter and emergency worker participants covered by this chapter consisting of:(a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid to the fund;(b) An annual fee for each member of its fire department to be paid by each municipal corporation for the purpose of affording relief provided in this chapter for firefighters as follows:(i) Fifty dollars for each volunteer or part-paid member of its fire department;(ii) A sum equal to one and one-half of one percent of the annual salary attached to the rank of each full-paid member of its fire department, prorated for 1970 on the basis of services prior to March 1, 1970;(c) An annual fee for each emergency worker of an emergency medical service district paid by the district that is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency worker under the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system;(d) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to members of its fire department, an annual fee of ninety dollars for each of its firefighters electing to enroll, forty-five dollars of which shall be paid by the municipality and forty-five dollars of which shall be paid by the firefighter. However, nothing in this section prohibits any municipality from voluntarily paying the firefighters' fee for this retirement pension coverage;(e) Where an emergency medical service district has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its emergency workers, for each emergency worker electing to enroll: (i) An annual fee of forty-five dollars shall be paid by the emergency worker; and (ii) an annual fee paid by the emergency medical service district that, together with the forty-five dollar fee per emergency worker, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency worker under the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any emergency medical service district from voluntarily paying the emergency workers' fees for this retirement pension coverage;(f) Moneys transferred from the administrative fund, as provided under subsection (5) of this section, which may only be used to pay relief and retirement pensions for firefighters; and(g) Earnings from the investment of moneys in the volunteer firefighters' principal fund.(2) The reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund is created in the state treasury as a trust fund for the benefit of the reserve officer participants covered by this chapter consisting of:(a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid to the fund;(b) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make relief provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, an annual fee for each reserve officer paid by the municipal corporation that is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system;(c) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, for each reserve officer electing to enroll: (i) An annual fee of $45 shall be paid by the reserve officer; and (ii) an annual fee paid by the municipal corporation that, together with the $45 fee per reserve officer, is sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this section prohibits any municipal corporation from voluntarily paying the reserve officers' fees for this retirement pension coverage;(d) Moneys transferred from the administrative fund, as provided under subsection (5) of this section, which may only be used to pay relief and retirement pensions for reserve officers; and(e) Earnings from the investment of moneys in the reserve officers' principal fund.(3)(a) The state investment board shall have full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, comingle, or exchange investments acquired from that portion of the amounts credited to the principal funds as is not, in the judgment of the state board, required to meet current withdrawals. Investments shall be made in the manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150 and not otherwise.(b) All bonds, investments, or other obligations purchased by the state investment board shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer, and he or she shall collect the principal thereof and interest thereon when due.(4)(a) The interest, earnings, and proceeds from the sale and redemption of any investments held by the principal fund and invested by the state investment board shall be credited to and form a part of the principal fund, less the allocation to the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.(b) Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter, all amounts credited to the principal fund shall be available for making the benefit payments required by this chapter. Amounts credited to each separate principal fund shall only be available to make benefit payments for the members of that specific principal fund.(c) The state treasurer shall make an annual report showing the condition of the funds.(5) The volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after appropriation, and may be used only for operating expenses of the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the operating expenses of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, or for transfer from the administrative fund to the principal fund.(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium:(i) Moneys in the fund may be used for the office of the state actuary to evaluate whether the current annual allocation of fire insurance premium tax provides sufficient funding, together with member and employer contributions, to meet the plan's systematic actuarial required contributions while mitigating the risk of excess funding; and(ii) The legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund to the state general fund.(b) Forty percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on fire insurance premiums shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the administrative fund.(((b)))(c) The state board shall compute a percentage of the amounts credited to the administrative fund to be paid into the principal fund.(((c)))(d) For the purpose of providing amounts to be used to defray the cost of administration of the principal and administrative funds, the state board shall ascertain at the beginning of each biennium and request from the legislature an appropriation from the administrative fund sufficient to cover estimated expenses for the biennium.(6) Pursuant to section 3, chapter 73, Laws of 2023, on August 1, 2023, the state board will transfer an amount of funds from the principal account in subsection (1) of this section to the new principal account created in subsection (2) of this section.Sec. 916. RCW 41.45.060 and 2025 c 381 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035.(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system; and(c) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement system plan 1.The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than June 30, 2024;(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and(c) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 in accordance with RCW 41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3 normal cost, a Washington state patrol retirement system normal cost, and a public safety employees' retirement system normal cost.(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through ((June 30, 2025))July 1, 2026, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through ((June 30, 2025))July 1, 2026, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system shall equal the sum of:(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3 normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system over a rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(c) Except as described in (d) of this subsection, the amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement shall be amortized over a fixed 15-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus(d) The amounts required to fully amortize the remaining costs of benefit improvements in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 effective from July 1, 2018, through ((June 30, 2025))July 1, 2026, over a fixed 15-year period with the rate between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2029, being zero. The amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.(9) The employer contribution rate for each of the institutions of higher education for the higher education supplemental retirement benefits must be sufficient to fund, as a level percentage of pay, a portion of the projected cost of the supplemental retirement benefits for the institution beginning in 2035, with the other portion supported on a pay-as-you-go basis, either as direct payments by each institution to retirees, or as contributions to the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. Contributions must continue until the council determines that the institution for higher education supplemental retirement benefit liabilities are satisfied.(10) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.(11) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.(12) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.Sec. 917. RCW 41.45.070 and 2025 c 381 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060 or 41.45.054, the department shall also charge employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees' retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. Except as provided in subsections (6), (7), ((and)) (9), and (10) of this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes additional benefits.(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, the department shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, these supplemental rates shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary through the process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the additional benefits.(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of all system pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit over a fixed 15-year period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided to active members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, 41.45.0631, or 41.45.067.(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of the automatic adjustments over a fixed 15-year period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The supplemental rate to fund increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund increases in automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to chapter 94, Laws of 2006.(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1, 2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.(10) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees' and the teachers' retirement systems plans 1 in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5862 (TRS & PERS plan 1 COLA).Sec. 918. RCW 43.07.130 and 2025 c 424 s 1907 are each amended to read as follows:There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which must be used by the office of the secretary of state to defray the costs of providing registration and information services authorized by law by the office of the secretary of state, and any other cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under Title 11, 18, 19, 23, 23B, 24, 25, 26, 30A, 30B, 42, 43, or 64 RCW.The secretary of state is authorized to charge a fee for publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs of printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 19.09.305, 19.09.315, 19.09.440, 23.95.260(1) (a)(ii) and (iii) and (d), or 46.64.040, and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the secretary of state's revolving fund must be placed in the secretary of state's revolving fund.During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the treasurer to transfer money from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund.Sec. 919. RCW 43.41.399 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 216 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The revolving fund shall be used to pay for K-20 network operations, transport, equipment, software, supplies, and services, maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and shared infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the development, operation, and administration of shared educational information technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving fund shall not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations of local telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular institution or group of institutions.(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The office shall, subject to the review and approval of the office of financial management, establish and implement a billing structure for network services identified in subsection (1) of this section.(3) The office shall charge those public entities connected to the K-20 telecommunications system under RCW 43.41.393 an annual copayment per unit of transport connection as determined by the legislature after consideration of the board's recommendations. This copayment shall be deposited into the revolving fund to be used for the purposes in subsection (1) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate to the revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover the costs for transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data equipment located at the individual public institutions, maintenance and depreciation of the K-20 network backbone, and services provided to the network under RCW 43.41.391.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the education technology revolving fund to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 920. RCW 43.43.839 and 2019 c 415 s 964 are each amended to read as follows:The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account. Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. The account shall be subject to appropriation. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, funds in the account may be used for expenditures related to the upgrade of the state patrol's criminal history system. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the account may be used for building the sexual assault kit tracking system. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the fingerprint identification account to the general fund.Sec. 921. RCW 43.43.944 and 2024 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the state treasury. The primary purpose of the account is firefighter training for both volunteer and career firefighters. The fund shall consist of:(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire service training;(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.940;(c) Twenty-two percent of all moneys received by the state on fire insurance premiums;(d) Revenue from penalties established under RCW 19.27.740; and(e) General fundâstate moneys appropriated into the account by the legislature.(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated for: (a) Fire service training; (b) school fire prevention activities within the Washington state patrol; and (c) the maintenance, operations, and capital projects of the state fire training academy. However, expenditures for purposes of (b) and (c) of this subsection may only be made to the extent that these expenditures do not adversely affect expenditures for the purpose of (a) of this subsection. The state patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire service training account under this section to contract with the Washington state firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The contract may call for payments on a monthly basis.(3) Any general fundâstate moneys appropriated into the account shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter joint apprenticeship training program.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the fire service training account to the general fund.Sec. 922. RCW 43.70.250 and 2025 c 360 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((It))Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, it shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business.(2) The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered by the department. Any and all fees or assessments, or both, levied on the state to cover the costs of the operations and activities of the interstate health professions licensure compacts with participating authorities listed under chapter 18.130 RCW shall be borne by the persons who hold licenses issued pursuant to the authority and procedures established under the compacts. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as provided in RCW 18.79.202. In no case may the secretary impose any certification, examination, or renewal fee upon a person seeking certification as a certified peer support specialist trainee under chapter 18.420 RCW or, between July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2030, impose a certification, examination, or renewal fee of more than $100 upon any person seeking certification as a certified peer support specialist under chapter 18.420 RCW. Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, between July 1, 2024, and July 1, 2029, the secretary may not impose any certification or certification renewal fee on a person seeking certification as a substance use disorder professional or substance use disorder professional trainee under chapter 18.205 RCW of more than $100.(3) All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.(4)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, amounts that reflect an excess fund balance in the health professions account in RCW 43.70.320 may be used for regulatory and program administration costs for licensing of:(i) Music therapists;(ii) Home care aides, as related to chapter 323, Laws of 2023;(iii) Marriage and family therapists and associates, as related to chapter 425, Laws of 2023 and chapter 371, Laws of 2024;(iv) Mental health counselors and associates, as related to chapter 425, Laws of 2023 and chapter 371, Laws of 2024;(v) Psychologists, as related to chapter 425, Laws of 2023 and chapter 371, Laws of 2024;(vi) Substance use disorder professionals and trainees, as related to chapter 425, Laws of 2023 and chapter 371, Laws of 2024;(vii) Social workers and social worker associates, as related to chapter 425, Laws of 2023 and chapter 371, Laws of 2024; and(viii) Birth doulas, as related to chapter 217, Laws of 2022.(b) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department may not initiate or impose licensing fee increases to cover the regulatory and program administration costs described in (a) of this subsection or for continued implementation of the health care enforcement and licensing modernization system project.Sec. 923. RCW 43.70.320 and 2019 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known as the health professions account. All fees received by the department for health professions licenses, registration, certifications, renewals, compact privileges, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health professions account.(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions licensing activities of the department shall be paid from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions licensing activities of the department which shall include the estimated income from health professions fees.(4) The fees received by the department from applicants for compact privilege under RCW 18.74.500 must be used for the purpose of meeting financial obligations imposed on the state as a result of this state's participation in the physical therapy licensure compact.(5) The secretary shall, at the request of a board or commission as applicable, spend unappropriated funds in the health professions account that are allocated to the requesting board or commission to meet unanticipated costs of that board or commission when revenues exceed more than fifteen percent over the department's estimated six-year spending projections for the requesting board or commission. Unanticipated costs shall be limited to spending as authorized in subsection (3) of this section for anticipated costs.(6) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, excess fund balance of the account may be used as provided in RCW 43.70.250(4).Sec. 924. RCW 43.79.565 and 2022 c 297 s 946 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The capital community assistance account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used for capital costs to provide community support services, and for infrastructure and other capital expenditures to support the well-being of communities.(2) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state capital community assistance account to the general fund.Sec. 925. RCW 43.88.030 and 2025 c 414 s 8034 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget requests to the director at least three months before agency budget documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an official forecast. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing statutes.The budget document or documents shall also contain:(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures, revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution;(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the legislature;(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function, and agency;(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated accounts outside the state treasury;(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by agency and in total; and(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium, and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures. The budget document or documents shall further include:(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state debt;(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;(c) Other statutory expenditures;(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing biennium;(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that otherwise would have been available for appropriation;(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter 41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.(5)(a) Beginning in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the governor's operating budget document or documents submitted to the legislature must leave, in total, a positive ending fund balance in the general fund and related funds.(b) Beginning in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the projected maintenance level of the governor's operating budget document or documents submitted to the legislature must not exceed the available fiscal resources for the next ensuing fiscal biennium.(c) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Available fiscal resources" means the beginning general fund and related funds balances and any fiscal resources estimated for the general fund and related funds, adjusted for proposed revenue legislation, and with forecasted revenues adjusted to the greater of (A) the official general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing biennium, or (B) the official general fund and related funds forecast for the second fiscal year of the current fiscal biennium, increased by 4.5 percent for each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium. For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the forecasted revenues shall be adjusted to be equal to the official general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing biennium. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2027-2029 and 2029-2031 fiscal biennia.(ii) "Projected maintenance level" means estimated appropriations necessary to maintain the continuing costs of program and service levels either funded in the governor's budget document or documents submitted to the legislature or mandated by other state or federal law, adjusted by the estimated cost of proposed executive branch legislation, and the amount of any general fund moneys projected to be transferred to the budget stabilization account pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution. Proposed executive branch legislation does not include proposals by institutions of higher education, other separately elected officials, or other boards, commissions, and offices not under the authority of the governor that are not funded or assumed in the governor's budget document or documents submitted to the legislature.(iii) "Related funds" has the meaning defined in RCW 43.88.055.(d) (b) of this subsection (5) does not apply:(i) To any governor-proposed legislation submitted to the legislature that makes net reductions in general fund and related funds appropriations to prevent the governor from making across-the-board reductions in allotments for these particular funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110(10); or(ii) In a fiscal biennium for which the governor proposes appropriations from the budget stabilization account pursuant to Article VII, section 12(d)(ii) of the state Constitution.(6) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be submitted that will contain the following:(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within affordable spending levels;(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state agencies;(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future backlogs;(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life of the project, if applicable;(h) Estimated total project cost;(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial management to allow comparisons between projects;(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as defined by the office of financial management;(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;(n) Source and type of funds proposed;(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be funded;(q) For any capital budget request for funding in the 2025-2027 or 2027-2029 fiscal biennia for which the project cost is substantially increased, a statement detailing the amount and reason for the additional cost. If the increased cost is the result of a change in design, the agency must also submit a construction cost estimate for the design as originally submitted. For purposes of this subsection (6)(q), "substantially increased" means total estimated project costs are more than 15 percent above those listed in the prior agency budget request and for which the legislature relied in making a funding decision for design or construction, adjusted for C-100 inflation factors;(r) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the governor deems to be useful;(s) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of normal maintenance, for all capital projects; and(t) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or concurrent resolution.For purposes of this subsection (6), the term "capital project" shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of financial management.(7) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW 43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence. Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in session.Sec. 926. RCW 43.88.055 and 2021 c 199 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature must adopt a four-year balanced budget as follows:(a) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature shall enact a balanced omnibus operating appropriations bill that leaves, in total, a positive ending fund balance in the general fund and related funds.(b) Beginning in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the projected maintenance level of the omnibus appropriations bill enacted by the legislature shall not exceed the available fiscal resources for the next ensuing fiscal biennium.(2) For purposes of this section:(a) "Available fiscal resources" means the beginning general fund and related fund balances and any fiscal resources estimated for the general fund and related funds, adjusted for enacted legislation, and with forecasted revenues adjusted to the greater of (i) the official general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing biennium, or (ii) the official general fund and related funds forecast for the second fiscal year of the current fiscal biennium, increased by 4.5 percent for each fiscal year of the ensuing biennium((;)). For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the forecasted revenues shall be adjusted to be equal to the official general fund and related funds revenue forecast for the ensuing biennium. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2027-2029 and 2029-2031 fiscal biennia.(b) "Projected maintenance level" means estimated appropriations necessary to maintain the continuing costs of program and service levels either funded in that appropriations bill or mandated by other state or federal law, and the amount of any general fund moneys projected to be transferred to the budget stabilization account pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution((;)).(c) "Related funds," as used in this section, means the Washington opportunity pathways account, the workforce education investment account, the fair start for kids account, and the education legacy trust account.(3) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to an appropriations bill that makes net reductions in general fund and related funds appropriations and is enacted between July 1st and February 15th of any fiscal year.(4) Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply in a fiscal biennium in which money is appropriated from the budget stabilization account pursuant to Article VII, section 12(d)(ii) of the state Constitution.Sec. 927. RCW 43.105.342 and 2024 c 54 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington technology solutions revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The account must be used for the:(a) Acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, and services; and(b) Payment of salaries, wages, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, maintenance, operation, and administration of: (i) Information services; (ii) telecommunications; (iii) systems; (iv) software; (v) supplies; and (vi) equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on debt by the agency and other users as determined by the office of financial management.(2) The director or the director's designee, with the approval of the technology services board, is authorized to expend up to one million dollars per fiscal biennium for the technology services board to conduct independent technical and financial analysis of proposed information technology projects.(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Expenditures for the strategic planning and policy component of the agency are subject to appropriation.(5) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the Washington technology solutions revolving account to the general fund.Sec. 928. RCW 43.216.828 and 2025 c 424 s 957 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to systemically increase child care subsidy rates over time until rates are equal to the full cost of providing high quality child care.(2) ((Beginning))In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, beginning July 1, 2026, child care subsidy base rates must achieve the 85th percentile of market, as established by the most recent market rate survey published before May 20, 2025, for licensed or certified child care providers. The state and the exclusive representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of the subsidy rate increase under this subsection.(3)(a) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to develop and implement a child care cost estimate model and use the completed child care cost model to recommend subsidy rates at levels that are sufficient to compensate licensed or certified child care providers for the full costs of providing high quality child care. The department shall consider:(i) Adjusting rates to reflect cost of living such as area median income, cost of living by zip code, and grouping by categories such as rural, suburban, or urban; and(ii) Incorporating the rate model for nonstandard child care hours developed under section 306, chapter 199, Laws of 2021.(b) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to evaluate options to support access to affordable health care insurance coverage for licensed or certified child care providers.(4) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of family child care providers to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for under RCW 41.56.153.Sec. 929. RCW 43.280.130 and 2025 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The domestic violence co-responder account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from fees imposed for deposit in the domestic violence co-responder account under RCW 36.18.010 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for:(a) The domestic violence co-responder grant program created in RCW 43.280.135; and(b) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, other programs and services to address domestic violence, including services for victims and perpetrators of domestic violence.Sec. 930. RCW 43.330.767 and 2022 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The manufacturing cluster acceleration account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the manufacturing cluster acceleration account shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) The department may make expenditures from the account to support regional cluster acceleration strategies, including: Supporting projects to assist manufacturers to diversify their customer base and supply chain, supporting pilot or demonstration manufacturing projects coordination with organized cluster initiatives, and supporting projects that are intended to increase manufacturing and research and development jobs regionally.(3) The department is encouraged to seek match funds for any funds appropriated to this account and may utilize funds to match nonstate funds being expended on a specific project that aligns with the purpose of this section.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the manufacturing cluster acceleration account to the state general fund.Sec. 931. RCW 50.24.014 and 2025 c 424 s 966 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A separate and identifiable account to provide for the financing of special programs to assist the unemployed is established in the administrative contingency fund. All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010.(b) A separate and identifiable account is established in the administrative contingency fund for financing the employment security department's administrative costs under RCW 50.22.150 and 50.22.155 and the costs under RCW 50.22.150(11) and 50.22.155 (1)(m) and (2)(m). All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, those employers described under RCW 50.29.025(1)(d), and those qualified employers assigned rate class 20 or rate class 40, as applicable, under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of one one-hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. Any amount of contributions payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the amount that would have been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths of one percent must be deposited in the account created in (a) of this subsection.(2)(a) Contributions under this section shall become due and be paid by each employer under rules as the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any deduction in violation of this section is unlawful.(b) In the payment of any contributions under this section, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.(3) If the commissioner determines that federal funding has been increased to provide financing for the services specified in chapter 50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that collection of contributions under this section be terminated on the following January 1st.(4) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, moneys in the account in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be appropriated for poverty reduction programs that coordinate employment, training, education, and other existing systems designed to assist low-income individuals attain self-sufficiency, including the temporary assistance for needy families WorkFirst program established under chapter 74.08A RCW and the food stamp employment and training program established under chapter 74.04 RCW.Sec. 932. RCW 70.168.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys shall be transferred to the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account from the public safety education account or other sources as appropriated, and as collected under RCW 46.63.110(7) and 46.68.440. Disbursements shall be made by the department subject to legislative appropriation. Expenditures may be made only for the purposes of the state trauma care system under this chapter, including emergency medical services, trauma care services, rehabilitative services, and the planning and development of related services under this chapter and for reimbursement by the health care authority for trauma care services provided by designated trauma centers.(2) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, funds may be used for staffing and resources necessary for the Franklin county public hospital district #1 to provide health services as part of medical transport operations services, including services to the Coyote Ridge corrections center.Sec. 933. RCW 70.170.080 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 925 are each amended to read as follows:The basic expenses for the hospital data collection and reporting activities of this chapter shall be financed by an assessment against hospitals of no more than four one-hundredths of one percent of each hospital's gross operating costs, to be levied and collected from and after that date, upon which the similar assessment levied under chapter 70.39 RCW is terminated, for the provision of hospital services for its last fiscal year ending on or before June 30th of the preceding calendar year. Budgetary requirements in excess of that limit must be financed by a general fund appropriation by the legislature. All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the hospital data collection account which is hereby created in the state treasury. The department may also charge, receive, and dispense funds or authorize any contractor or outside sponsor to charge for and reimburse the costs associated with special studies as specified in RCW 70.170.050.During the 1993-1995 fiscal biennium, moneys in the hospital data collection account may be expended, pursuant to appropriation, for hospital data analysis and the administration of the health information program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the hospital data collection account may be expended for operating costs of the charity care program.Any amounts raised by the collection of assessments from hospitals provided for in this section which are not required to meet appropriations in the budget act for the current fiscal year shall be available to the department in succeeding years.Sec. 934. RCW 70A.15.1010 and 2022 c 179 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The air pollution control account is established in the state treasury. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the department from RCW 70A.15.2200(2), and receipts from nonpermit program sources under RCW 70A.15.2210(1) and 70A.15.2230(7), and all receipts from RCW 70A.15.5090, 70A.15.5120, and 70A.540.120 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to develop and implement the provisions of this chapter, chapters 70A.25 and 70A.540 RCW, and RCW 70A.60.060. Moneys collected under RCW 70A.540.120 may only be used to implement chapter 70A.540 RCW.(2) The amounts collected and allocated in accordance with this section shall be expended upon appropriation except as otherwise provided in this section and in accordance with the following limitations:Portions of moneys received by the department of ecology from the air pollution control account shall be distributed by the department to local authorities based on:(a) The level and extent of air quality problems within such authority's jurisdiction;(b) The costs associated with implementing air pollution regulatory programs by such authority; and(c) The amount of funding available to such authority from other sources, whether state, federal, or local, that could be used to implement such programs.(3) The air operating permit account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the department from permit program sources under RCW 70A.15.2210(1), 70A.15.2260, 70A.15.2270, and 70A.15.2230(7) shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the activities described in RCW 70A.15.2210(1), 70A.15.2260, 70A.15.2270, and 70A.15.2230(7). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the air operating permit account to the general fund.Sec. 935. RCW 70A.65.260 and 2025 c 424 s 974 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The climate commitment account is created in the state treasury. The account must receive moneys distributed to the account from the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Projects, activities, and programs eligible for funding from the account must be physically located in Washington state and include, but are not limited to, the following:(a) Implementing the working families' tax credit in RCW 82.08.0206;(b) Supplementing the growth management planning and environmental review fund established in RCW 36.70A.490 for the purpose of making grants or loans to local governments for the purposes set forth in RCW 43.21C.240, 43.21C.031, 36.70A.500, and 36.70A.600, for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and to cover costs associated with the adoption of optional elements of comprehensive plans consistent with RCW 43.21C.420;(c) Programs, activities, or projects that reduce and mitigate impacts from greenhouse gases and copollutants in overburdened communities, including strengthening the air quality monitoring network to measure, track, and better understand air pollution levels and trends and to inform the analysis, monitoring, and pollution reduction measures required in RCW 70A.65.020;(d) Programs, activities, or projects that deploy renewable energy resources, such as solar and wind power, and projects to deploy distributed generation, energy storage, demand-side technologies and strategies, and other grid modernization projects;(e) Programs, activities, or projects that increase the energy efficiency or reduce greenhouse gas emissions of industrial facilities including, but not limited to, proposals to implement combined heat and power, district energy, or on-site renewables, such as solar and wind power, to upgrade the energy efficiency of existing equipment, to reduce process emissions, and to switch to less emissions intensive fuel sources;(f) Programs, activities, or projects that achieve energy efficiency or emissions reductions in the agricultural sector including:(i) Fertilizer management;(ii) Soil management;(iii) Bioenergy;(iv) Biofuels;(v) Grants, rebates, and other financial incentives for agricultural harvesting equipment, heavy duty trucks, agricultural pump engines, tractors, and other equipment used in agricultural operations;(vi) Grants, loans, or any financial incentives to food processors to implement projects that reduce greenhouse gas emissions;(vii) Renewable energy projects;(viii) Farmworker housing weatherization programs;(ix) Dairy digester research and development;(x) Alternative manure management; and(xi) Eligible fund uses under RCW 89.08.615;(g) Programs, activities, or projects that increase energy efficiency in new and existing buildings, or that promote low carbon architecture, including use of newly emerging alternative building materials that result in a lower carbon footprint in the built environment over the life cycle of the building and component building materials;(h) Programs, activities, or projects that promote the electrification and decarbonization of new and existing buildings, including residential, commercial, and industrial buildings;(i) Programs, activities, or projects that improve energy efficiency, including district energy, and investments in market transformation of high efficiency electric appliances and equipment for space and water heating;(j) Clean energy transition and assistance programs, activities, or projects that assist affected workers or people with lower incomes during the transition to a clean energy economy, or grow and expand clean manufacturing capacity in communities across Washington state including, but not limited to:(i) Programs, activities, or projects that directly improve energy affordability and reduce the energy burden of people with lower incomes, as well as the higher transportation fuel burden of rural residents, such as bill assistance, energy efficiency, and weatherization programs;(ii) Community renewable energy projects that allow qualifying participants to own or receive the benefits of those projects at reduced or no cost;(iii) Programs, activities, or other worker-support projects for bargaining unit and nonsupervisory fossil fuel workers who are affected by the transition away from fossil fuels to a clean energy economy. Worker support may include, but is not limited to: (A) Full wage replacement, health benefits, and pension contributions for every worker within five years of retirement; (B) full wage replacement, health benefits, and pension contributions for every worker with at least one year of service for each year of service up to five years of service; (C) wage insurance for up to five years for workers reemployed who have more than five years of service; (D) up to two years of retraining costs, including tuition and related costs, based on in-state community and technical college costs; (E) peer counseling services during transition; (F) employment placement services, prioritizing employment in the clean energy sector; and (G) relocation expenses;(iv) Direct investment in workforce development, via technical education, community college, institutions of higher education, apprenticeships, and other programs including, but not limited to:(A) Initiatives to develop a forest health workforce established under RCW 76.04.521; and(B) Initiatives to develop new education programs, emerging fields, or jobs pertaining to the clean energy economy;(v) Transportation, municipal service delivery, and technology investments that increase a community's capacity for clean manufacturing, with an emphasis on communities in greatest need of job creation and economic development and potential for commute reduction;(k) Programs, activities, or projects that reduce emissions from landfills and waste-to-energy facilities through diversion of organic materials, methane capture or conversion strategies, installation of gas collection devices and gas control systems, monitoring and reporting of methane emissions, or other means, prioritizing funding needed for any activities by local governments to comply with chapter 70A.540 RCW;(l) Carbon dioxide removal projects, programs, and activities; and(m) Activities to support efforts to mitigate and adapt to the effects of climate change affecting Indian tribes, including capital investments in support of the relocation of Indian tribes located in areas at heightened risk due to anticipated sea level rise, flooding, or other disturbances caused by climate change. The legislature intends to dedicate at least $50,000,000 per biennium from the account for purposes of this subsection.(2) Moneys in the account may not be used for projects or activities that would violate tribal treaty rights or result in significant long-term damage to critical habitat or ecological functions. Investments from this account must result in long-term environmental benefits and increased resilience to the impacts of climate change.(3) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the climate commitment account for activities related to environmental justice, including implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2021.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the climate commitment account to the natural climate solutions account.(5) During the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, the legislature intends to direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the pension surplus holding account to the climate commitment account in the amount of $539,000,000.Sec. 936. RCW 70A.200.140 and 2025 c 424 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:(a) Forty percent to the department of ecology, primarily for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for litter collection programs under RCW 70A.200.170. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70A.200.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies; and for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70A.200.150(7). The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;(b)(i) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70A.200.190, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments for the development and implementation of contamination reduction and outreach plans for inclusion in comprehensive solid waste management plans or by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Recipients under this subsection include programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3). Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and(c) Forty percent to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70A.200.150 for waste reduction, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments and commercial businesses to increase recycling markets and recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste reduction, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; (iii) increase access to waste reduction, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques; and (iv) for programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3).(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70A.200.170 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.(5) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Washington State University may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, to conduct an organic waste study.(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and as an exception to the distribution of expenditures otherwise required in this section, the department of ecology may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to continue a series of food waste reduction campaigns, to continue to invest in litter prevention campaigns, to conduct a recycling study, and to increase litter control on state highways.(7) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium(([,])), the legislature may appropriate funding for general administrative purposes at the department of ecology. In addition, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.(8) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to the general fund.Sec. 937. RCW 71A.20.170 and 2020 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The developmental disabilities community services account is created in the state treasury.(2) The following revenues must be deposited in the account:(a) All net proceeds from leases or sales of real property, conservation easements, and sales of timber, from the state properties at the Fircrest residential habilitation center, the Lakeland Village residential habilitation center, the Rainier school, and the Yakima Valley school. However, real property that is determined by the department of social and health services to be required for the operations of the residential habilitation centers is excluded from the real property that may be leased or sold for the benefit of the account. In addition, real property owned by the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions trust, and revenue therefrom, is excluded; and(b) Any other moneys appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.(3) Any sale, lease, or easement under this section must be at fair market value.(4) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively for:(a) Supports and services in a community setting to benefit eligible persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities; ((or))(b) Investment expenses of the state investment board; or(c) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the treasurer to make transfers of money in the developmental disabilities community services account to the general fund.(5) The department of social and health services must solicit recommendations from the Washington state developmental disabilities council regarding expenditure of moneys from the Dan Thompson memorial developmental disabilities community services account for supports and services in a community setting to benefit eligible persons with developmental disabilities.(6) Expenditures from the account must supplement, and may not replace, supplant, or reduce current state expenditure levels for supports and services in the community setting for eligible persons with developmental disabilities.(7)(a) The state investment board must invest moneys in the account. The state investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the account. All investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money shall be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160.(b) All investments made by the state investment board shall be made with the degree of judgment and care required under RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state investment board.(c) The state investment board shall routinely consult and communicate with the department of social and health services and the legislature on the investment policy, earnings of the account, and related needs of the account.(8) The account shall be known as the Dan Thompson memorial developmental disabilities community services account.Sec. 938. RCW 74.39A.032 and 2018 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish in rule a new medicaid payment system for contracted assisted living, adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care. Beginning July 1, 2019, payments for these contracts must be based on the new methodology which must be phased-in to full implementation according to funding made available by the legislature for this purpose. The new payment system must have these components: Client care, operations, and room and board.(2) Client care is the labor component of the system and must include variables to recognize the time and intensity of client care and services, staff wages, and associated fringe benefits. The wage variable in the client care component must be adjusted according to service areas based on labor costs.(a) The time variable is used to weight the client care payment to client acuity and must be scaled according to the classification levels utilized in the department's assessment tool. The initial system shall establish a variable for time using the residential care time study conducted in 2001 and the department's corresponding estimate of the average staff hours per client by job position.(b) The wage variable shall include recognition of staff positions needed to perform the functions required by contract, including nursing services. Data used to establish the wage variable must be adjusted so that no baseline wage is below the state minimum in effect at the time of implementation. The wage variable is a blended wage based on the federal bureau of labor statistics wage data and the distribution of time according to staff position. Blended wages are established for each county and then counties are arrayed from highest to lowest. Service areas are established and the median blended wage in each service area becomes the wage variable for all the assigned counties in that service area. The system must have no less than two service areas, one of which shall be a high labor cost service area and shall include counties at or above the ninety-fifth percentile in the array of blended wages.(c) The fringe benefit variable recognizes employee benefits and payroll taxes. The factor to calculate the percentage of fringe benefits shall be established using the statewide nursing facility cost ratio of benefits and payroll taxes to in-house wages.(3) The operations component must recognize costs that are allowable under federal medicaid rules for the federal matching percentage. The operations component is calculated at ninety percent or greater of the statewide median nursing facility costs associated with the following:(a) Supplies;(b) Nonlabor administrative expenses;(c) Staff education and in-service training; and(d) Operational overhead including licenses, insurance, and business and ((occupational [occupation]))occupation taxes.(4) The room and board component recognizes costs that do not qualify for federal financial participation under medicaid rules by compensating providers for the medicaid client's share of raw food and shelter costs including expenses related to the physical plant such as property taxes, property and liability insurance, debt service, and major capital repairs. The room and board component is subject to the department's and the Washington state health care authority's rules related to client financial responsibility.(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section establish the rate for medicaid covered services. Subsection (4) of this section establishes the rate for nonmedicaid covered services.(6) The rates paid on July 1, 2019, shall be based on data from the 2016 calendar year, except for the time variable under subsection (2)(a) of this section. The client care and operations components must be rebased in even-numbered years. Beginning with rates paid on July 1, 2020, wages, benefits and taxes, and operations costs shall be rebased using 2018 data.(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department shall not implement the scheduled rebase of assisted living facility rates that would have otherwise taken effect July 1, 2026, until the following fiscal biennium, beginning July 1, 2027. Following the delayed rebase for rates effective July 1, 2027, the department shall resume adherence to the existing statutory biennial rebasing schedule established in this section.(8) Beginning July 1, 2020, the room and board component shall be updated annually subject to the department's and the Washington state health care authority's rules related to client financial responsibility.Sec. 939. RCW 74.46.561 and 2023 c 475 s 942 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature adopts a new system for establishing nursing home payment rates beginning July 1, 2016. Any payments to nursing homes for services provided after June 30, 2016, must be based on the new system. The new system must be designed in such a manner as to decrease administrative complexity associated with the payment methodology, reward nursing homes providing care for high acuity residents, incentivize quality care for residents of nursing homes, and establish minimum staffing standards for direct care.(2) The new system must be based primarily on industry-wide costs, and have three main components: Direct care, indirect care, and capital.(3)(a) The direct care component must include the direct care and therapy care components of the previous system, along with food, laundry, and dietary services. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, direct care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on one hundred percent or greater of statewide case mix neutral median costs, but shall be capped so that a nursing home provider's direct care rate does not exceed 118 percent of its base year's direct care allowable costs except if the provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2). Direct care must be performance-adjusted for acuity every six months, using case mix principles. Direct care must be regionally adjusted using countywide wage index information available through the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics. There is no minimum occupancy for direct care. The direct care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.(b) Unless a nursing home provider is below the minimum staffing standard established in RCW 74.42.360(2), a provider's direct care rate relative to its base year's direct care allowable costs must be capped as follows:(i) For fiscal year 2023, the cap must not exceed 165 percent;(ii) For fiscal year 2024, the cap must not exceed 153 percent; and(iii) For fiscal year 2025, the cap must not exceed 142 percent.(4)(a) The indirect care component must include the elements of administrative expenses, maintenance costs, and housekeeping services from the previous system. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent must be applied to indirect care. Indirect care must be paid at a fixed rate, based on ninety percent or greater of statewide median costs. The indirect care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.(b) A minimum occupancy assumption must be applied to indirect care as follows:(i) For fiscal year 2023, the assumption must be 75 percent;(ii) For fiscal year 2024, the assumption must be 80 percent; and(iii) For fiscal year 2025, the assumption must be 80 percent.(5) The capital component must use a fair market rental system to set a price per bed. The capital component must be adjusted for the age of the facility, and must use a minimum occupancy assumption of ninety percent.(a) Beginning July 1, 2016, the fair rental rate allocation for each facility must be determined by multiplying the allowable nursing home square footage in (c) of this subsection by the RSMeans rental rate in (d) of this subsection and by the number of licensed beds yielding the gross unadjusted building value. An equipment allowance of ten percent must be added to the unadjusted building value. The sum of the unadjusted building value and equipment allowance must then be reduced by the average age of the facility as determined by (e) of this subsection using a depreciation rate of one and one-half percent. The depreciated building and equipment plus land valued at ten percent of the gross unadjusted building value before depreciation must then be multiplied by the rental rate at seven and one-half percent to yield an allowable fair rental value for the land, building, and equipment.(b) The fair rental value determined in (a) of this subsection must be divided by the greater of the actual total facility census from the prior full calendar year or imputed census based on the number of licensed beds at ninety percent occupancy.(c) For the rate year beginning July 1, 2016, all facilities must be reimbursed using four hundred square feet. For the rate year beginning July 1, 2017, allowable nursing facility square footage must be determined using the total nursing facility square footage as reported on the medicaid cost reports submitted to the department in compliance with this chapter. The maximum allowable square feet per bed may not exceed four hundred fifty.(d) Each facility must be paid at eighty-three percent or greater of the median nursing facility RSMeans construction index value per square foot. The department may use updated RSMeans construction index information when more recent square footage data becomes available. The statewide value per square foot must be indexed based on facility zip code by multiplying the statewide value per square foot times the appropriate zip code based index. For the purpose of implementing this section, the value per square foot effective July 1, 2016, must be set so that the weighted average fair rental value rate is not less than ten dollars and eighty cents per patient day. The capital component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this section must be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.(e) The average age is the actual facility age reduced for significant renovations. Significant renovations are defined as those renovations that exceed two thousand dollars per bed in a calendar year as reported on the annual cost report submitted in accordance with this chapter. For the rate beginning July 1, 2016, the department shall use renovation data back to 1994 as submitted on facility cost reports. Beginning July 1, 2016, facility ages must be reduced in future years if the value of the renovation completed in any year exceeds two thousand dollars times the number of licensed beds. The cost of the renovation must be divided by the accumulated depreciation per bed in the year of the renovation to determine the equivalent number of new replacement beds. The new age for the facility is a weighted average with the replacement bed equivalents reflecting an age of zero and the existing licensed beds, minus the new bed equivalents, reflecting their age in the year of the renovation. At no time may the depreciated age be less than zero or greater than forty-four years.(f) A nursing facility's capital component rate allocation must be rebased annually, effective July 1, 2016, in accordance with this section and this chapter.(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "RSMeans" means building construction costs data as published by Gordian.(6) A quality incentive must be offered as a rate enhancement beginning July 1, 2016.(a) An enhancement no larger than five percent and no less than one percent of the statewide average daily rate must be paid to facilities that meet or exceed the standard established for the quality incentive. All providers must have the opportunity to earn the full quality incentive payment.(b) The quality incentive component must be determined by calculating an overall facility quality score composed of four to six quality measures. For fiscal year 2017 there shall be four quality measures, and for fiscal year 2018 there shall be six quality measures. Initially, the quality incentive component must be based on minimum data set quality measures for the percentage of long-stay residents who self-report moderate to severe pain, the percentage of high-risk long-stay residents with pressure ulcers, the percentage of long-stay residents experiencing one or more falls with major injury, and the percentage of long-stay residents with a urinary tract infection. Quality measures must be reviewed on an annual basis by a stakeholder work group established by the department. Upon review, quality measures may be added or changed. The department may risk adjust individual quality measures as it deems appropriate.(c) The facility quality score must be point based, using at a minimum the facility's most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data. Point thresholds for each quality measure must be established using the corresponding statistical values for the quality measure point determinants of eighty quality measure points, sixty quality measure points, forty quality measure points, and twenty quality measure points, identified in the most recent available five-star quality rating system technical user's guide published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.(d) Facilities meeting or exceeding the highest performance threshold (top level) for a quality measure receive twenty-five points. Facilities meeting the second highest performance threshold receive twenty points. Facilities meeting the third level of performance threshold receive fifteen points. Facilities in the bottom performance threshold level receive no points. Points from all quality measures must then be summed into a single aggregate quality score for each facility.(e) Facilities receiving an aggregate quality score of eighty percent of the overall available total score or higher must be placed in the highest tier (tier V), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between seventy and seventy-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the second highest tier (tier IV), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between sixty and sixty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the third highest tier (tier III), facilities receiving an aggregate score of between fifty and fifty-nine percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the fourth highest tier (tier II), and facilities receiving less than fifty percent of the overall available total score must be placed in the lowest tier (tier I).(f) The tier system must be used to determine the amount of each facility's per patient day quality incentive component. The per patient day quality incentive component for tier IV is seventy-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, the per patient day quality incentive component for tier III is fifty percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V, and the per patient day quality incentive component for tier II is twenty-five percent of the per patient day quality incentive component for tier V. Facilities in tier I receive no quality incentive component.(g) Tier system payments must be set in a manner that ensures that the entire biennial appropriation for the quality incentive program is allocated.(h) Facilities with insufficient three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data must be assigned to the tier corresponding to their five-star quality rating. Facilities with a five-star quality rating must be assigned to the highest tier (tier V) and facilities with a one-star quality rating must be assigned to the lowest tier (tier I). The use of a facility's five-star quality rating shall only occur in the case of insufficient centers for medicare and medicaid services minimum data set information.(i) The quality incentive rates must be adjusted semiannually on July 1 and January 1 of each year using, at a minimum, the most recent available three-quarter average centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.(j) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of short-stay residents who newly received an antipsychotic medication must be added as a quality measure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure in a manner consistent with those outlined in (b) through (h) of this subsection using the centers for medicare and medicaid services quality data.(k) Beginning July 1, 2017, the percentage of direct care staff turnover must be added as a quality measure using the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal and nursing home facility payroll data. Turnover is defined as an employee departure. The department must determine the quality incentive thresholds for this quality measure using data from the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal, unless such data is not available, in which case the department shall use direct care staffing turnover data from the most recent medicaid cost report.(7) Reimbursement of the safety net assessment imposed by chapter 74.48 RCW and paid in relation to medicaid residents must be continued.(8)(a) The direct care and indirect care components must be rebased in even-numbered years, beginning with rates paid on July 1, 2016. Rates paid on July 1, 2016, must be based on the 2014 calendar year cost report. On a percentage basis, after rebasing, the department must confirm that the statewide average daily rate has increased at least as much as the average rate of inflation, as determined by the skilled nursing facility market basket index published by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, or a comparable index. If after rebasing, the percentage increase to the statewide average daily rate is less than the average rate of inflation for the same time period, the department is authorized to increase rates by the difference between the percentage increase after rebasing and the average rate of inflation.(b) It is the intention of the legislature that direct and indirect care rates paid in fiscal year 2022 will be rebased using the calendar year 2019 cost reports. For fiscal year 2021, in addition to the rates generated by (a) of this subsection, an additional adjustment is provided as established in this subsection (8)(b). Beginning May 1, 2020, and through June 30, 2021, the calendar year costs must be adjusted for inflation by a twenty-four month consumer price index, based on the most recently available monthly index for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics. It is also the intent of the legislature that, starting in fiscal year 2022 and ending in fiscal year 2028, a facility-specific rate add-on equal to the inflation adjustment that facilities received solely in fiscal year 2021, must be added to the rate. For fiscal year 2024, the direct care and indirect care components shall be rebased to the 2021 calendar year cost report plus a 4.7 percent adjustment for inflation. For fiscal year 2025, the direct and indirect care components shall be rebased to the 2022 calendar year cost report plus a five percent adjustment for inflation.(c) To determine the necessity of regular inflationary adjustments to the nursing facility rates, by December 1, 2020, the department shall provide the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature with a report that provides a review of rates paid in 2017, 2018, and 2019 in comparison to costs incurred by nursing facilities.(9) The direct care component provided in subsection (3) of this section is subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6). Beginning July 1, 2016, pursuant to rules established by the department, funds that are received through the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6) must be used for technical assistance, specialized training, or an increase to the quality enhancement established in subsection (6) of this section. The legislature intends to review the utility of maintaining the reconciliation and settlement process under a price-based payment methodology, and may discontinue the reconciliation and settlement process after the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.(10) Compared to the rate in effect June 30, 2016, including all cost components and rate add-ons, no facility may receive a rate reduction of more than one percent on July 1, 2016, more than two percent on July 1, 2017, or more than five percent on July 1, 2018. To ensure that the appropriation for nursing homes remains cost neutral, the department is authorized to cap the rate increase for facilities in fiscal years 2017, 2018, and 2019.(11) It is the intent of the legislature that a rate add-on be applied to the weighted average nursing facility payment rate referenced in the omnibus operating appropriations act in an amount necessary to ensure that the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal year 2026 is equal to the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal year 2025.(12) It is the intent of the legislature that no facility may receive a rate reduction for fiscal year 2027 compared to the rate in effect June 30, 2026. To ensure that the appropriation for nursing homes remains cost neutral, the department is authorized to cap the rate increase for facilities in fiscal year 2027. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will continue into the next fiscal biennium and will end June 30, 2028.Sec. 940. RCW 82.87.030 and 2021 c 196 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All taxes, interest, and penalties collected under this chapter shall be distributed as follows, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium:(a) The first $500,000,000 collected each fiscal year shall be deposited into the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230; and(b) Any remainder collected each fiscal year shall be deposited into the common school construction ((account [fund]))fund.(2) The amounts specified under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be adjusted annually as provided under RCW 82.87.150.(3) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, all taxes, interest, and penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the education legacy trust account.Sec. 941. RCW 89.16.020 and 2012 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter the state reclamation revolving account, heretofore established and hereinafter called the reclamation account, shall consist of all sums appropriated thereto by the legislature; all gifts made to the state therefor and the proceeds of the sale thereof; the proceeds of the sale or redemption of and the interest earned by securities acquired with the moneys thereof; and all reimbursements for moneys advanced for the payment of assessments upon public lands of the state for the improvement thereof. Moneys in the reclamation account may be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to RCW 43.84.080.(2) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state reclamation revolving account to the general fund.Sec. 942. RCW 90.48.465 and 2022 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish fees to collect expenses for issuing and administering each class of permits under RCW 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An initial fee schedule shall be established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two years. This fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of date of issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees charged shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit issuance and compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and toxicity and be designed to encourage recycling and the reduction of the quantity of pollutants. Fees shall be established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing laboratory analysis of samples taken during inspections, reviewing plans and documents directly related to operations of permittees, overseeing performance of delegated pretreatment programs, and supporting the overhead expenses that are directly related to these activities.(2) The department shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not pay twice for the administrative expense of a permit. Accordingly, administrative expenses for permits issued by a municipality under RCW 90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.(3) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the economic impact of fees on small dischargers and the economic impact of fees on public entities required to obtain permits for stormwater runoff and shall provide appropriate adjustments.(4) The fee for an individual permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for fiscal year 1999. The fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may rise in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter 43.135 RCW.(5) The fee for a general permit or an individual permit developed solely as a result of the federal court of appeals decision in Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th Cir. 2001) is limited, until June 30, 2003, to a maximum of three hundred dollars. Such a permit is required only, and as long as, the interpretation of this court decision is not overturned or modified by future court rulings, administrative rule making, or clarification of scope by the United States environmental protection agency or legislative action. In such a case the department shall take appropriate action to rescind or modify these permits.(6) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the water quality permit account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for purposes of administering permits under RCW 90.46.220, 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the water quality permit account to the general fund.(7) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report will be due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and anticipated expenses for the current and following fiscal years.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 943. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 944. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---